VOL. II. 1
XIII.
Wakened
from dreams in which I was
losing myself, I saw that the reproof of the
camel-driver was needed. We accordingly
returned towards the path we had left, and
moved on in the direction of the city.
The whole prospect to the east was now open
to us, as we crossed a part of the promontory of
which I have spoken. Machrus, the Fortress,
stood before us crowning its inaccessible heights
with tower and wall; the city with which it is
connected by fortified passages, stretching down
the hill as it slopes gently to the north, and
spreading out on each side, beyond its
embattlements
,
into suburbs which spoke of both
numbers and wealth. The prospect was wild
and magnificent. The precipitous heights with
trees and shrubs depending from the fissures in
which they had fixed their roots, water from
secret springs gushing forth and falling from
rock to rock till it was lost in unfathomable
gulphs below, all crowned with the stately
buildings of the city in every form of Greek
and Roman art, the Fortress at the southern
limit towering above the whole, and bidding
defiance through its natural defences to the
most proved resources of war, presented in
their union a scene like no other which I had
beheld before in either Europe or Asia. The
beauty seemed to me, the greater also, for the
features of dreary desolation, that were so
many and so appalling in almost every other
direction.
In the city above, and among the clefts
of the rocks on which it stands, could the
eye, pained as it had been by the barrenness
of the desert, and the shores and surface of the
Salt Sea, now rest with an agreeable sense of
relief, upon the dark hues and heavy masses of
this eastern foliage. Over the walls were to be
seen the palm, the poplar, the sycamore, and
the broad terebinth, shooting up and mingling
their forms with those of the columns and
pinnacles
of Herod's temples and palaces. All, that
from such distance could be descried, gave signs
of a population not insensible to any of the
provisions by which life is adorned, at least,
if not furnished with additional means of
happiness
and we pressed on our way, anxious
ere the sun should leave us to pass the gates,
and see more and from a nearer point of view of
what filled us so with admiration.
As we went still farther to the north on our
way towards the gate of the city, we fell in with
many travellers taking the same road, and passed
the scattered dwellings of those who, as
gardeners
and husbandmen, supplied the wants of the
citizens. A rich soil began now to show itself,
from which the last products of the harvest were
gathering. When we approached the gates, as
our view was unobstructed to the east, and in
the direction of Herodium, we beheld, as far
as the eye could reach, valleys still smiling in
a rich luxuriance of vegetation, sprinkled with
villages and the insulated dwellings of the
peasantry. Upon passing within the walls, we
found the city of less extent than it had
seemed when seen from the borders of the sea,
but at the same time remarkable for the
elegance
and costliness of its structures, especially
its public ones. For Herod the Great having
rebuilt Machrus, he obeyed here, as he did
wherever he undertook any work for the people,
and for which their taxes were to pay, his
passion
for magnificence, and accordingly filled it
with palaces, markets, temples, and porticos, as
his humor inclined. The city in these features
of it seems far beyond the demands of the
region
and of the inhabitants. These are of many
nations;  Greeks, Romans, Egyptians,
Arabians
,
as well as Jews and Samaritans, being
found here, either as permanent citizens, or as
strangers resorting hither for purposes of
traffic
.
We soon found our way to the merchant's
house, to whom Onias had commended me, who
gave me a hospitable welcome to the city of
Herod. Upon inquiring after the Tetrarch, and
in what way access was to be obtained, and
whether he were at present in Machrus, I
learned that he was now dwelling in the palace
within the Fortress, that he was easy of
approach
,
and moreover was with impatience
awaiting my arrival, of which Onias had given
him warning.
When I had been refreshed by the sleep of a
long night, and had satisfied my love of what
is new and strange by examining different parts
of the lower city, I turned toward the
Citadel
,
within which stands the palace of Herod.
Although there are in the lower city other
palaces, costly and sumptuous, which he also
occupies when his inclinations prompt,  yet
for the most part, as I have learned, he confines
himself to this within the Fortress. This
place is reached only at one point, and by one
1 *
passage, which is a bridge,  covered by an arch,
and more like a subterranean tunnel than a
bridge,  thrown across a deep gulf, that separates
one part of this mountain from another. On the
smaller part stands the Fortress of Machrus,
entered in the way I have described. On every
other side it is wholly inaccessible; since the
precipices which nature has reared are
impossible
of ascent, and superadded to them are the
lofty walls and towers, a hundred cubits and
more in height, rebuilt by the Great Herod,
when they had been demolished by the
Romans in their conflicts with Aristobulus.
Only it must be said, that the structures of
Herod are greatly inferior in both extent and
strength to those that had before been built by
our king Alexander.
When I had passed the huge gateways at
either extremity of the bridge, both of which
were guarded by soldiers, I entered the space
enclosed by the walls of the Citadel, in the
centre of which rose before me the palace of
the Tetrarch, magnificent in its vastness, and
beautiful by reason of the multitude of its
polished
columns, its lofty porticos, and the
richness
of its various decorations. Before it, and
surrounding it on all sides, were groves of every
fruit tree, and flowering plant brought from all
parts of the world. No tree could, I believe, be
named, in any way remarkable, distinguished
either for its beauty of form, or the flavor of its
fruit, or the odor of its blossoms, that might not
be found here. In all directions also, fountains
of water were throwing up to a great height
their refreshing showers or columns. Large
ranges of other buildings, designed for the
chief officers of the king, for all such as choose
to resort to his court, as well as for the large
garrison which is always maintained here, were
seen in different parts of this large enclosure,
seeming almost, for extent, like those I had left
on the other side of the bridge. The scene
was made to appear full of life also, from the
movement of troops of soldiers on the walls or
the platforms beneath, to the sound of their
warlike instruments, and from the numbers of
those who appeared to be visitors of the king,
and who were walking among the trees, or
reposing by the side of the fountains. A busy
multitude also of slaves were laboring at their
different employments, in preserving in their
order the grounds and the buildings, or
performing
the errands committed to them.
I was led to that part of the Palace, where
were situated the private apartments of the
Tetrarch, to the room in which he receives
those with whom he has any affairs to transact
that are to be conducted with privacy. Herod
was sitting with writing materials before him
as I entered. In his appearance he conformed
to what I had looked for. He was not above
the middle stature, nor in other respects
possessed
of any of those remarkable qualities
by which the eye is either captivated or
awed at once. His countenance easily
relaxes
into a smile; yet in the smile there is
more of a certain sort of derision, or secret
contempt, than of anything like mirthfulness,
or goodwill. His eyes are those of a Jew,
quick in their motion, and suddenly, and
without
apparent cause, averted from you as you
meet their glance; his beard and hair of a
reddish
hue, not long, but thick and straight. His
garments of the richest stuffs were such as
become
a monarch. His voice is for the most
part soft and cheerful; yet often, and
unconsciously
as it were, sliding into other
tones harsh and imperious, as if they were
those most natural. He rose and saluted me
with courtesy, using the Latin tongue, which
he speaks with readiness and exactness, but
rather as if he had learned it of masters, than
by much use among those to whom it is a
native
speech. He asked after the welfare of
Onias and his household, expressing much
regard
for him, and great reliance upon his
judgment
and valor. He then spake of my journey
and of my arrival, and asked, if I had before
visited these regions.
I answered, that I had never until within a
short period seen any part of the country of my
forefathers; nor until now, the Dead Sea and
the city of Machrus. I spoke of the wonders
of the place, and of the magnificence of his
father to whom it owed its existence.
Yes, he said, Herod was a great man.
But it had been better for Israel, had he been
great as a Jew, rather than as a man and a king.
He was a Roman, or a Greek, not a true son
of Abraham.
It was very true, I said, and it was the
more a matter of rejoicing, that his son in that
departed from the example of the parent, and
was a lover of his own country and people, and
their customs, yet without a deadly hatred of
others. The people were now in expectation,
that through him their ancient greatness might
be restored.
It is my glory, he replied, to be, and to
be called a Jew; a lover of the Law, and an
observer of its commands. The people of
Galilee
and Pera know me only as a Jew. If I
am ever King of Israel  I shall be King of
Israel.
I said, that I could not doubt that he would
be; yet it rested with himself.
Young man, said he, you speak well and
boldly. Onias has commended thee to me.
But for his word, which is sure as the roots of
these hills, I should not talk with thee thus.
But I now speak with thee even as I should
with him.
I said, that he might do so with safety. I
was now wholly a Jew, and so far desirous of
the independence and liberty of my country, that
I stood ready and waiting to join any enterprise
that promised, through its extent and well
concerted
plans, the success that ought to crown
it.
Thy countenance and thy voice give me
assurance, said Herod, of trust-worthiness.
But what set thee about that mad outbreak in
Csarea? Thy present speech agrees not with
that. Pilate was too strong for thee. It would
have gone ill with thee, as well as Philip, but
for Onias. I should hardly else have seen thee
here in Machrus.
The possibility of such mischance seemed to
amuse him. I then related to him minutely
how it fell out there, and how it was by an
accident
alone that I had been involved in the
enterprise.
Ah, now again, said Herod, you seem
the same person who first spoke. I see what
swayed thee, friendship and love, not the sacred
passion for thy country, of which the occasion
was not worthy. The great God of Israel,
the God of Moses and of Abraham, of David
and the Maccabees, is to be worshipped and
served only in honorable undertakings, agreeing
in their greatness with his majesty.
In saying these words the manner of the
king changed, and I could see in him without
difficulty one not unworthy to reign over Israel.
He rose and continued with energy.
Unhappy Israel! when shall her sorrows
cease, her oppressions end, her tears be wiped
away from her eyes! All the nations of the
earth have taken their fill in the slaughter of
her children, and carrying them away into
captivity
.
The king of Babylon, and the king of
Syria, have in turn laid her waste. But as
truly as God did bring about a return from the
captivity, and a deliverance from the great
Antiochus
,
so surely will he accomplish a greater
redemption still, from a greater thraldom, by
the hand of the least of his servants. Rome
shall yet know that there is a greater than
herself
;
Judea shall yet know that her Redeemer
liveth; the multitude of the people shall yet
rejoice in her salvation. Unto me, Julian, unto
me is committed this office, and to the least
iota shall its duties be fulfilled.
I believe it, I answered; with all Israel,
as one man, at thy back, thou canst not fail.
But Israel is divided. How shall she be brought
together, in one faith and one submission?
That is the work, replied the Tetrarch,
we have to do. Ere one step in action can be
taken, the mind and heart of the people must be
assailed and converted. Already, Julian, has this
been done beyond thy knowledge or belief.
Emissaries, secret, and partners as it were of my
own bosom, have gone out hence into every
corner of the land, learning who were to be
trusted, and to them confiding the purposes we
cherish. The Herodians, ever lovers of our
house, are with us. They will be divided from
Rome whom they now affect, but, as they
perceive
,
in seeming only; to be more than
rewarded
for all they may lose, in a future Rome
here in Judea. In that new Rome, that new
and more glorious kingdom, they shall have
free indulgence in the customs they approve.
The redeemed Jew shall be bound by no chains
of a new slavery. Dost thou understand?
I did not understand the glance with which
he accompanied those words.
The Law will then, I replied, surely be
supreme; it will be raised to new honor, and
a wider dominion; it will be the everlasting
foundation on which we shall stand.
Oh, surely, surely, he answered; the
Law will be supreme. It is for that we war,
for that we dare all, for that we put in jeopardy
our lives and our children and our wealth.
But  but enough of this for once, young
Roman
.
Let us break away from a theme so
grave, and look abroad upon the wonders of a
place, as yet so new to thee.
Thus saying, he directed me to accompany
him to other parts of the palace, and of the
Fortress, and he would display to me its
resources
.
This I was by no means unwilling to do.
So we left the apartment.
After we had surveyed the splendors of the
palace
the halls, the banqueting rooms, the
chambers
,
the marble roofs, the carved ceilings of
Cedar of Lebanon, the columns and the
porticos
,
we turned to the huge walls of this great
prison-house, that by ascending them, and still
more the lofty towers that shoot up from them
at regular intervals, we might obtain a prospect
of the region round about. We soon, though
only after a wearisome ascent, stood on the top of
the topmost tower, whence the eye looked abroad
as far as it is in the power of the eye to penetrate,
no object coming between it and the utmost
verge of the horizon. We looked in silence for
a space upon the broad land of Judea lying
before
us in its luxuriance, yet in its slavery.
All that we now see, cried Herod, pointing
VOL. II. 2
to the four quarters of the Heavens, shall yet
be mine  by my arm shall Jehovah get the
victory, upon me is his spirit and his power
poured out, this my soul knoweth, and by me
shall be filled the throne of David. Have faith
in this, Julian, and thou shalt sit on the right
hand of my power when I shall have obtained
the Kingdom.
I said that the reward of having served Israel
according to my strength was all that I
coveted
.
Nevertheless, said the Tetrarch, more shall
be added. He that worketh for love shall reap
the best reward, the reward that love alone can
give; but he shall not lose what cometh of
the world's honor. Let us now descend.
We then descended; but when we had
reached the bottom of the tower, in place of
passing out by the door through which we had
entered, Herod took a contrary direction, and
beckoned to me to follow him, and again to
descend
still farther. So we began to descend lower
and lower, until, as it seemed, we must have
reached the roots of the mountain, and the
fountains
of the great springs. But at length we
paused, and drawing the bolts of a door we
entered
a vast hall perfectly finished after the rules
of art, lighted, but whence I saw not, and filled
with all the various munitions of war. It was
an armory of weapons of every kind, known
to the arts of modern warfare, all of the most
perfect workmanship, and arranged each kind by
itself, in the most exact order. I was filled with
amazement at such displays of power; but it
was increased when from this apartment I was
led into another, and still another of equal
dimensions
,
and all in like manner stored with
the implements of death, with harness for men,
and horses, and elephants. I gave words to the
wonder which I could not repress, and asked,
Why is all this and whence?
Thanks to the Providence of the Great
God of Israel, replied the Tetrarch, his
servant
has been led to lay aside from the uses of
luxury and a vain show, wherewith to heap
together
these treasures, richer than stores of
gold, and kept against the day of the Lord,
that great day, when Israel shall arise and shake
off her oppressors. Herod the Great built cities,
and palaces, and strong holds; Herod Antipas
hath filled them with both men and arms. It
is not thou seest without a show of right, Julian,
that he asks thy confidence and allegiance.
I said, that I confessed his greatness.
We then left the armories, and again
ascended
,
but only a part of the way, when Herod by
a door opening toward another quarter entered
an apartment lighted by windows pierced through
the walls of the rock, and filled with vessels, in
which were deposited coin and jewels of
immense
value. Here, said my conductor,
dost thou behold the secrets of the power that
shall be displayed in Israel. Let but the
children
of Israel come up to their tents as of old,
when the Philistine was in the land, and there
shall not be wanting any other of the
instruments
of successful warfare. Think not,
moreover
,
that thou hast now seen the whole of
Herod's power. At Herodium, at Tiberias, at
Sepphoris, are there magazines not less well
supplied than these thou hast seen here. We
wait but for the day and the hour, which the
Lord hath put in his own hand.
We returned to the courts around the Palace.
I was there shown the huge reservoirs of water
prepared for the subsistence of those who should
be besieged, the granaries for the necessary
supplies of food, and all the various stores in
secret chambers within the body of the
outward
walls, of missiles of every kind, as well
as the most combustible substances for the
annoyance
and destruction of the assailants. So
that when I had seen all, it seemed to me a
place now wholly impregnable; to be subdued
only, if at all, by years of patient waiting
and watching, until the food within should be
consumed, or pestilence do the work of the
sword.
When we had ended this survey of a
thousand
wonders, we rentered the apartment
whence we had departed, where Herod
informed
me that I was no longer the guest of the
merchant, but his own, and that Chuza, the
Steward of the household, would conduct me
to the part of the palace provided for me.
As I sat within the apartment thus made
ready for me, in that part of the palace, where,
the walls of the Fortress sinking with the form
of the ground, the eye could freely wander over
the whole adjacent country and the streets of
the lower city, I could not but marvel at the
strange position in which I found myself, and
the course that seemed now plainly to be
marked
out before me. I could from my windows
survey the distant valley of the Jordan, and the
verdant slopes of Moab, together with the
sandy deserts that we had traversed. This
desert, said I to myself, and I say it to thee
also, my mother, as it is the emblem of what
thou hast been so many years, Judea, so these
luxuriant valleys smiling in plenty and in peace
are the type of what thou shalt be. I have
found him who, if God withhold not his favor,
shall accomplish thy deliverance, and save thee
out of the hands of thy enemies.
It is from this watch-tower, my mother, that
2*
I write these things, and overlooking these
objects
so full of interest to a lover of his country.
Herod loads me with favors. But although I
have been here many days, he hath conversed
only of such things as have been common to
all. The palace is thronged with those,
strangers
from all countries, as well as his own family
and friends, with whom he must divide his
hours, and it is chiefly at the table in the
sumptuous
banqueting room, that I have met him
since my first interview. There he has been
surrounded by his great officers, his ministers,
the chief citizens and lords of Machrus and
the Pera, as well as strangers, and hath been
in a manner inaccessible. I have observed in
him, in whatever relation I have seen him, only
the bearing that becomes a monarch. The
daughter of Aretas, Fatnah, remains still in
Tiberias
,
while Joanna, the wife of the Steward,
and chief officer under Herod, performs the
duties that had otherwise fallen to her. Of her
I know nothing but that she is a devout
woman
,
and in great esteem among our people.
Ziba brings me intelligence, such as he
gathers
among the servants and soldiers of the
palace
,
that Fatnah will no more reign in
Mach
rus.
They speak openly, he says, of the
king's love of Herodias, and that he will yet
bring about what he has proposed to himself;
but that in such case war will ensue between
him and the Arabian king.
Yet of these things I have heard from no
other. No credible reports of them have come
to my ear through any of the guests, nor
through any of the rulers of the synagogues.
I have again conversed with Herod upon
those matters which brought me to Machrus.
He seems like one, who, using caution where
he intends to bestow confidence, has waited to
observe, and know me under the ordinary
circumstances of every day, ere he would
entrust to me further what concerns so
immediately
the welfare of himself and kingdom.
It was in the most secret apartments of the
palace that he again required my presence.
Julian, said he, I at first showed thee
my willingness to confide in thee, because thou
camest to me from Onias. For thy uncle's sake I
put my trust in thee, and made to thee
revelations
such as have been made to few so young
in the knowledge I have had of them. I have
now seen thee for myself, and from this time,
for thine own sake, nothing is withheld, if it
be that thy purposes still continue as they
were.
I told him that nothing had happened to
change them. I waited but to know all he
would impart. Whatever should be
committed
to me, I would perform.
He then gave me, with minuteness, an
account
of all that had hitherto been done in
Judea, of the persons associated with him, and
the forces of every kind that would be at their
command; of the obstacles yet lying in the
way, and the services required of those who
engaged in his affairs.
Of thee, Julian, said he, we desire
services
in Jerusalem, Csarea, and Rome.
Moneys
are to be raised. Notwithstanding what thou
hast seen, it is but as a tithe of what the
all-devouring
jaws of war will consume. The
faithful at Rome, where they are powerful both
for numbers and their great wealth, are to be
approached by a skilful messenger, that they
may be wrought upon to contribute of their
riches, although they should refuse to serve in
our armies. And in truth we can spare them
from our ranks, so they will but impart freely of
that which is better. Whom so well could we
depute upon this great errand as thyself?
Moreover
communications by word of mouth are yet
to be had with Sejanus, with whom we are
bound in league. In this thou canst serve us.
At what time Sejanus rises in Rome, and takes
the crown of Tiberius, Herod rises in Judea
and sits upon the throne of Israel. But what
then, Julian? Is Judea to be then bound to
Sejanus as now to Tiberius? So thinks
Sejanus
;
and thus the league stands,  that when
the armies of Tiberius are here defeated as in
Italy and the West, the East shall still through me
be his. But so will not the league be kept.
Judea
once her own, the armies of Rome and of
apostate Jews once defeated, Israel then reigns
in her own right, her new kingdom is come,
and it shall never pass away. Who sees not,
that can see at all, how all things conspire
together
to this great consummation? Does Herod
serve but as the tool of the Roman? Let the
Roman look to it  let him look to it. He shall
see betimes, who serves as tool of the other.
The quick twinkling eye of the Tetrarch
expressed inward satisfaction, and he smiled as
the picture he drew rose before him. Although
as in every bosom, there was in mine a
loathing
of deceit, yet who was to be deceived?
and what and to whom was to be the profiting?
It was but to be a deceiving of the great
deceiver
himself, and that to win life and liberty,
a home and a kingdom for the Israelite, long a
wanderer, or a slave on his own soil. The
scheme, as I gazed upon it, grew into honor and
beauty, as it was in its craft undoubtedly
auspicious
of success.
I, therefore, as Herod ceased, commended
what he had said, and engaged on my part to
further his plans, as he should desire, in Rome,
Jerusalem, or Csarea.
There lieth now in our way then,
continued
the Tetrarch, but one obstacle.
He paused.
I asked, and what is that?
John the Baptist, he answered, with
bitterness
;
that wild man of the woods.
I see in him no harm, I answered. He
seems, indeed, not only to be harmless, but
even a just man.
That is it  that is it, replied the
Tetrarch
;
the people honor him, and he cannot
therefore be touched so well. But he distracts
their minds, and draws them away from where
they are by us to be directed, and kept. It is
reported, he even setteth up for Christ. At
least the people are full of wonderings and
doubts, and many believe he will so prove
himself
,
in the face of all present appearances to the
contrary.
But I replied, He has strictly denied that he
is Christ, and claims only to be a prophet.
Besides
,
the people seeing none of the marks of
the Christ in his manner of life or acts, will
soon forsake him.
It seemeth not so as yet, and it is now since
the Tabernacles that he hath led about the
people
,
preaching sedition. He must be silenced.
Let him be seized by thy power, I replied,
and I fear the issue would be disastrous rather
than helpful to our cause. It would turn
against thee the affections of multitudes who
now throng him and believe in him. Let him
alone, and though he may instruct or amuse
the people, of what injury to us can be his
baptisms
of water in the Jordan? It is but so
much water gathered up and poured out again.
That may be, replied the king. But
there is more in John than his baptisms, which,
as thou sayest, are but so much water of the
Jordan caught up and poured into the stream
again. He preacheth  and preacheth sedition
among my people. He hath intermeddled with
my affairs. Were it not for the people, his idiot,
wonder-loving worshippers, his head had ere
this graced our palace gates.
I knew well that in what he said Herod now
referred to Herodias and to John's accusations
on that account. It was plain that the rumors
were well founded, else why the anger of the
Tetrarch and his language? In what I myself
condemned I could not be silent, and though I
more than doubted the issue, I resolved to do
what in me lay to draw the king away from a
purpose that, as I firmly believed, would blast
all the hopes he was cherishing, and so many
with him.
And doth not John the Baptist counsel well,
O King? If he intermeddleth in thy affairs, it
is to save thee. Thou canst not marry
Herodias
without guilt in the eye of the Law
without ruin to thy cause.
Thou art over-bold, young man, said
Herod starting, his countenance changing
with passion; It was not for this I placed
my confidence in thee. Beware the chafed
lion.
If I see thee, Herod, about to fall from a
precipice, am I in fault to hold thee back? I say
again  and I fear thee not  to put away thy
wife for Herodias is folly, and guilt, and ruin.
Have I not just pledged myself to thy cause?
Am I not then invested with some rights?
Shall I stand idly by and see thee destroy not
only thyself, but me, my friends, and my
country's
hope?
Say on, young man, say on, said the
Tetrarch
,
thou art bold, but I can honor
courage
.
I have no more to say, I answered, than
to beseech the king, as he loves his cause and
his country, to refrain from that to which he
hath put his hand.
But, said Herod, suddenly calm again, I
am bound; it cannot be; my word is
plighted
.
Bind thyself to the right, O King, though
in so doing thou shouldst break thy word.
Thou canst in nothing be true, being false to
God. Why shouldst thou covet this divorce?
Is not thy Fatnah the daughter of a king?
She is an Arabian. The wife of the King
of Israel should be a Jewess.
A Jewess, rightly considered, is one who
feareth God and worketh his will; not who was
born of Jewish parents. Is she not virtuous
and fair?
Aye, and weak. Herodias is the great
Herod in female form. With her  and I were
doubly armed.
As we hear, Fatnah is full of kindly
virtues
a mother to her people.
But she is barren.
Yet were Herodias fruitful as the vines of
Judea, the sin would be but the more  she is
thy brother's wife!
The face of Herod again swelled with
passion
as if he could bear no more. But he
suppressed it.
Young Roman, he is no brother of mine
I swear it.
Is not Philip of Jerusalem thy father's son?
son of the Great Herod?
But yet no brother of mine  for else were
half the men of Jerusalem, nay of Judea,
methinks
,
my brothers. I can choose no where
without incest. This is no kindred in the sight
of God, or man.
VOL. II. 3
It stands so, I answered, in the Law,
and in the Jewish courts.
In the letter of the law, it may be, he
answered, but not in its spirit; and for the
Jewish courts, they are beds of rottenness, and
schools but of fraud and cunning. So too, if as
thou wilt doubtless further urge, Herodias be
the daughter of Aristobulus and so my
brother's
daughter, I reply again, I own him not.
He was no brother of mine. Archelaus was
indeed my brother  Olympias is indeed my
sister, children of Malthace as well as of Herod
but beyond them I know no brother, no
sister, or else wert thou perhaps a brother, and
Joanna, Chuza's wife, a sister.
Think not, O King, I replied, to rest in
reasons such as these. They are but gilded
toys that amuse thy mind awhile, and perhaps
may dazzle the minds of others for a time, but
they are of no solid worth; and the eye and the
mind will soon see them as they are. The
people of our land, if in many things they are
corrupt, if they honor not the Law of Moses,
as they ought, yet they revere, in some sort,
the great law of justice written by the finger
of God on the heart, before which the high
and the low are alike arraigned, and will be
judged in the great day,  and so it is not,
O King, the voice of John alone that condemns
and accuses, it is the voice of the people, and so
the voice of God. They behold thee about to
commit
injustice and folly in Israel, and their tongues
rebuke thee; and those the more who are
building
on thee their hope of redemption. Can they
think that he who abuses a lesser power shall
safely be entrusted with a greater? Shall not
righteousness become the anointed of the Lord?
Shall any other rule in His name? Thou
trustest
,
Herod, even that thou shalt be hailed the
Christ of God! and thou knowest that many
now do hold thee so. But shall that faith
abide? For in his Messiah the Jew looks not
merely for the son of David, but the Son of
God; not only for the King, but the Priest and
Prophet also; for the sovereign, but for the
rereformer
,
not less, of his fallen country. Thou
art tearing that faith violently out of the hearts
of those in whom it was taking root. I, even
I, have deemed that upon thee God was now
about to lay his honor; that in thee the new
kingdom should take its beginning; that though
thou be not indeed the expected Messiah, thou
art his forerunner, and he by whom the way is
to be prepared for the establishment of the
reign that is to be eternal. Destroy not the
hopes thus raised in so many hearts, for whose
fulfilment there has been so long tarrying.
Leave us our faith. Abandon not those who
gather together beneath thy standards. We are
ready and waiting at thy chariot wheels to bear
thee on to victory. Send us not away empty
and despairing.
While I said these and many other things,
not knowing what might befall, the
countenance
of the king waxed pale and red by turns,
and his frame trembled. When I had ceased,
he said with a voice scarce articulate through
the raging of inward passion,
I swear, by the soul of my father, young
Jew, that I have now a mind to see thee hurled
from the topmost tower of Machrus a
thousand
fathoms into the gulphs below. Am I a
king to be thus bearded by a boy? Thou
standest there immovable and undaunted, as
though thou wert the king, and I an arrainged
malefactor! Who art thou? Mayhap thou art the
Christ? or else Elias?
So greatly was Herod transported by his
passion
,
and withal a sort of terror, that in these
last words he seemed as much in earnest, as in
derision. He hastily walked back and forth
as if wavering in his mind  and resolving
with difficulty.
At length he paused before me again, his
countenance now calmer, but with a language
spread over it, which I could not read.
Young Jew, I am willing to believe thou
hast spoke the truth.
I am sure, I answered with force, of
nothing so much.
Wouldst thou repeat it? cried the
Tetrarch
with returning passion.
If it would help thee, or Judea, I would
repeat it an hundred times.
Thou art like the face of the Dead Sea
no raging moves thee. But of this no more.
Listen. I am sure now that thou art honest and
true. There lives not the man who else had
dared to thrust himself as thou hast done into the
lion's den. I can now trust thee for a friend of
Israel, whom no fear of peril or death shall turn
aside from the true path that leads to her honor.
There is no place of glory, or of power to
which thou mayest not aspire. I have for thee
the witness of Onias and thine own. But one
thing I have now found, that thou hast eyes
before and behind, and canst penetrate the dark.
Let there be then no deceit betwixt me and
thee. Touching the wife of Philip of
Jerusalem
,
I believe thou hast spoke in part the
truth. I see the weight of thy reasons, and I
shall honor and keep the law  as thou
construest
the law  whilst the occasion demands.
Till the battle is gained there shall be no Jew
so observant of the law as I. The liberty of
Israel shall not suffer harm through me. My
loves and my hates shall alike submit
themselves
3 *
to her interests. Surely in this I show
myself a Jew, as devout as any Pharisee in
Jerusalem
.
What thinkest thou?
I said, that in yielding so much he did well,
and I doubted not that he would in the end
fully keep the Law.
Think no such thing, young man, replied
the king. Let there be no deceit, I say, between
me and thee. Give not up thy own judgment;
thy last words show thee halting. Mayhap
thou still conceivest hopes of me as of the
anointed of God?
Nay, not so far as that. They are
vanished
.
Thou wast then a fool with the rest in
Israel?
I was in doubt. I was ignorant. But I
doubt no longer. Now I know.
And yet, Jew, why now so confident on
the other side? Who shall fathom the purposes
of the most high God? of him who holds the
universe in the hollow of his hands, who sees
of all enterprises the end from the beginning,
and can accomplish the mightiest plans by the
humblest and the basest instruments? Verily
if thou art sure, Son of Alexander, that I am
not the Christ, thou art surer than I. The
people
think me so. They call on me to arise,
and
Appear
! Secret messengers arrive from
all parts of the land and hail me King of
Israel
!
Son of God! the long looked for
Messiah
!
I have not been to them, they have come
to me. What is the spirit that moves them?
May it not be the spirit of Jehovah? Who
can say? When such things have been, and
I have turned back into myself and mused,
have thought of my present power, and the
sure grasp I now may lay on the Roman
greatness
here in Israel, crushing it as a sea-bird's
egg, and the future has thus risen before me, it
hath truly seemed as if God were in very deed
working with me. Visions have come and
gone, there have been inward promptings and
impulses, and influxes of celestial light, that
have been as the voice of God, calling on me to
arise, and make haste, and tarry not, for the
great redemption was drawn nigh, and by my
hand was it to be wrought out. Who can say
more than this? And who shall dare to say
that I am not the Redeemer of Israel?
Herod now seemed another being. His
voice became plaintive and reverent, his
countenance
opened with expressions of generosity
and faith. He seemed like one who was no
trifler or cajoler, but a true believer in his own
words; as if he were in no respect the same
person who had said what had gone before.
But in a moment longer, when the sudden
flame had died away, he sank down again into
his more proper self, and I beheld only the
Tetrarch of Galilee, powerful, shrewd, and
dangerous.
Suddenly turning to me he then added,
Julian, from this day we are friends. My
heart is known to thee, and thine to me. To
others, we are, as we may be. Let us go on
together in peace in the great work set for us
to do. Let all else be forgot but the one
common
aim and end, the overthrow of Rome and
the glory of Israel. Leave me to do with the
people as I may. What fancies soever
concerning
me they may have, let them have them
and they may be more than fancies. God
knoweth  not man.
I said, that I was bound to him and would
serve him. There was a darkness which at
present I could not penetrate; but I should
wait for light to fall upon it from the great
source of light.
We then conversed of the present condition
of affairs in the Pera, in Galilee, and Judea;
of the measures next to be pursued, and of
those fittest to undertake them.
While we thus conversed, it was told to
Herod, that some one required to see him.
Chuza then entered, saying that Onias had
arrived, and desired to see both him and Julian
of Rome.
He is welcome, cried the King; let him
approach.
Onias in a few moments more was with us.
Welcome, Prince of the Jordan, cried
Herod, as the noble form of Onias appeared.
Welcome to Machrus. Let it not be an
offence if I say, that thy kinsman here hath for
a season blotted thee out of our thoughts.
I am happy, replied Onias, whenever a
worthier is found for one less so.
Not a worthier, Onias, rejoined the King,
only a newer. The new has an early worth,
that for a season outshines all other; but it is
not trusted, nor does it last, as the old. Thou,
Onias, art old wine from the vats of Herod in
Csarea. Thy kinsman, Julian, but the
squeezings
,
rich and rare, of the last vintage. This
minds me  how went the vintage with thee
on the Jordan, Onias?
The presses could scarce do the work, he
replied, the vines made for them. They
bent even to breaking with their heavy
burdens
.
And the vine of vines, continued the
King, that clings round thee  thy fair
daughter, Judith, how fares the damsel?
She is well, briefly answered Onias.
But favors not the royal cause, rejoined
the King.
Only as of old.
Ah, she is fond of dreams like youth,
said Herod; I warrant John Baptist takes her
fancy.  But what, Onias, of John? where
resorts he now?
He is now, replied Onias, in the
wilderness
of Jordan, nigh unto Bethabara; where
many, as I learn, are still gathered to his
Baptism
.
I passed on my way through the village,
but he with his followers was withdrawn into
the deep valleys among the neighboring hills.
So, on these and the like themes we for a
while conversed.
Wholly unexpected as was the appearance of
Onias, I was yet rejoiced to see him. I felt
that I needed some one, to whom to turn for
counsel in the position in which I found
myself
,
and thy brother, although himself almost
a stranger, seemed now and here where I stood
alone, like a parent. When our first interview
with Herod was over, and he had dismissed us
until the hour of supper, it was with a sense of
relief not easy to imagine, that I imparted to
him such of my difficulties and doubts, as
without
treachery to the Tetrarch I was still at
liberty to speak of. I was happy in obtaining
his approval in what I had done and in what I
had promised. He himself I found more than
ever elated with the prospect that was now
opened of immediate and prosperous action.
His fervent and holy zeal rekindled what of
mine had begun to grow cold; so that after
even a brief communion with him I also
was impatient that our affairs should be brought
to a speedy issue.
Herod having constrained us, we have passed
many days within his palace and city; but they
have been days of busy care in the thing which
chiefly concerns us. Messengers have arrived,
and letters from those in the confidence of the
Tetrarch, and have been despatched in return,
whose object is in great part to infuse every
where that leaven, which shall work in the
hearts of those where it hath been deposited,
and from them still spread, till it shall raise all
to one pitch of devotion to God, and the birth
and growth of his kingdom.
In the leisure that has here fallen to my share,
I have traversed the shores of the Dead Sea
in the immediate neighborhood of Machrus,
and surveyed on all sides the wonderful position
of this impregnable Fortress. Nature herself
has made it almost perfect in its security, and
art has more than added what was left
incomplete
.
Nature too has supplied what in a region
so abounding in rock and sand, she generally
denies, copious fountains of water springing up
among the deep fissures. And as if designing
it for the abode of those whom she greatly
favored
,
there wells up not only water, cold and
pure as the springs of Lebanon, but that
which is both hot and medicinal also. Boiling
springs shoot up in many places, and pour over
the rocks into basins below, sometimes natural
and sometimes wrought by art, their healing
waters; to which there resort constantly not
only from Machrus, but from Herodium and
the country round about, multitudes of the
diseased to try their virtues. Everywhere
among these deep and rocky chasms are there
signs of heat, in the waters which thus rise to
the surface as if driven upward by subterranean
forces, and in the smoke which oozes
everywhere
from out the soil  ascending, we may
believe
,
from the flaming caverns where the
ancient
cities of Idolatry lie engulphed, whose
inhabitants, while some are drowned in floods
of water, others are buried in lakes of eternal
fire, ever burning, yet ever unconsumed.
Many being now at Machrus from all parts
of Judea, who are secretly joined with Herod
in his plans, he has given a banquet, to which
those were invited only, to whom he has
declared
himself more fully. This feast was had
not in the banqueting room of which I have
already
spoken, but in one in a less public part of
the palace, within the Fortress, separated by
other buildings and lofty walls from the sight
and hearing of all save those who are specially
permitted to approach.
This room is vast, and of those dark Egyptian
forms, which, notwithstanding their beauty,
do also carry with them a sort of terror,
with which they fail not to impress the
mind of the beholder. So is it seen in the
Temple of Isis, not far from the Forum of
Augustus
,
both in its outward but especially in the
gloomy shapes of its interior decorations. Here
the dark hue of the stone of which the columns
were wrought could scarce be changed to a
cheerful brightness, though the glare of
innumerable
lamps was cast upon them. The
flames of the lamps themselves, the only source
of what was bright, poured forth from the
hissing jaws of fiery serpents; or else in
wreaths played around the sad faces of the
melancholy Sphinx. From the table indeed,
while the eye rested upon it, there shot up a
splendor, which could hardly be borne, from the
polished surface of innumerable vessels of
silver
and gold, from pitchers of glass charged
to the brim with wines of every hue, which
gave back the light again in dazzling
brilliance
as from crystal itself, and from the
VOL. II. 4
robes of the guests gorgeous in their color and
forms, woven of gold or silver thread, and
thickset
with all the Jewelry of the Orient. Herod
himself seemed hardly to belong to the same
race with those around him, so transformed did
he seem by reason of the imperial magnificence
of the shining tissues in which he was arrayed,
and the glittering crown that adorned his head.
Not less too did he seem to differ from others
by the greatness of his bearing, which was
more than that of a man or a king, and by
which those who were present confessed
themselves
awed, or oppressed. There was no rude
clamor or noisy mirth, as is customary when
men assemble to enjoy the hour. The
luxuries
came and went untasted, or eaten sparingly.
They who conversed spoke in tones scarce
audible, not in those of grief, but of deepest
earnestness. We were as a company of persons
too grave from the greatness of the thoughts
that were in each heart, to be seduced to any
wantonness by the enticements of the inviting
board. For each who sat at its side was a Jew
who came there burdened with the care of
his country's deliverance, and knowing that
now the final pledge was to be given and
received
of loyal devotion to her cause, and to
him to whom as chief they had consented to
entrust its conduct. The signs of deep thought
and anxious musing were on the dark faces of
my countrymen  whom but for the mockery,
as it seemed, of their brilliant garments, and
the surrounding glare, one might have taken
for a secret assembly of assassins. The music
too, that poured in upon us its harmonies,
seemed in its wailing notes, or sepulchral tones
to be a strange contradiction to the purpose for
which we were gathered together, and as if
prophesying against us. It was not easy to
shake one's spirit free from the power which
accidents were thus disposed to exercise over it.
Doubts and apprehensions arose out of mere
shadows, at which it was easier to force a smile,
than to dismiss them from the mind.
The feast, I need not say, was therefore
brief. That, the design of which was to give
pleasure alone, was the only thing that gave
discomfort, or pain. For when the attending
servants of the banquet were withdrawn, and
the sound of the music was hushed, and each one
gave utterance to the real feelings that were
within, then indeed a change came over the
countenances of those who sat there. Alone,
and each was gloomy and despondent; but
when we were one, by each sharing the
sentiments
of the other, all were alike cheerful and
confiding. Many, obtaining the ear of the
whole assembly, did not fail to increase the ardor
of those who listened, by the reasons which
they urged for the enterprise at the present
moment
,
and against an increased delay. And
what chance of failure would there be, they
urged, with a chief, whose providence had
supplied, while others had slept, arms and
harness for every Israelite who would use them,
and by his league with the aspiring Sejanus,
had secured the aid of Rome herself in the
work of her own destruction!
But the passions of all were inflamed to the
highest pitch, as Herod himself, when he had
listened in silence to what had been said by
others, arose and defended the cause in which
he had engaged, showed from the Scriptures the
fitness of the time for the deliverance for which
all were looking, related the steps which by
him alone and without concert had been taken,
and laid open before all an exact enumeration
of the stores of every kind of armament he
had heaped together in cities and fortresses,
which he named, described the numbers of
those  principal Jews in every part of
Palestine
who were already bound to him, and
the measures to be adopted for securing the aid
of the Israelites of Rome, and those dwelling
in the other cities of Asia and Europe. What
Jew was there, he asked, whether of Judea,
Galilee, or Pera, or even Samaria, who,
however
Providence might have cast his lot, would
not add of his substance to the treasury of the
Lord; would not clamor to be permitted to put
forth his strength to rescue Jerusalem, the city
of the Great King, from the pollution of the
Gentile. Many times had Jerusalem suffered
from the oppressor; many times had Israel
been beneath the feet of the conqueror; but
never had her captivity been such as now.
For now there were those even, who are
pleased
with their slavery, who cherish this union,
though of dependence, with the mistress of the
earth; who are losing the character of the
Jew in that of the Roman; who, like our
ancestors
of old, are joining themselves to idols.
Who knows not that our very taxes are
gathered
by Jewish hands to be paid into the Gentile's
treasury? In Babylon we mixed not with the
blood of the conqueror, nor joined his rites, nor
followed his customs, nor ever gloried in our
shame. In Egypt we remained a people,
distinct
and peculiar, and as we entered it so we
departed from it, the likeness of the twelve
Patriarchs seen in all the thousands of their
descendants. Now we are falling each day
more and more into the mass of
all-engulphing
Rome; where, like so many other
nations
,
we too shall be swallowed up and lost.
What captivity was ever to be compared with
4 *
this? And what though it was to his own
ancestors
to whom so much as Herod the Great
that this apostacy was to be traced for its
beginning
?
What though he himself had
joined
hand in hand with the great iniquity, what
though the sect among the people that bore his
name was a Roman party, these were but the
more urgent reasons for immediate action,
that before it was too late, and the spirit of the
nation utterly dead, their remaining strength
might be put forth for its salvation. The time
was now come, he was assured as from God
himself, the hour was now arrived, he knew it
by the spirit of prophecy, that the hopes of this
great people were to be fulfilled. The weeks
of Daniel the Prophet were numbered; the
sceptre
had departed from Israel,  Rome wields it
and the lawgiver from between her feet, and the
day when Shiloh should appear had dawned. It
is the event that shall seal the prophecy, the deed
done that shall show the Prophet. Our care
is to redeem Israel. That being done, our
sight will be clear to know her King in her
Redeemer
,
and greet Him as rightful head of a
kingdom
,
who hath saved it; a kingdom of which
there shall be no end, whose boundaries shall
be those of the whole world.
As Herod ceased, and even before he ceased,
loud cries of exultation broke from those who,
as the Tetrarch had spoken, had gathered round
him. Herod, said some, is the Christ
we need. All things show Herod to be the
true Messiah, said others; many times have
we been deceived, but now we are sure.
Israel
redeemed from captivity will show us
who is the Christ. Do not all proofs and
signs point to Herod? If we may not
believe
in him, where shall we look? for the time
is now come, and will soon be past. The
people make their own Messiah; let them join
themselves heartily to Herod, and by him they
will save themselves. These and a thousand
exclamations like them, in a confused murmur,
filled the air.
When it had subsided, and others, and among
them Onias, had declared their faith and their
purposes, and by their ardor had helped still
more to stir the passions and kindle the zeal of
all who were present, and by their arguments
had added to the confidence they were disposed
to place in Herod,  the company separated.
But many times have the same persons again
assembled, that they might make yet more
perfect
the schemes they have taken in hand, and
learn, by information derived from those who
dwell in different and distant parts of the land, the
true state of the Jewish mind in those regions.
When all had thus been done, in which it was
necessary that we should bear a part, we took
our leave of Herod, and departed from Mach
rus.
Such, my mother, have been my fortunes at
Machrus, and thus do I stand towards Herod.
In no long time, if I take upon myself the
charge Herod would impose, will it be my
office to visit Rome. Farewell.
When I look back over the long period of
time that has intervened, to the scenes witnessed
by me at Machrus, and to my intercourse with
the Tetrarch, I can feel no surprise, that I gave
myself to the extent I did, into his hands. As
I recall the image of Herod, there was very
much in his countenance, his demeanor, his
form, his voice, the manner of his speech to
affect the mind of any one coming within the
charmed circle of his influence, especially of a
young man who is easily wrought upon by
whatever partakes of the mysterious. That
was the secret of Herod's power. It was
difficult
,
I should rather say impossible, to
penetrate
him. He ever assumed a new face, and
one day appeared a different person, both in the
aspect of his form and the state of his mind
and the features of his character, from what he
was another; so that when it seemed as if some
progress had been made, to-day, towards
comprehending him, it was found, to-morrow,
to have led to no results that possessed any
value. And in respect of that strange
fascination
,
corresponding to what is ascribed to the
more formidable serpents, by which he drew
those whom he desired into his control, and
compelled them to do his will against their own,
and yet freely, it can only be said, that no
other person of whom I have ever heard, either
through history or otherwise, or have ever
known, can be compared with him. There was
by no means the greatness of soul in him, which,
notwithstanding his atrocities, must be allowed
to have distinguished his father. But there
was often the semblance of it, which it was
not easy to distinguish from the reality.
Subtlety and a mind fertile in expedients were
qualities that particularly marked him. But
above all others, that of which I have already
spoken,  the serpent power was eminently
his. I, in my youth, knew not what it was
that held me. I only knew that there was an
attraction in the man, which, however in some
things and for some reasons I would willingly
resist it, ever obtained the mastery and
prevailed
.
XIV.
I trust
, my mother, that my letter from
Machrus by the worthy hands of our
neighbor
,
the Goldsmith, has been safely received.
It was not until nearly the last day of our
tarrying
there, that, among the crowds coming
and going, my eye caught his familiar
countenance
,
which instantly returned with smiles and
friendly greetings my signs of recognition. His
affairs have greatly prospered, he assured me,
as we conversed at Machrus; inasmuch as, out
of many applicants, he has been chosen by
Herod to work in gold and ivory a gigantic cup
as a gift to Tiberius, and a vase of scarcely
less size or value for Sejanus, both which labors
he has undertaken, and trusts by the manner in
which he shall perform them to transmit his
name with honor to posterity. He will cover
them with histories, commemorating the
principal
events in the life of each of the great
personages
for whom they are designed. Truly he
is an eminent artist; but this appointment of his
is not, as his vanity would persuade him, the
great event of the times. There are some
greater. Nevertheless the little worker in gold
and ivory is an honest man, if vain, and I
doubt not that, as he promised to do, he has
borne my letter safely, and himself placed it in
your hands.
Upon arriving again at the house of Onias,
we were received, as you will believe, with joy
by the solitary Judith,  solitary I say,  for
though there are, as I have already represented,
many members of our wide spread family
beneath
her roof, and under her care, yet are
there none to whom she can turn for that full
companionship which she shares with her
father, and now, though in less degrees, with
myself. But though we relieved her solitude
by our presence, I fear we brought little else to
comfort her; for it was evident that all the
news we imparted of the purposes of Herod
and of our partnership in them was anything
rather than agreeable to her. She could not,
nor did she essay to disguise her grief.
No profiting, my father, I fear me, she
said, can come to Israel by such an
instrument
.
Herod is not he who should reign over
Israel. It is another head we need. Aims he
at anything save his own exaltation? The
people
are every day looking for their king, and
Herod, building upon this fond expectation would
offer them himself! What better would he be
for Israel than his father? Could we think of
Herod the Great as the Christ?
He, my daughter, enslaved us to Rome,
great as he was; Antipas delivers and redeems
us.
And suppose, my father, we were redeemed
and delivered, and sat beneath an independent
prince; I see not how we should be the
gainers
.
How much differs Herod from Tiberius?
With the power I fear he would show the
cruelty
and the lust of Tiberius. Such should
not be the Messiah of Israel. It is a prophet,
mighty in word and in deed, a teacher of
righteousness, a reformer of our manners whom
we want, not less, surely, than a King.
These, Judith, are the notions sown in thy
brain by thy Samaritan mother, (now in
Abraham's
bosom,) and thy Samaritan nurse  a
people  save that God, as in them, hath
appeared
in a few, cursed and reprobate. Reject
they not the Prophets, and through them the
counsels of God? How should they judge
worthily of the Saviour of Israel?
Yet they believe in Moses, and Moses hath
spoken of the Christ.
Moses, my child, knew and spoke but in
part; they who have come later have declared
more fully the purposes of God. Why have
the later prophets come, but to add somewhat
to what was known before? And by them we
know that Messiah shall be King and Prince,
as well as Prophet. Teacher he shall be  but
Prince and Ruler also.
If so, my father, how shall Herod fulfil the
hope of Israel? He may be King and Prince,
but how shall he be Prophet and Instructer?
David, my daughter, was a sinner  but
he was a prophet also. Solomon, the wisest of
men was not the best  and Moses in his anger
slew the Egyptian and hid him in the sand.
Herod is not without spot; but God may
pour into him what of his own wisdom he will,
and when he hath delivered Israel by the power
of his arm, he may also purge and cleanse the
soul, by the healing medicine of his truth.
God shall shine so through him, that he shall
be no longer himself, but shall be called
Immanuel
.
In the works he shall do, and the
words he shall speak, he shall be God with us.
Oh! far rather, my father, would I, that
even John were He. God, we may believe,
will, when he speaks, speak through a holy
mouth. John is holy and wise. The people
revere him.
Be not, my child, so easy to be led astray
by thy fancies, or, the false pretences of
cunning
men. Thou knowest how many since
VOL. II. 5
the time of Archelaus have brought slaughter,
robberies, rebellion, and misery upon our land
through their own wicked ambition. John may
prove but another of these. If from God, he seems
to have no power but such as may be sufficient,
by and by, to inflame the multitude with some
mad expectation of dominion, which after a few
attempts to gain it, will end in confusion and
blood. Whom God shall clothe with his
authority
,
him will he strengthen with his arm,
and the signs of his power shall be manifest.
These are seen already in Herod and in only
him. And throughout the length and breadth
of the land are there those among the chief
men, and in Jerusalem especially, who stand
with their loins girded, and their lamps
burning, waiting for the cry that shall
announce
him to have arisen, that he may enter
into his kingdom. John, in Herod's judgment,
is but a habitation of devils; and so, ere long,
he trusts to prove it upon him.
But no arguings of Onias, nor of thy son, can
prevail to change the fixed mind of Judith.
Nor of her only. For more than ever are the
people drawn towards John with expectations
of they know not what. Great numbers still
flock to his preaching and his baptism, leaving
their homes and their employments; and
although
he does not as yet give any evidence
that he is the person for whom they are waiting,
yet they are persuaded that he will presently
give such evidence, or will, according to his
frequent
declarations, be followed and accompanied
by one in whom all the prophecies of the
Scriptures, and all the wishes of the people
shall find their fulfilment.
Of late the declarations of the Baptist
concerning
another, of whom he is but the
precursor
,
have become the more express and distinct.
The thoughts of those who come to him
are studiously turned from himself to one of
greater power, who is soon to succeed him.
Although John himself cannot intend to mark
out Herod by the mysterious language he uses,
yet it fails not to bring him before the minds
of others, as the only one from whom it seems
possible that help should come. So that
unconsciously he lends strength to our cause.
And we are persuaded, that were Herod's affairs
now so far advanced, that he could at once
present
himself before the nation, as he did before
his few adherents at Machrus, there is no
doubt the people would gather round him with
a zeal, and with numbers and a power that
Pilate would in vain attempt to withstand.
But alas! very much remains to be done ere
such a step can be taken; yet so confident
are many of success under any circumstances
of action, so uneasy under delay, that our chief
danger springs from the possibility of rash and
sudden outbreaks of zeal, before the measures
which we deem essential can be completed.
The greater need of caution exists here from
the so near neighborhood of the Romans in
Beth-Harem, and our frequent intercourse with
Saturninus. But Pilate believing himself to
have no ground of apprehension beyond Onias,
no suspicions attach to the many
communications
which now take place between us and
Herod, and would not were they known to
Saturninus. But they are too well guarded to
become known.
We are, now that the force of the winter is
spent, full of cares. Messengers arrive and
depart
by night, going and coming between
Beth-Harem, Machrus, Tiberias, Sepphoris,
and Jerusalem. Herod's adherents increase
day by day, and our confidence with them.
But as our confidence and hope increase the
disappointment and sorrow of Judith increase
more than in a just proportion to them. She
becomes now even vehement in her expressions
of disapprobation, or detestation I should rather
say, of Herod. All this Onias refers to her
Samaritan nurture, and so leaves it. But in the
heart of Judith God hath planted that, I am
sure, which demands more for its satisfaction
than that which he hath bestowed upon others.
It is not her rearing only that causes the
difference. One needs only to observe her
countenance, or listen to the sounds of her
voice, to know that another and higher sense is
in her; and this especially when she is seen or
heard reciting those parts of the Prophets
which most delight or instruct her, or in
singing
to her harp at the close of a Sabbath day
the sacred hymns of David. Never did the
praise of the Divine Poet so exalt me, or his
strains of penitence and sadness so depress me,
as when borne to my ear on the voice of Judith.
Yet whatever she may draw from the Prophets
and the Law, and whatever she may impart to
others, she feels and confesses dissatisfaction.
Their words reach not high enough, they
descend
not deep enough for the cravings of her
heart. What would she have?
The successes of John, and the language
which he continues to use concerning Herodias,
alarm and enrage the Tetrarch. To-day, a
messenger has arrived bearing letters to both
Onias and myself. Herod thus writes to Onias.
Herod Antipas, Tetrarch, to Onias of
Beth-Harem
.
5*
We hear concerning John, that he still
preaches on the Jordan, and that yet greater
numbers attend him, drawn together in great
part by the violence with which he assaileth
ourself, our power, the priests, the chief men
among the Pharisees, and many others upon a
proper reverence of whom, however, our law
insisteth, and the welfare of the state
dependeth
.
The minds of the people are moreover
turned from us to him. We cannot look to
obtain
a place in their regards where he hath first
entered, nor so long as he is allowed to keep
possession. It is our will therefore, if it also
seem good to you, that he be seized, and
having
been first scourged, be forbidden to baptize
or preach within our realm, and dismissed from
its borders. And if in the malice of his heart
he should remain disobedient, that he be then
sent close prisoner to Machrus. Thus will
the way be made clear of what is now a
hindrance
.
Philip of Iturea joins us; or which avails
as much, standeth neuter.
These will be delivered by the hand of our
faithful Chuza.
It was plain from this epistle of Herod,
that the spies whom he had constantly
employed
had not returned to him an exact
account
of either the doings of the Baptist, or of
the effects which they were producing upon the
people. For nothing could appear more
evident
to Onias and myself, and to others who
were careful to observe narrowly, than that
John was, with however little intention,
preparing
the way quite as much for Herod as for
himself or any other person. In respect to his
charges against the Tetrarch in the matter of
his brother's wife, the populace take but little
thought about them, not knowing how the truth
may stand, and leaving such affairs to be
managed
as it may please the parties concerned.
The laws under which both Jews and
Samaritans
change husband and wife are such, that
acts of divorcement take place continually,
and make but little stir. While therefore they
pay slight regard to what John hath said of
this, they have caught greedily at all that he
hath let drop concerning his follower. His
speech has indeed been ambiguous and obscure;
either with intention so, or because he is an
instrument merely in the hands of a Mightier
Power, and utters oracles, by himself not clearly
understood. No urgency of those who have
pressed about him has availed to make such
declarations more precise. The multitudes
therefore have interpreted his language as their
minds have prompted, and their secret wishes
have directed. Very many, accordingly, have
not doubted, that whatever may have been the
purpose of John, Herod is the person to whom
they are to look. He has thus been set before
the people more and more, and greater
numbers
than before are coming to look upon his
pretensions
with favor. The large sect of the
Herodians is beginning throughout their body
to unite to their attachment to the Herodian
family, and the Roman usages they have
introduced
,
a faith in Antipas as the great restorer,
who, at the same time that he shall restablish
the independence of Judea, shall with a proper
observance of the Law, freely allow the licenses
in which they now indulge, and which they
imagine to be needful to the extending of the
influence of their Law and religion, and the
gaining of proselytes beyond the bounds of
Judea.
Onias, considering these things, thought it
not best that John should either be driven from
the country, or suffer any injury at the hands of
Herod, and wrote thus to the Tetrarch.
In the judgment, said he, of those in
whom thou art wont to put confidence, and to
whom thou hast left the determination of the
present affair, it would not tend to the
furthering
of that which we have in hand, were the
Baptist
driven from these regions, or by the soldiers
seized and scourged. The effects of his labors
redound more to thy interests than even his
own. For while he declares to the foolish
multitudes who surround him, that he is not
himself the Christ  a declaration not in truth
needed to those, who have any discernment at
all in the things of God  he at the same time
saith that he, as Elias, hath preceded him, and
that he shall soon appear. Wherefore it
happens
,
that the people believing him to be a
prophet, and seeking to discover whither he
would direct their thoughts, are in great
numbers
led to thee! For in no other quarter
whatsoever can they behold a ray of light. If
John, they say, be not the Christ, and he doth
no miracle, nor giveth any other sign that he is
that prophet, to whom can they look but to
thee? So that while he intendeth quite
otherwise
,
John buildeth for thee; notwithstanding
that some, who are utterly without eyes or
judgment, he succeedeth in turning against thee.
But for thy brother Philip's wife, Great King,
all Israel were on thy side. May Jehovah
guide, and in due time exalt thee.
Letters in reply to this have been received
from the Tetrarch, showing his acquiescence
in the judgment of Onias, and consenting also,
out of regard to urgent representations, to
relinquish
the further prosecution of his affair
with Herodias. It was only on such consent
on his part that I would agree to serve his
cause. With others also it was made a
condition
of adherence.
Since these things have been determined, a
new vigor has been put into all his followers.
Redoubled efforts are making, and the time
draws instantly on, when what is now hidden
and concealed will be revealed in the plain
light of day.
I am not surprised to learn from thy letters,
that in Rome the same things are to be
observed
among many as here; and I hear the
like also of our people wherever they are
scattered
,
whether in Greece, Egypt, or the farther
East. There is among them all, as letters from
all parts inform us, as well as the reports of
merchants and travellers, one and the same
expectation
.
Within the limits of Judea and
Galilee the thoughts of all orders of people
dwell upon this hope. The appearance, and
much more the prophetic declarations of John,
however dark and ambiguous, which of late
both Onias and myself have heard from him
with our own ears, have helped to impart to it
new ardor, and give it a yet deeper place in the
heart. All this works mightily for us; and I
trust before another moon it will be shown
throughout all the coasts of Israel, that the hope
on which they have fed has been neither
poison nor ashes, but as the very food which
God himself hath provided to nourish the soul,
and be for the salvation of his people. Every
day do the people groan beneath new exactions
of our avaricious conquerors; every day do
they find their liberty abridged more and more,
themselves and their children subject to
cruelties
the most wanton and oppressive. Pilate's
conduct in Csarea, his massacres in Jerusalem,
his slaughter of the Galileans while offering
their sacrifices, and the lesser acts of tyranny
of which none or few hear or know save those
who suffer, have served, together with what
hath taken place on the Jordan, to put fire
into men's bosoms, and to kindle there a new
and fiercer zeal for God, and his Law, and
Judea.
XV.
It
is many days, my mother, since I last
wrote. Strange events and unlooked for have
happened in the mean time to keep me silent,
and attentive only to what was taking place
immediately around us. In the midst of our
enterprises we have been suddenly arrested by
the appearance of another prophet, if prophet
he be, on the banks of the Jordan! Where
there was but one, there are now two; where
there was but John, there are now John and
Jesus, for that is the name of him who has now
joined him. All the region round about us is
in a ferment of curiosity and hope, and so
distracted
are men's minds, that Herod, and all we
who are joined with him, pause at once in our
movements. Every arm must hang lifeless
until what has now occurred shall receive its
interpretation.
The account of these things was first
received
thus.
It became necessary for me, in obedience to
letters received from Herod, to depart for
Tiberias
,
where during the spring and summer
sea-sons
,
as being cooler,  he chiefly resides.
Ziba, having completed our preparations, was
awaiting me at the Portico overlooking the
Jordan
.
As I stood conversing with Judith,
unwilling
to depart while that pleasure could be
prolonged, choosing also that the twilight
should deepen farther into the evening shade
ere I betook myself to the public ways, Onias,
who had been some days absent at Machrus,
suddenly arrived. He had plainly ridden fast
and far, the foam rolled from the animal from
which he sprang, and he himself seemed
disturbed
.
When he had, as always, affectionately
saluted us, he asked, whither I was bound?
I said, to Tiberias.
Since what has happened, he replied, at
Bethabara, it can be of no service.
We asked, of what do you speak? we have
heard nothing.
That is strange, replied Onias.
Beth-Harem
I found stirred throughout. I marvel
that Shammai and Zadok have not already been
here. What I speak of, continued Onias, is
of the appearance of another prophet, or of the
Messiah himself, on the banks of the Jordan, at
Bethabara.
We expressed our astonishment, and besought
him to relate all he had learned.
VOL. II. 6
He came yesterday, resumed Onias, to
John to receive with others his baptism. I had
not yet arrived there. But thus I was told by
those who were there. It was about the ninth
hour of the day when, as John was baptizing
in the stream, his kinsman, Jesus from Nazareth,
came, among others, asking to be baptized also.
They said that as John saw him approaching,
he paused and looked steadfastly upon him with
such sort of reverence in his eyes, as if he had
beheld a person greatly exalted above himself,
yea, even as if he had seen an angel from
Heaven,  and that at first he refused to
baptize
him, as being himself the inferior teacher,
which did not fail to fill John's disciples with
the most extreme astonishment, and not less
all who stood near; for that John is a prophet
sent of God, his followers do not doubt, but
boast themselves continually of his authority,
and do not scruple to say, as they believe, that
he will in the event prove himself the Christ.
That we continually hear, I said.
But what immediately happened, resumed
thy brother, filled all who were present with
greater wonder still. For they affirm that,
when John's unwillingness was overcome by
the earnest request or command of Jesus,
and they had gone into the river, and while
the Baptist poured on the water of
purification
,
a great light suddenly shone on all,
beyond
the brightness of the day, as if from
the opened heavens, and at the same time a
voice, not as the voice of a man, declaring
him the Son of God. This heavenly sign was
but for a moment, and was then withdrawn.
The multitude were filled with both fear and
amazement, and when it had passed, could
hardly
say whether what they had witnessed were
a reality or a dream. But while they
questioned
among themselves, Jesus disappeared from
the midst of them, and has not since been
found.
This is wonderful, my father, indeed, said
Judith. It surely seems as if God were now
visiting us. The long silence seems broken.
First John, and now another. Surely, my
father
,
you will give heed to this.
I have not denied, my child, to John the
praise of a righteous man. I have denied him
as the Christ only. He is truly a man of God.
What hath now happened in Bethabara, fills
me, Judith, not less than thyself, with
astonishment
,
and with hope also. Doubt not that I
shall wait to know what this vision may mean.
My trust is even in God, that he will yet
appear
for his people, and how he shall appear,
by what signs and by what mediator, whether
angel or man, our ignorance cannot say.
Whoever
shall come with the authority of God, him
will I receive. Jesus may be he.
As Onias said these things there was the
sound of approaching steps and voices, and in a
moment Shammai, Zadok, with others of the
synagogue, joined us. They were rejoiced to
find Onias at home.
Now, said Shammai, let us know the
truth, for thou hast been in Bethabara, and, as
we hear in Beth-Harem, wast present at the
baptism. We have come from the city for this
end, to hear thy report and bear it back to the
city.
They were sorry, and greatly surprised to
learn that Onias had not himself been present.
Thus it is, said Zadok, we know not
what nor whom to believe. So of the
appearance
itself, may we well doubt if aught were
seen beyond the light of a hot sun passing out
from behind a cloud, or heard, beyond the
rushing
of the wind among the trees. The story
by this time at Jerusalem speaks, I will warrant,
of the Heavens being on fire, and of legions of
angels descending.
Nay, nay, Zadok, said Onias, not so.
Though I saw not myself, I know those of
Bethabara, who were present and witnessed the
appearance. It was as hath been reported to
you, if an honest man is to be believed, (and
not one only but very many,) who relates what
he saw with his own eyes and heard with his
own ears. They, indeed, who stood remote on
the banks, and were not among such as knew
what was taking place, but were attentive to
other things, said that they heard only a noise,
as of thunder, and saw only a light, as of the
lightning. But they only are to be credited
who stood by.
But what, said Zadok, hath become of
the new prophet?
While the people, replied Onias, were
talking with each other, overwhelmed with
astonishment
and fear, he was seen to depart by
many who were near him towards the
mountains
,
none hindering or following, or so much
as asking whither he would go.
Well, said Shammai, these are strange
things. But what is strange oft vanishes when
more is heard and known.
And sometimes grows, said Judith, to
what is stranger still.
Yes, daughter, he replied, you say true;
so that patient waiting for the full event is the
part of the wise. But, continued the Ruler,
turning to Onias, whence came this Jesus?
you have told us whither he is gone,  for in
Beth-Harem some say one thing, and some
another. One affirms he is from Judea near
6 *
Hebron, because he is a kinsman of John;
others that he is from Bethlehem,  and others
from Galilee.
The last are right, answered Onias, he
is of Galilee.
He were better from some other part of the
land, said Shammai, for his own sake.
He is not only from Galilee, continued
Onias, but from Nazareth in Galilee.
Ha, ha, laughed Zadok, prosperity await
him! A prophet from Nazareth! when a just
man shall be found among the Sadducees, a
holy man among the Essenes, or an honest man
among the publicans, then may a prophet come
from among the Nazarenes. They are truly
the progeny of swine.
It will at least, said Shammai, take
more than a day to win hearers and believers.
That may be, said Judith; yet if he
should perchance overcome such prejudgments,
it would then be so much the more in his
favor
.
Perchance! perchance! cried Zadok,
that was a good word, maiden, to put in.
There is little danger of such victory.
Well, said Judith, with Shammai we
will wait and see.
Yes, child, answered Zadok, we will
wait; and wait we shall, till Jordan runs
backwards
to his springs, ere we shall see a prophet
come out of Galilee.
Do not some affirm, said Judith, that he
is of Bethlehem? Perchance, Zadok, he may
yet be found to be of Judea.
Yea, daughter, perchance.
The rumor concerning the origin at
Bethlehem
comes, said Onias, doubtless from
this, that he was born there at what time his
parents were gone up to the enrolment in the
days of Quirinius; for this Jesus,  unless
indeed
all be false,  is he who was hailed King
of the Jews by the Magians of Arabia, in the
reign of Herod the Great; of whose strange
birth all Israel heard, but afterward heard no
more.
We all remember the tale, said Shammai,
to have been told to us, and some of us,
Zadok
,
can remember through our own hearing.
I number, Shammai, but forty years, and
know nothing thereof.
But where, asked Shammai, has this
youth concealed himself during the years since
the time of his birth?
As I learned at Bethabara, Onias replied,
he hath dwelt in Nazareth, save that at the
feasts he hath ever gone up to Jerusalem,
carefully
observing the Law. But this is affirmed
also, that he is of the family and lineage of
David.
That, said Shammai, will place him above
John in his hopes of a ready reception, for John
could not claim as much. Yet we hear that
the disciples of John contend, that the voice
pointed to their master as the Son of God,
rather than Jesus; the name of neither having
been pronounced.
So, replied Onias, it happened; for
although
John said at the first of himself, that he
was but the herald of one greater, and so
declares
to this day, his followers scruple not to
believe and to declare that he is himself that
greater. And this notwithstanding also the
plainness with which the Baptist hath
announced
Jesus as a Prophet above all, even He
who should come.
Said Zadok, Verily Onias, thy words seem
like one who is ready to believe these things
himself. Hast thou too been baptized in
Jordan
?
Jest not, Zadok, replied thy brother,
with things that may be of God. The times
are full of dread. I am, as thou well knowest,
as you all know, firmly bound to Herod; but
Herod is not God, nor hath God spoken as yet
by him. Wherever and whenever I shall hear,
or believe I hear the voice of God, and behold
the signs that shall show his presence and
power, there shall I be to listen and obey. In
John I have beheld them not, yet is he a man
of God. He is not the hope of Israel, though
the spirit of God may rest upon him. But
what can we yet say of Jesus? If the eyes
and ears of men have not been blinded or
deceived
by the powers of darkness, then hath
the God of our nation spoken. The
multitudes
of Bethabara doubt not that he has. The
heavenly signs were not to be mistaken, they
affirm. Yet, as I judge, we know not enough
in this either to affirm or deny. The power of
invisible spirits, and of the angels who fell we
know not. It may be a delusion of Satan.
Let us wait to see more. We must know him
and hear him. It must reasonably give pause
to us and to all, that Jesus has already
withdrawn
from sight, plunging immediately into
the secret places of the mountain deserts. But,
Zadok, while it may be that God hath
indeed
descended among us, and has at length
revisited his people by the prophet whom
long since he promised, it becometh all his
children to bow in reverence and wait his
will.
Zadok, far from being moved by what Onias
had said with his air of deep sincerity, was
evidently laboring, while he spoke, to suppress
his scorn and contempt. His eye, the while,
was fired with the inward passion, and his lip
curled with derision. He was about to speak,
but Shammai interposed;
Onias, Zadok, is right; and such should be
our teaching at the synagogue. The prophets
have foreshown, that Messiah shall in these
days reveal himself, but they have not said
with what form he shall come, with what signs
he shall be announced, nor how attended. The
thoughts and ways of Jehovah are not as ours.
When he appeared of old to his servant, he
was not in the fire, nor in the whirlwind, but
in the small voice. So if we would be
prudent
shall we say it may be now. The people
look for one coming in the pomp and
circumstance
of a Prince, so that every eye shall
confess
him as there, or there, or here; but perchance
they misjudge the trappings of a true Prince. A
Prince and King he certainly will be; he who
is to come is truly to be the deliverer of Israel;
but where shall be the hiding of his power,
and what the instruments he shall use, and
what the raiment he shall wear, and the ensigns
of his dignity, who may dare to say?
The Ruler hath spoken what is right,
cried many voices of those who were crowded
around, intently listening. Let us wait and
see, exclaimed others. If Jesus is the Son
of David, we shall soon behold him on his
throne; that will show him.
And if he is Beelzebub's minister, as he
seemeth, by this seeking the desert places, we
shall see him no more; he hath already gone
back to his master; cried Zadok's shrieking
voice.
With these words and other discourse which
followed, Shammai, Zadok, and those who had
accompanied them, took leave and departed to
the city.
Thus, my mother, are we, as I have said,
already arrested in our affairs. As the thoughts
of all are swallowed up by the strangeness of
these events, and are not to be diverted from
them, we are compelled to give way and remain
inactive  so far we are determined in our
course by the events and circumstances
themselves
.
Obeying, therefore, the counsel of
Onias, and the necessity of things also, I went
not to Tiberias, but despatched Ziba instead
bearing letters to Herod.
I send this, my mother, at the moment I
have written it, that you may receive early
knowledge of the wonderful things that have
happened.
XVI.
The
day following that on which I last
wrote, I sought the streets of Beth-Harem,
both that I might learn what more there was
to be known concerning Jesus, and that I might
visit again the leper and his daughter, whom I
had seen before my journey to Machrus, but
whom since that period I had committed to the
care of Judith. Of their welfare she has often
assured me; for though she herself, partaking
of the common feelings of the people
concerning
the disease, has seen them but once, yet
has she bestowed upon them many gifts and
kindnesses through her servants.
It was not difficult to perceive on the way to
the city, but especially in the streets
whichever
way one turned, that some events had
occurred, by which the minds of the people
were much disturbed. They were everywhere
gathered together conversing with earnestness,
and either inquiring for news or imparting it.
At the market place I found not only those,
who are accustomed to pass there the greater
portion of the time, which they know not
otherwise
how to rid themselves of, but many others
of the chief persons of the city and neighboring
country. John and Jesus were the names upon
the lips of all. I approached one who sold
fruits, with whom several were conversing.
As I tasted his grapes, some of which I
desired
to purchase for the leper and his daughter,
and listened to those who were talking, the
countryman addressed me, saying, what think
you, Sir; shall we hear anything more of this
Jesus of Bethabara?
I said that I could have no opinion worth
repeating
,
as I had heard so little; nor indeed
could any, as so little had been seen or was
known of him.
Not much, in truth, he replied, is known
of Jesus; but of John much is known, and he
has borne his testimony to Jesus; and if any
one should be believed, surely it is John, whom
all who know, know to be honest.
I said I had never heard John nor seen him;
but the reports, that had been brought to me,
were in his favor. But how should he know
anything of Jesus?
How, said one who stood by, should a
prophet know anything, but by the power of
God?
But how, I asked, willing to know their
VOL. II. 7
opinion, do men know John to be a prophet,
he has wrought no miracle that I have heard.
That is very true, replied the countryman,
but did he not constantly prophesy of the
coming
of one after him, whom the people knew
nothing of, but who would one day reveal
himself
;
and has he not now come? He is surely
shown to be a prophet, for his prophecy has
come to pass.
If, as you judge, he prophesied the coming
of the Messiah, I replied, is it not too early
to say that the prophecy is fulfilled? since we
know not as yet, that Jesus is he, and surely
the manner of his appearing makes not much
for him.
I do not know, replied the other, why
we should look for everything at once. He
indeed appears as other men, so we are told,
but what say you to the voice, and the heavens
opened? Are not these somewhat?
If those things, I answered, indeed
happened
as has been related, they do truly declare
that God is with Jesus or John, whichever was
pointed out by the voice, but surely they make
neither to be the Messiah.
That, indeed, is true as you say, rejoined
the other, but then to one who is ready to
believe, it makes it so likely, that it seems to be
almost or quite enough of itself.
Ah! you foolish people, cried Zadok's
voice from behind me, stand ready to believe
everything. If one were to hearken to you,
Christ comes every day. For no sooner doth a
man look or speak differently from others, than
behold you cry out, Here is Christ! Verily
ye will yet be the cause, that the Romans will
suck us dry as the Jordan in the month Ab,
and grind us to powder, fine as dust of Arabia.
It is a pity that for the sake of Judea your
mouth could not be stopped and your hands
tied.
That they would be, I am sure, rejoined
the other nothing daunted, if you scribes had
the power you wish you had. But happily you
have it not. Had you dared, John had long
ago been put out of the way; but while the
people are for him, it is more than you dare
attempt, even with Herod on your side.
Whether we dare or not, cried Zadok,
already inflamed with passion, you shall see
betimes. John's days, mark me, my young
rustic
,
John's days are already numbered! and so
would I say are those of Jesus, but that he has
already betaken himself back again to his
master
.
What can you look for from such as these?
Idiots, fools, asses, that ye all are. And he
turned away in a rage.
There 's a Pharisee, for you! There 's a
ruler of a synagogue!  there 's a man of the
Law for you, cried the countryman. It is
much more likely such as he, thick enough
here, but thicker yet as we hear in Jerusalem,
will themselves bring the country to nought.
If Christ came in the very form of God, would
they not believe him, if in their conceit he
ought not so to have come. Though the heart
were soft as a ripe fig, it were better than to be
as hard as a mill-stone.  These, Sir, not those,
are my best grapes. Try these.  But we
spoke just now of John. I have seen him and
heard him many a time in the villages just
above here, and to see him and to hear him is
to believe him trustworthy. The marks of
honesty are in his face and voice.
But, said I, so strange in his appearance,
that many scruple not to say that he is
possessed
.
It is said, rejoined the other, by those
who wish him ill. He is but like other country
folks  save in his wisdom which is that of a
Prophet. They will say some just such thing
of Jesus, I warrant you, should he prove what
we hope. But they will truly both fare ill, if
Zadok and such as he become inflamed against
them. They say already, that he has done
much to set Herod against John, reporting
carefully
whatever he says against either him, or
Herodias. But the counsels of such a man
cannot prevail. God will coufound them.
All the Pharisees, I said, are not like
Zadok.
Most are, interrupted the other.
It may be so, I answered, for I am but
lately come into Judea; but all are not like
him. Onias, whom doubtless thou knowest is
willing to wait and see. Shammai
Shammai, responded the other, is a
Sadducee
.
I do not think so, I answered, though
many so report him.
It matters little what he is, replied the
seller of fruit, whether Sadducee or Pharisee,
he is something better than either, a good and
a just and a kind-hearted man. He would let
every man have his way, provided he would
injure no one. But for these others, if you so
much as choke a little at swallowing down
whole all they swallow with throats they have
spent their lives in stretching, you are out of
the synagogue, or up before the council ere your
eye can wink.
I would willingly have talked longer with
this man, but that purchasers, happily for him,
thickened about him, so that I was compelled
to turn away. In all parts of the Market Place
and in the neighborhood of the synagogue from
7*
which those were just coming, who  as with
us  had been present at the morning prayers,
I found the same topics in the mouths of all.
None, so far as I could learn, save a few violent
as Zadok, were disposed to deny the reality of
the voice and the heavenly light at the
Baptism
of Jesus; and few, putting together with
that, what was now generally received, that
Jesus is the same whose birth was marked by
the like prodigies many years ago, hesitate to
believe
that he is indeed the promised and
expected
Deliverer. Many are so wrought upon, that
language does not suffice to convey their
confident
belief, but they give expression to it
by loud and passionate cries, by gestures, and
by a countenance which in every feature utters
the sentiments of the heart. The children in
the streets have also caught the joy from the
elders, and cry out in their shrill voices, Christ
is come! Christ is come! His concealment
since the baptism they explain some one way
and some another, but it hinders not the current
of their joy. They doubt not he will soon
reappear
and show himself more fully. The
news having been carried already not only into
all the country round about Bethabara and the
Jordan, but even to Jerusalem, great numbers
have flocked together to learn the tidings in the
very neighborhood of the places, that have
become
so signalized, or at least where, as in
Beth-Harem
,
many may be met, who have seen or
conversed at least with some who were present
at the baptism, and witnessed the wonder.
Every eye seemed to glisten with joy, every
mouth was full and overflowing with words of
congratulation and hope. Christ is come!
Christ is come! fell upon the ear at every
turn.
As I parted from these crowds and was
passing
by the great gates of the citadel, I
encountered
Saturninus. Saluting each other, at his
invitation I entered his quarters. As the gates
unfolded and I passed beneath the arched way,
leading to the inner square, the clash of arms
fell upon my ear, and the voices of those who
issued commands.
It is but the soldiers at their exercise, said
the Centurion, a sight and sounds that must
be familiar to you as a Roman.
I said that often, even from my youth, had I
taken delight in witnessing at the Prtorian
Camp the exercises of the soldiers, and then
used to lament that nature had made me not a
Roman, but a Jew, whereby I was shut out
from what seemed to me the chief avenue to
glory.
Thy birth did not hinder thee from
serving
,
said Saturninus. The camp opens
its arms to all who will swear fealty to Rome.
That, I answered, neither my mother
nor in truth, my father, would suffer me to do;
and when early youth was past  that, I would
not do myself. I loved Rome and Roman ways,
but still I remembered I was a Jew. Now I
think every way differently.  But for thyself,
Saturninus, having so many times rioted in the
field of battle, this must be a wearisome task,
set here in the heart of Asia to watch mutinous
Jews. Time must move with leaden wings.
Many things prevent that, he replied. I
no longer love war for its own sake, as I am
obliged to say I once did. I willingly greet the
quietness and repose I find here. And to speak
the honest truth I love your people. Of late
years I have studied philosophy more than the
science and art of war; I oftener when liberty
is mine take up a book, than the sword; I
converse
with those who give proof that they
have souls and desires, rather than with those
who only seem as if they were a clod of
earth, a little more animated than what lies
wholly dead, and the ploughshare turns over.
I find among this people curious subjects of
inquiry, singular specimens of our race, and a
deeper love of thoughts which go beyond the
confines of the senses, higher or deeper, than
among any other I have known. Especially
have I been instructed by reading your sacred
books, where I have found a religion worthy
altogether, or almost, of both the great God and
of man his creature. So that with such tastes,
and inclinations, Julian, thou seest I am not
likely to pass the time heavily. Beside these
things I need not to thee speak of the house of
Onias.
Thou needest not. The sun ever shines in
the dwelling of Onias. And to dwell in
sunlight
is all we can ask.  But say, how long
doth Pilate continue your guard in Beth-Harem?
Is he still apprehensive that the Jew Julian will
raise new disturbances?
Saturninus laughed. It is little, I believe,
that he fears, said he, either from thee or
Onias. But I need not, or ought not to say,
why he occupies Beth-Harem.
Let me, I said, draw no secret from an
enemy.
Whatever brought me here however,
resumed
the Centurion, there seems of late to be
growing up reasons enough for my remaining;
and so, I suppose, must I report to Pilate.
And what are these new reasons? I asked,
if they be not also of a secret nature.
Oh no; he answered, these I may
communicate
.
They have existed but for a few
days.  It seems from all I can learn that some
long-expected person, whom they call Christ,
has made his appearance on the Jordan, from
whom great actions are looked for, such as the
rescue of Judea from Rome, and the like. So
I hear at least on every side. Ominous and
threatening words are thrown out as I pass along,
or as the people look on the soldiers at their
exercises
.
The young urchins, who are thickest
about our tents, have caught the song and cry
out, `Take care, Romans, Christ is come.'
`Now for Israel, down with the Romans.'
What the true sense is I know not. I take no
other note of it than to hear the words, and
ponder them.
I only said in reply, that I knew well
whereof
he spoke, but that truth in the matter was
difficult of access on account of the contradictory
nature of the rumors which were abroad, as
well as many groundless superstitions cherished
by the lower orders of the people.
Saturninus now led me from where we had
sat into the midst of the soldiers whom I
beheld
,
some shooting with the arrow at a mark,
others throwing the lance, others attacking and
defending with shield and sword, and others
exercising with the gloves of the gladiator, so
bringing into the most complete and violent
action every part of the body. When I had
sufficiently surveyed these, and had enjoyed
further conversation with the centurion, I left
the citadel and bent my steps toward the
dwelling
of the leper.
I soon reached the place, which seemed to
me even more desolate and wretched than when
I first saw it. It had the appearance of the
ruins of extensive prisons, which had been
destroyed by assault or by fire; the remains
of which were permitted to stand as they had
been left by the fiery element or by war,
serving
as a shelter for domestic animals of every
kind, from the occasional violence of the
weather
,
and in its better apartments, as a home for
some poor outcasts, such as the leper and his
daughter. As I stood at the entrance a
moment
,
considering the hard fate of those who
were compelled to seek the protection of so
gloomy and comfortless a dwelling, one joined
me, who seemed from his wretched garments
and neglected aspect, as if he too was of its
inhabitants. He bore the marks of extreme
poverty, but not of the misery that commonly
accompanies it; nor was he afflicted by disease,
unless that may be called disease which follows
the use of such drinks as cause drunkenness,
and leaves its marks in the eye, and on the
skin. But save this he was of a cheerful look,
and seemed from his gait and manner as if he
were rather a prince, or a princely merchant,
than a beggar. He saluted me with great
courtesy, and asked to join my company.
Observing
,
he said, that I was a stranger to this
part of Beth-Harem, he would give me such
information as I appeared to be ignorant of
concerning
the ruins.
I said that I was truly a stranger and should
value all he could tell me.
He then went on to relate the fortunes of
the building from its origin, down to the wars
of Antiochus and the Maccabees, when it was
destroyed by the soldiers of the king, and from
that time had been suffered to stand as we now
beheld it; and so strongly had it been built at
first, that the elements passed over it without
removing so much as a stone. It now, he
ended with saying, has become the happy
residence of some such as himself raised by
fortune above the wants of life.
I said that on the contrary he seemed to me
to be a person subject to some of its sharpest
wants.
The eye, said he, is a great deceiver; it
sees not far. There are those who seem as Princes
in Beth-Harem, who are nevertheless slaves;
and those who shine in gold who are beggars,
while I am free of all men, and have, seeming
to possess nothing, more than I can use.
Having
no possessions and few wants or none, I
have no cares. The day is mine from the first
hour to the last, to pass it as I may, not fearing
the demand of any upon either my time or my
labor. In truth I know not labor, and of time
I take no account, but as it brings about the
seasons of eating, drinking, and sleeping. Who
then in Beth-Harem so happy as I? I have
but to speak a word, and my wants, such as they
are, are supplied. God watcheth over the earth,
and the people of Beth-Harem over me.
Yet your dwelling is miserable, said I,
and your garments are but filthy rags; a
little
labor would provide better things than
these.
My garments, he replied, are indeed but
rags; but then they cover me, and they cost
me no care. Why should I be anxious for
more? And for my dwelling, come and see
it.
I said that I would trust to his word. I had
come to see the leper and his daughter. I would
now enter and seek for them.
Ah, said he, you speak of the merchant
of Tyre; he is not now in his apartment. He
is abroad enjoying the city. He will return at
the sixth hour. Meanwhile come and see how
the better sort of the inhabitants of
Beth-Harem
dwell.
So saying he led the way into the buildings,
I following. He passed through dark and
ruined
VOL. II. 8
arches, and desolate and uninhabited
apartments
,
out of which, as their den,
half-famished
dogs fled howling at our approach. Into
these arched ways and rooms light sometimes
came through the broken roof, or narrow chinks
in the walls defended and half obscured by
bars of iron. We soon stopped at the door of
a room, like others we had passed through, and
then entered.
This, said my guide, is my home. This
straw is my bed, and, as you see, it is all I
have. I need no more. The High-Priest at
Jerusalem tastes not such sleep as I. The
world is troubled about Pilate and Herod, Jesus
and John; but it all passes by me as the air
which I cannot hear or see.
As he spoke, I heard not far from us the
clank of chains, and the voice, low and
wailing
,
as of one who sang, or wept and
complained
.
I asked its meaning. He said it is one
who is beside himself, and held in bondage for
both his own and others' safety. Let us go to
him. Devils possess him wholly.
We went in the direction of the sound.
We found the room of the possessed person
much like the others I had seen, of solid stone,
dropping with moisture. A little light streamed
in from a small opening, and fell upon the spot
where he sat. It showed him to us bound hand
and foot with strong chains to the wall against
which he leaned. He was naked, but as if
revisited suddenly by a dim recollection of
former
days, he drew together the straw about
him as he beheld us approaching, and held
down his head. The long matted hair fell
over it, and wholly concealed him from our
view. Presently he raised his head by stealth
and gazed upon us, and then spoke in a low
tone and as if afraid, saying, who are you and
why do you come here?
That, said my companion, was himself
that spoke; so his own voice ever is, low and
sorrowful.
If you can help me, said the possessed
again, help me now, quick, while the
keepers
are gone. They will be back anon, and
then you can do nothing. Wonderful it is,
how you stand still, your hands playing with
your robe, and help me not! why do you who
are a Jew wear a Roman dress? but come,
hasten and set me free. Do I not tell you my
masters will soon be back  oh fools and satans
they are coming  I hear them  saying
which he trembled and sunk his head again
upon his bosom clasping over it his chained
hands.
In a moment more, and his hands fell from
over his head, he looked fiercely up as if he
had suddenly changed to another person, his
voice became shrill and wild, as he laughed
loud and said,
Art thou Uzzi? Canst thou do more than
Pharez? never believe it. Thou canst never
drive us out. Here we are and here we mean
to dwell; it is a good dwelling and we will
not leave it. Pharez has tried all his art, but
thou seest we are yet here  we are three, he
is one. Our master too is on our side; what
canst thou do? Let us alone and begone.
Nay, nay, said he after a long pause, in his
other voice, and as if afraid of being overheard,
do not go, stay awhile, and they will all be
gone, and then you can help me; and for all you
do for me I can enrich you more than your
hearts can conceive, for  I tell it to you as a
secret  I know where all the treasures of
Solomon are hid, and you shall share them. In
truth, he whispered, I am his son.
We cannot help you, said my companion,
neither can Pharez or Uzzi, but Christ you know
is come, and it will be his business to
overthrow
the kingdom of devils; he will drive them
out.
Christ! Christ! shrieked the possessed,
he is not come; and if he were we fear him
not. Our master is as strong as he. This body
is our house, and neither John nor Jesus can
shut us out. Here we reign and here shall do
as we will  Ah help me now, cried the
miserable man, in his low and alarmed tones,
they are about to torment me. Now they
thrust their fangs into my vitals and tear
them. Saying this he cried out as if in
torment, his body was convulsed throughout,
and he fell down among his chains and straw
as one dead.
Now he is at his ease, said my conductor,
therefore let us leave him. He will lie so for
many hours, as if he were indeed dead, save
that his limbs continue thus wrenched and
awry, and that his mouth foams. But when he
awakes he evermore avers that he hath only
slept. So that we are much alike, he and I.
He eats, drinks, and sleeps, and so do I. We
differ but in this, that his food is brought to him,
while I must needs seek mine over Beth-Harem.
We are alike in life; and death is the same to
all.  Now I hear the merchant in his apartment.
Let us seek him.
I found the merchant, as my new companion
chose to call him, in the same place as before,
but made a greatly more comfortable residence
by the kind offices of Judith. The leper and
his daughter were rejoiced to see me again, and
were loud in their expression of thanks for
what through me had been bestowed upon
them.
8*
My little Ruth, said the leper, has not
ceased to speak your praises and those of the
good daughter of Onias. The poor child will
never hear her own praises, I fear, save from
me alone. Ruth seemed troubled that her
father had spoken thus, and turned away her
face. I said that, they who were conscious
of doing what God enjoins can spare the praises
of man.
The girl looked again towards me, and
expressed
pleasure in her beaming eyes.
I then said to the leper that I had, on my late
journey to Machrus, seen those whom I
supposed
to be his brother and his family, and gave
an account of what had happened.
He said, he supposed that I had indeed seen
them, for the place agreed with what he had
been told. But for him, alas! but for him my
Ruth would have been as a princess of Tyre.
Who among her thousand merchants could
count so many ships as I? Who was so
observed
in the streets and in the market and in
the synagogue? Whose wealth poured in in
so many streams with channels so deep? All
men honored me, and the foundations of my
prosperity seemed deep as the roots of Lebanon.
In one night it all vanished as a dream, and my
Ruth is all that is left; yet she is worth more
than all.
Speak not thus, my father, said the girl,
nor ever think of Tyre. God hath smitten
us and afflicted us, but the smiling of
prosperity
might have been worse. David saith that
afflictions are good. This I know, that if it be
to them that we owe our present peace, then
are they not evil  not worst. If one might
have prosperity and peace there with, that
indeed
were better. But if they must needs be
divided then to us has fallen the better part.
True, my child, and what we now have
we cannot, as riches, lose, and so our
happiness
is secure.
The fear of God may depart from us, said
Ruth.
Then, indeed, said the parent, all were
lost! But it will not; from thee it cannot
depart
,
from me it shall not. I may depart, but
while I have my breath I will fear God and
serve him. Yet but for thee my daughter, I
would I were in Abraham's bosom. Why do
I live?
The girl wept. The father continued,
Yet who would defend thee from the rude
and the wicked, were I away? I must not die,
Ruth. It is hard either way. I would die and
I would not. I would live and I would not.
While I talk thus, do I not seem to forget the
providence of God? It matters not, it matters
not, my child, whether I live or die. God will
shield thee. None can withstand him. Thou
wilt be safe putting thy trust in him.
The old man seemed to have forgotten that
any one was present beside themselves; while
therefore the girl continued weeping, I said,
that the providence of God was in truth always
sufficient, and that they who put their trust in
it would never be forsaken, they would have
that peace which surpassed all other blessings.
But his daughter should not want also for
earthly
friends. While I lived and the daughter of
Onias, she should be cared for, and defended,
nor should the shadow of an evil fall on her,
which human force could turn aside.
Now the Lord bless thee, cried the leper,
and give thee peace; it was but this I wanted.
Now, O Lord, even now, would I be at rest.
As thy righteous servant Job, by reason of his
sore distresses desired death rather than life, so
too does thy servant before thee; mine eyes are
darkened, my skin is foul and horrid to the
sight, my feet are eaten away; and of him, who
was once as a shaft of polished marble, nothing
now remaineth but a loathsome and
dismembered
trunk. When the morning comes, I say
would to God it were evening, and when it is
evening, I say would to God it were morning.
Day and night they are both alike to me, and
both are vanity. Why should I live?
Do I love thee less, my father, cried his
daughter, beautiful in her tears, that thy skin
is rough and thy eyes and feet are gone. It is
thee I love, not thy limbs; and were it that thy
prayer were answered, where should I go, and
whom on earth should I love? I know, alas,
thy memory goes back to other and better days;
but I have known thee only as now, and only
thee. Pray not for death, or, else that I may
die with thee.
Again the young girl was overcome by her
grief.
My companion, who had hitherto remained
silent, now spoke.
Lose not thy courage, my old neighbor,
said he; thy lot is not dark as thou
thinkest
.
I complain not of life, nor of death, of
God, nor of man. Yet how do we greatly
differ? I have eyes, indeed, but I use them
not. I have feet but they serve me not, save
to move me hence to the market place and
thence back again. I have a skin, not
beautiful
,
not either indeed scaly with leprosy, yet it
profits me not. Who loves me the better for
the things in which I surpass thee? Who
loves Zadok, the Pharisee, though of limbs and
senses he wanteth not one? Would thy young
daughter exchange thee for Zadok? What
profit is there in that which profiteth not?
Thy rest is better for thyself and the world
than another man's motion; thy blindness than
another man's sight, thy ugliness than another's
beauty, thy poverty than another's wealth.
Riches and beauty do but corrupt, and labor
does but weary. I am happier than any man
in Beth-Harem, save mayhap, the wise
Shammai
.
But thou shouldst be happy as I. Thy
daughter should be to thee as a sun to warm
thee, and a light shining deeper than thine
eyes, even on thy heart.
With these words he waved his rags with a
majestic movement, and looked toward me for
applause with a countenance in which jest and
seriousness seemed strangely contending. His
speech brought a smile on the faces of the
unhappy
leper and his daughter, and though they
might little agree with what he had said, it had
the good effect of changing the current of their
thoughts and lightening their sorrow.
Whatever thanks, said the leper, we
may owe to the people of Beth-Harem, who
remember the poor and feed them with bread,
we owe none more than this our friend and
neighbor, who many a time hath not only
divided his loaf with us, but much more
always
cheers our sorrows by his merry voice,
and by his sayings, which if they agree not
always with Moses and the Prophets, show
themselves true by causing the hearers either
to laugh or weep. Had death
Talk no longer, cried the beggar, of
dying. These are the days to live. Who
knows upon whom the honors of the new
kingdom may fall? Under King John or King
Jesus, I may rise to power, and when I do, thou
shalt. I will not forget old friends in my new
glory.
Being interrupted here by a wild and piercing
shriek from the room of the possessed man, the
beggar hastily withdrew, saying that he must
look to the wants and welfare of his other
neighbor, for that after his long sleep he
needeth
both food and drink.
I also took leave of the leper and his
daughter
,
after having again given them every needed
promise, that I would not forsake them, and
that in Judith, Ruth should ever find one who
would protect her. The old man, by such
repeated
assurances, was made to forget the evils
of his lot in the benefits which he could still
enumerate, and returned to that contentment of
spirit, which his daughter assures me is the
usual condition of his mind.
Returning again through the midst of the
city, I found the people still anxious and
inquisitive
as before concerning the reports from
Bethabara. Nothing more, however, could I
learn in which trust could be placed, save that
by those who this day had come from thence
had confirmed what was said at first by Onias,
that Jesus had disappeared among the fastnesses
of the wilderness to the east of the Jordan, and
had been seen by none since the baptism.
When I again saw Judith, and had related to
her my conversation with the inhabitants of the
Old Prisons, she said, that a dwelling which
she had caused to be prepared for the leper
was now ready, to which he might soon
be removed. Although the apartment they
now occupied had been made more secure
than before, against the elements, by the
labors of those whom Judith had employed,
and had become a more agreeable residence
than any other part of the ruins, still I was
glad to learn that another and better was
procured
,
and no time was lost in removing them
from the one to the other. The beggar I
hoped
would take possession of the room which
the Tyrian merchant had abandoned, but he
could not be persuaded to do so much as only
to change the direction of his steps to reach it.
It were undergoing, he thought, needless labor.
Besides, said he, why should I change that
with which I am already satisfied, for another
thing with which, truly, you and others may
be better pleased, but which has no new charms
for me. I have but three wants, food, drink,
and a place where I may lie and sleep. Food
is food, drink is drink, and sleep is sleep. I see
not why I were better to take my lettuce and
figs from a silver dish, my wine from a golden
cup, my sleep on a silken couch  the nature
of the fig, the wine, and of sleep is still the
same. It asks none of these additions for the
poor man to receive both pleasure and nutriment
from his food and his repose. In this God is
seen to be merciful and equal. Good wine
tastes no better to Herod than to a beggar, and
honey is not sweeter to Pilate than to me. The
life here, moreover, being thus alike to each,
dost thou judge that Herod will find more favor
in the life to come than the Beggar of
Beth-Harem
?
Verily, I should stand forth boldly
at his side in the day of judgment, nay,
betwixt
him and Pilate, nor be afraid.
So that he cleaves to his straw, his wet
and dripping walls, his wretched den, into
which, through the cavities where doors and
windows once were, dogs enter to sleep by
his side, or to devour the food they have
stolen, causing oftentimes the vacant halls and
winding passages to resound with their
frightful
howlings as they pursue each other, and
VOL. II. 9
fight for the morsel which is to save those who
conquer from death, or griping hunger.
Judith now often resorts to the dwelling of
the leper, where she beholds its tenants
enjoying
greatly every addition that has been
made to their comfort. In Ruth she discovers
one in whom a spirit dwells of so much native
excellence, that none of the base conditions
of extreme poverty and adversity have had
power to bring any stain upon it. Her father's
judgment of her she finds to be true when he
said, that she was too pure for the touch of
leprosy to harm her. On such occasions I often
accompany her, and beneath this roof of poverty
have I passed many of the most agreeable hours,
and most instructive also, since I have dwelt in
these regions. For the leper, now that he is at
rest, sitting beneath a roof which is secured to
him, his daughter rescued from the dangers that
had ever hitherto surrounded her, returns to the
feelings and thoughts of his earlier life, and
shows himself not only a devout lover of the
Law and worshipper of God, but a man who
has known much of the ways of the world,
whose mind has drawn knowledge from many
quarters, and in his adversities has possessed
power to retain what he had gained, if not to
increase its stores. His conversation is that of
one both devout and wise, and his daughter,
who possesses from nature larger and better gifts
than the father, and has received in addition,
all that he could teach,  for all his happiness
these many years has come from the
instruction
,
which by conversation he could thus
impart
proves also a new source of pleasure,
not to Judith only, but to Onias and myself
also. Happier circumstances, the society of
those who are her equals, comparative plenty,
with friendship, have daily called out new
expressions
on her countenance, and shown new
beauties and graces of mind and heart, by
which we have been astonished and delighted.
She has already become more necessary to our
happiness than we are to hers.
Nothing in addition for many days has been
heard of Jesus, and the people grow
despondent
.
Many will not believe that anything like
what has been asserted has happened. But
while the eyes and ears of men are as they
were made, and devils do not enter us to
pervert
what the senses would convey, then
doubtless
,
they say, that took place which has been
affirmed, whether or not Jesus is heard of
again. Surely, never was there a time when a
whole people were thus waiting to receive with
acclamations of welcome a promised deliverer,
which of itself seems to show, that if God be
about to send forth a prophet, he will now
appear
,
or having appeared he will return. All
are ready to bear him up, and on, to every honor.
Every heart is beating with hope, every hand
waits but the word to grasp the sword or the
spear. I cannot doubt that whatsoever may be
the reason of his tarrying, the delay will not be
long. Peace be with thee.
While Jesus, for reasons which then were
not understood, but which have since been
declared, thus withdrew himself from the scene
where he had first made himself known,
and from the great length of the time, during
which he remained hidden from the eyes and
the knowledge of the people, it was believed by
many that he would not return, Herod again
deemed it a favorable time to continue the
preparations he had made, and strengthen his
cause among the people. No letters can I
discover
written during this period, but my
recollection
of those days is distinct of much
intercourse
with Herod by letters, by messengers,
and by visits at Machrus. The Tetrarch was
sure that no more would ever be heard of Jesus;
and although he would not with clearness
declare
all that he had done, yet he darkly
shadowed
forth in obscure phrases, which he loves
to use, that an emissary from him had sought
and found Jesus during his retreat into the
wilderness, and had become convinced that he
was not what he was at first believed to be, and
that nothing need be feared or hoped from him.
The proffer of honor and wealth and power,
even to that of half the kingdom, nay, the
supreme
power, which was freely made if he
would join with Herod,  made in the belief
that he was a prophet and endowed with
powers
more than human,  he would not accept;
and doubtless because he did not in truth
possess
such powers, for upon being earnestly
pressed to give some proof thereof, he complied
not, but steadfastly refused. Had he in truth
possessed them, Herod was sure that he would
have given some token; for no one who came
to fill the office of Messiah would spurn the
offers which he had made, since they were
those of a strict alliance with him for a
prosecution
of the self-same ends and objects, which
he as the deliverer must have had in view.
These reasonings of Herod, however,
especially
taken together with the fact, that a
messenger
of his had found Jesus and conversed
with him, only served to convince Onias and
the rest of his firmest adherents, that it were
wiser to delay the contemplated movements yet
9 *
a little longer. His inquiries had settled what
before all were doubtful about, namely, that
Jesus was still alive and not very remote. It
was clear that none would consent to resume
their undertaking until he had been again seen,
and his character and purposes determined.
The Tetrarch was irritated by such
opposition
.
He was confident in his own strength,
and impatient of restraint and delay. But by
much persuasion he was made to renounce all
farther purpose of action, till the minds of the
people should be quieted by the confirmation or
defeat of their hopes.
XVII.
At
length, my mother, after long waiting,
and when the people had nearly abandoned all
hope of what they desired, Jesus hath again
appeared, not as before on the Jordan but far
from us, in Galilee. At the same time that this
news has been brought to our ears, we are told
also of astonishing miracles which he has
wrought in the towns and villages of that
quarter. How shall I describe the amazement
and joy that fill the minds of all! Every day
and every hour are reports brought to our ears
of new wonders he has done, and every day
and hour doth the joy of the people rise higher
and higher. No one doubts now that God has
indeed visited his people. Great numbers not
patient enough to wait for the time when Jesus
shall visit other parts of the country, and
doubtless
among others, the valley of the Jordan,
have flocked to Galilee that they may at once
remove their doubts, or invigorate their faith by
themselves seeing and hearing the new prophet.
All Beth-Harem is astir, and the synagogues, the
streets, and housetops resound with the praises
of the worshippers, giving thanks for the great
redemption
that has drawn nigh. All Jerusalem
also, so we hear, not less than the parts about us
is moved, and multitudes have already resorted
to Capernaum, and the shores of the lake of
Galilee. We remain, for many reasons, on the
banks of the Jordan,  satisfied with the
knowledge
which we continually receive from such
as are arriving and departing, and on whose
truth and exactness we know that we can rely.
All that has reached us of the character and
conduct of this prophet shows that, in respect of
wisdom and a holy life, he is well worthy to be
a messenger of God. But what his purposes
truly are, we cannot pretend as yet to determine.
I say that we cannot. For ourselves, who have
so espoused the cause of Herod, we cannot
hastily nor without the strongest reasons
abandon
it for another. To him, who should appear
and afford proof sufficient by the signs he gave
that he was the Messiah of God, should we
without hesitation or delay transfer ourselves.
But no such signs have as yet been given. In
the mean time we remain steadfast to him who
seems well able to accomplish all the objects, or
the greatest which are expected of that
personage
;
nor do we think it an event to be looked
for from present appearances, that Jesus will
show himself more than a prophet; yet we
cannot
tell. Though we cannot quite share the
excessive transports of the people, we hold
ourselves
silent, and attentive to what shall come
to pass. We are filled with amazement at what
we hear, and pretend not to say what shall, or
what shall not be the issue. As surely as the
presence of God was manifested of old by Moses
and Elijah, so surely is it now, by Jesus. Of
this all see the evidence, Pharisee and
Sadducee
,
Jew and Samaritan.
Judith is made happy beyond all others, as it
seems to me by this coming of Jesus, and by the
things we every day hear concerning him and
his teachings and his works. She will not
doubt that he will prove all we can desire,
and hardly can she be restrained from
journeying
to Galilee, that she may herself hear, see,
and judge. But though she cannot see and
listen for herself, she can scarce converse of any
other subject.
Ah, Julian said she, as we were lately
seated on the housetop as the day was
declining
,
how glad I am that anything has
happened
to separate you, even though but for a
season, and in part from that bad man.
And whom do you mean, my cousin?
said I.
Could I mean any one, she replied,
besides
Herod?
He is not perfect, said I, yet as God
works his designs by storms, pestilence, and
whirlwinds, so may he by demons and bad
men.
I believe, replied Judith, that he does
indeed use men's wickedness for some ends,
so that even from this, the darkest evil,
somewhat beneficial springs. But who can
believe, that for his Messiah, promised so long
a man like Herod would be chosen?
None of the wise men of Israel, I
answered
,
can tell me, nor have I been able
from any quarter to learn with certainty what
sort of a personage the looked-for Messiah is
to be. Some say he is to be a prophet, and
some a king, and some both; and besides these
a priest. The only thing in which they agree
is, that he is to be a conqueror, and deliver
Israel from her slavery. I know not therefore
what to make of him with exactness. But if
the only belief in which they unite is any guide,
then is there some good reason for thinking
well of Herod, seeing that already he stands so
that with but little doubt he may work out the
deliverance of Judea. Though we should not
judge him Messiah, why may we not judge of
him as one who may avail, like the Maccabees,
to save our land from the spoiler?
You do not then, Julian, believe Herod to
be the Christ.
To confess the truth, I replied, I do not.
I believe he may do great good to Judea; that
he stands with his harness on, ready, if the
people
will aid him, to accomplish the very work
which by all is looked for from the Messiah;
but I do not believe he is therefore that person.
I will give him my service as a Jew, as I would
enlist under a general in the Roman camp;
but no more.
I joy to find it is so, said Judith; I too
may believe as much; though to speak to you
a truth, which were it spoken in Beth-Harem
or Jerusalem would bring down heavy
judgments
,
I verily think that under Rome we
enjoy
as much of both freedom and peace, as we
should do under princes of our own  as we
should were Herod king of Israel, instead of
Tiberius and Pilate. Ah, I should tremble,
were Herod king. I have seen him once, and
once has he spoken to me. But I would not
think of that. Others, however, though not
yourself, believe him Messiah!  a man spotted
with many crimes, and who will be with many
more; a man both crafty and cruel  a fox and
a tiger. I wonder at the delusion, and above
all, that Onias should have bound himself by so
many ties to him.
Onias, I replied, like most of our people,
is ruled by one idea, and one hope, the
deliverance
of Judea; and after many disappointments,
after waiting so long in vain for the coming of
the prince who was to work out the
deliverance
,
and beholding no signs of his approach,
notwithstanding that, according to the
interpretations
of our rabbis and priests, the time has
more than arrived, when, if prophecy be more
than a fable, he ought to arise, it surely is not
surprising, that he should be willing to fall back
upon Herod, in whom it must be confessed
by the most hostile, there are centered many
of the claims which would characterize the
Messiah. For myself, I marvel that greater
numbers, ere this, have not sought to him as
their only hope. Even the Herodians
themselves
are many of them but lukewarm
adherents
,
especially those of Csarea, who seem to
be content with their present relations to him
and his opinions and customs, and doubt the
wisdom of the attempt now in hand. In truth
it was only among the smaller portion of them,
that the Tetrarch, with all his secret
endeavors
,
had succeeded in planting the seeds of a
firm faith in his pretensions. But no other so
sure hope can I discern in the wide future for
Israel, as that which at this moment rests on
Herod.
Can you, asked Judith, see none in
Jesus
?
Surely the seal of Jehovah is upon
him.
I know not at present, I replied, what nor
who he is, nor what he will prove. I have with
sincerity sworn allegiance to Herod. I cannot
at once, nor without better reasons than can as
yet be given, transfer it to Jesus.
But, Julian, can he whose baptism was
marked by so great an event as the opened
heavens, whose birth was announced by angels,
and by whose power miracles have been
wrought in Galilee, great as ever came from a
prophet's hand, be other than He for whom we
look?
Before I could answer Judith's question,
Onias, with Shammai, Zadok, and other of our
friends from Beth-Harem joined us.
Ah, my daughter, said Shammai, as he
placed himself by the side of Judith, I am
glad to see thee in these days of promise.
Days, too, happily that join in one those who
differ. Even Zadok smiles now when I do.
Not quite as often, I trust, Shammai,
he replied. Were it so, I should scarce
think myself in my place, at the synagogue,
remembering what Solomon saith of
laughter
.
Nay now, my brother, replied Shammai,
VOL. II. 10
take me not up so sharply. I would only
have said that at length Zadok and Shammai
smiled at the same time and thing. I will
grant that for once thou hast smiled, I have
laughed an hundred times. But of what did
you converse, daughter, with our young
Roman
as we came up?
Of what should it have been? said
Judith
.
We converse now but of one and the
same theme.
Of Jesus you mean.
Yes, of Jesus.
It is, indeed, the only theme as thou hast
said, replied Shammai. In the city it is so;
whether you meet in your walks those of one
sect, employment, condition of life, or
another
,
it is still the same words you hear from
every mouth, and one hopeful eye you behold
in every countenance. Even children and
slaves have caught the general joy, and utter
the name of the prophet as if it were a charm
to keep them from evil. And with reason.
They are a foolish people, said Zadok,
and easily seduced as ever. I marvel,
Shammai
,
that thou shouldst encourage them in their
folly. They may soon have to sing another
song.
Why thou thyself, said the Ruler, hast
been little less stirred than I, by the news from
Galilee. Why silence the song others would
sing in their joy?
I rejoice, replied the other, as one whose
joy may speedily be turned into mourning. It
is not impossible that Jesus may be the Christ.
But what can we say more?
Surely, replied Shammai, it is not
certain
that he now is, or that he will be; yet is
there such a hope, as Israel was never before
permitted to entertain, and in that hope let all
be glad who will. Say you not so, my
daughter
?
Indeed I do, Rabbi. I had just said to
Julian as you ascended and joined us, that it
was no small token to us, that this Jesus of
Galilee is the fulfilment of our hope, in that his
birth was so announced, that at his baptism the
very heavens were opened, and the voice of
Jehovah, or of his angel was heard, and that he
hath power to do the works which are filling
the land with astonishment. Who else should
he be?
Could the voice of the whole land of
Judea
this moment be heard, replied Shammai,
it would say with thee, lady, who else should
he be? The people are waiting and ready to
hail him king, prophet, deliverer. Leaving
every other ruler, they would now at his word
flock together, and under his supremacy lay the
deep foundations of that kingdom of God of
which there shall be no end. Yet, Judith, are
there some things that cause a doubt.
Yea, verily, that are there, said Zadok.
But still, said Shammai, none to
extinguish
hope.
Wait for that, said Zadok, until
to-morrow
.
I will wait longer, said Shammai.
I am ready, said Judith, to believe even
now; I see no room for doubt. The reports
which have come to our ears are by the lips of
those whom we know; why should I not
believe
?
Believe what, my child? asked
Shammai
.
Judith hesitated; but said, after a moment's
pause, believe in him, as one whom God has
sent to instruct us, and why not also to save us
from our enemies? Messiah we are taught will
be a prophet and priest, as well as king.
Doubtless it is so, said the Ruler. And
it may not be denied that thus far Jesus has
shown himself possessed of the wisdom of a
prophet, and of the holiness of a priest; but
no signs has he given of the greatness of a
prince.
Not, asked Judith, in his miracles?
Who should do a miracle but one who comes
from God?  And is not every greatness his?
True, daughter, there are those who
pretend
to do wonders like these of Jesus, but a
wise man receives them not. To God alone
belongs such power. But surely it has been
imparted to many who were not Messiah, and
may be to many more. His works show God
to be with this Jesus of Nazareth, but they
show him not to be the Christ.
Spoken like the King of Wisdom himself,
said Zadok. Yet is there a remnant of folly
to be rebuked. Works great as these of Jesus
can Pharez do, and many a Magian and
Egyptian
besides. Who knows not that these have
power to foretell things to come, to expel
demons
,
to call forth spirits from the air, the ocean,
and the grave? The sorceress of Endor has
left those behind who can do her own deeds
and more.
So, replied Shammai, do the ignorant
believe, but so do not the wise. They are
liars, deceivers, impostors all; and the people
fools and blind, who put their trust in them.
Who knows not how their tricks are done?
even like unto those of her of Endor,  in the
terrors of darkness and the night, in hollow
caves of the earth, in tombs, and on blasted
heaths, amidst sulphurous flames and burning
pitch, the yells of tortured men and beasts,
where no eye can see aright, nor ear hear, and
10 *
the soul is dissolved in the terrors of the scene.
What wonder if so the dead may be reported to
have arisen, and spirits to have come forth at
a word?
The works of Jesus, said Judith, are not
like these.
Truly they are not, said Shammai, but
are done in the open light of day, and in the
streets of our cities, in the midst of watching
crowds, with some Zadok ever nigh at hand.
They who are sick he restores; they who are
blind he causes to see; those whose limbs are
withered and dead he makes whole as before,
who all live and are among us to bear
testimony
to what has been done, as well as others
who stood by and were witnesses of such deeds.
These wonders, therefore, who shall deny it?
show him to be of God.
Yet show him not to be the Christ, said
Zadok, nor, as I believe, and shall believe,
not with certainty to be of God, but with much
likelihood of the devil.
Blaspheme not, said Onias; thou
knowest
not whereof thou affirmest. If ever the
God of our nation has appeared for us, if he
indeed thundered with his voice at Sinai, or
gave his spirit to Moses and Elias, then has
he given it also unto Jesus. He is a prophet
mighty in his power, even like unto them.
What he is more than this, we know not yet;
but we shall know soon. But we may hope
that he shall prove a redeemer for Israel. And,
saying this, I forget not Herod, nor our duty to
him. I am his. But we know well that upon
Herod rests no spirit like unto this that
manifests
itself in Jesus. He cannot in this be
what Jesus is, while Jesus can be what Herod
is, and more. It is no treason to say so. When
and where God, the God of our Fathers reveals
his hand and presence, there should his children,
forsaking all others, cleave to him alone.
Others
are set aside. Let Jesus, therefore, declare
himself Messiah, and use his powers to achieve
Messiah's work, and we then muster under his
banner, as under one whom God himself hath
anointed. And to such an one do I believe
would Herod himself show allegiance.
I thank thee, my father, for these words,
said Judith. Thou wilt wait then. I
feared
Fear nothing, said Onias, least of all, that
I shall in anything turn a deaf ear to the
evident
voice of Jehovah. I look to Jesus with
hope, as doth every one in Israel whose heart
is right before God, and I wait to see what a
few more days or weeks shall bring forth.
Yet the people do everywhere hold him,
said Judith, to be not only a prophet, but the
Christ also. The voice of a people, is it not
the voice of God?
The people, replied Onias, believe
hastily
and without reason, as their passions lead
them. And then again ofttimes with as little
reason deny and reject, what a moment before
they believed, as new passions dictate. No;
the voice of the wise man, if it may be
affirmed
of any, is rather the voice of God.
Solomon
,
David, and the Prophets, rather than the
multitudes of their day, spake with the warrant
of Jehovah. When Jesus shall declare
himself
,
and put forth his powers in the great work
God shall have given him to do, will it be time
enough to own him Christ. The people, in
their shoutings and acclamations, in their ready
faith and promises, are as the blind rushing
toward the edge of a precipice,  they know not
whither they go, and it may be toward their
ruin  yet also it may be toward their
salvation
.
Yea, said Zadok, it is not more hours
than one can easily reckon up, that this same
people deemed John some great one, and now
he is forsaken for Jesus. And to-morrow let a
third arise, and Jesus will be forsaken in turn.
That, said Onias, is true, Zadok. But
in respect of what thou hast said of John, as I
learn, his disciples abandon him not, but cleave
to him, holding him greater and better than
Jesus.
I know not how his followers judge either
of him or Jesus, replied the Pharisee, but the
people, of whom we were speaking, while but
now they thronged John wheresoever he
moved
,
now speak the truth of him, the truth at
first, as well as the truth now, and say that he
is as one beside himself, seeing that he dwells
apart in the manner he does, feeds upon the
wild fruits and berries of the wilderness, and
for his clothing wears the garments of a
beggar
.
Doubt not that presently they shall say
yet worse things of Jesus; nay, that they do
already, marvelling if he can be a Son of God
who eats and drinks as others do, consorts with
publicans and sinners, and by the power of God
makes wine of water, that he and others with
him may drink at will.
Are such things reported? asked Judith.
It must be said that they are, replied
Zadok
,
and already among those who follow
him doth it beget shrewd suspicions of whence
he comes, and of the true spirit that inspireth
him.
Oh, say not so, Rabbi, cried Judith; say
not so. All that has thus far come to our
ears speaks of him as gentle and holy. This
is but the jealousy of a Herodian  admit it
Zadok.
As a follower of Herod, replied Zadok,
I profess not to love either him or John;
that thou knowest, daughter. But in respect of
what I have just said, I utter it not of my own
knowledge, but speak only the common rumor.
Common rumor, I said, changes its hue
and quality, however, even as water, according
to the nature of that through which it passes.
Thou wouldst not take as justly exact a rumor
concerning John from the lips of Herod, nor
can we any more one from Zadok concerning
Jesus.
We shall see, replied the Priest, time
will show; only, as I think, there will be found
to be even less of Christ in Jesus, than in John;
but in neither, what should throw a stumbling
block so big as a midge's wing in the way of
Antipas.
Let us not, said Onias, be
over-confident
,
nor judge beforehand. Who would
willingly
be found to fight against God?
As to what is said of the life and manner
of the Prophet, said Shammai, it surely
matters
little one way or another. If the Messiah
drink wine, it would make it hard for one to
say, why that should hurt him in the eye of the
nation, and if he keep company with publicans
and those who are little better, it were not easy
to see how he should consort with many and
not do so. A holy Jew must be sought for
narrowly, to be found. He who is to be
gathering
armies and laying the foundations of a
new kingdom, will hardly employ himself in
choosing nicely his company. As thou sayest,
Onias, let us not judge beforehand, nor make
mountains of ant-hills. Let us not pry into his
secret life searching for rents, and spots of
uncleanness
.
It matters not. It matters not.
To be a busybody is worse than to be a sinner,
and to judge bitterly worse than to be, or be
called a child of the devil.
So we conversed until the hour of retiring,
when our visitors took their leave and returned
to Beth-Harem.
When they were gone, Onias, as is his wont,
called together his household for the evening
prayer. Morning and evening he worships
God surrounded by all who dwell beneath his
roof, pouring forth the wants and desires of
his heart concerning his own, and concerning
Israel. This night, standing on the house-top
in the midst of his large family, the air being
calm, the stars shining bright in the firmament,
and no sound heard but the low music of
innumerable
insects, and the distant murmuring of
the Jordan, he prayed with an earnestness more
than common. His voice, not loud but deep,
and bearing upwards not only so many words,
but the very soul of him who spake them, fell
upon the ear, as the voice of one more than
man. When he had prayed for his own, and
for thee, my mother, and for all in any sort
bound to him, and for other things, with
somewhat
of that repetition to be noted in the
devotions
of all of this sect, he then prayed for
Judea
,
for her peace, prosperity, and deliverance;
Make haste to help us, O Lord, make haste
to appear for us, and with thy strong arm to
cause us to stand, for we are now fallen to the
ground and buried in the dust of the earth,
and sunk into the deep mire, and overwhelmed
beneath mighty waters, so that we are of no
account
in the sight of men, verily they hoot at
us, shooting out the lip and laughing us to
scorn as they pass by, saying, where is thy
helper, Israel, and thy Gods, O Jacob? And
truly, O Lord, it is not as it was wont to be
of old with thy people, when thy servant David
sat on thy glorious throne, and the inhabitants
of the earth trembled and fled from before him
astonished. Then was thy people as the
chosen of the Lord. Then each sat beneath
his own vine and figtree, and the gentile who
is accursed forever licked the dust at our feet.
But now we are had in derision; our enemies
have risen up against us and hold us in
bondage
,
the yoke is upon our neck, our feet are in
the stocks, our wine and oil, the fruit of the
field, and the cattle upon a thousand hills they
are not for us, but the oppressor devoureth them
before our eyes, and for our wives and our
little
ones their skin cleaveth to their bones, and
their substance is carried away, and the
stranger
and alien has gotten possession thereof.
By reason of these things, O Lord, thy people
are full of sighings and tears; we sit beneath
the willows whereon we have hung our harps
of pleasant sound, and bewail and lament.
How long, O Lord! how long, wilt thou cause
us to wait? How long before we shall see our
desires accomplished upon those whom we
hate? How long before thy wrath shall be
poured out upon our enemies and consume them
from the face of the earth, so that men shall
seek them and shall not find them, and the
smoke of their ruin and the stench of their
corruption
shall alone declare the place where once
stood the cities of their pride, and dwelt the
multitudes of their inhabitants. Consume them
quickly in thy wrath, O God, and in thine
anger
cause them to perish. Let thy enemies
and the enemies of Jacob flee before the face
of thine anointed, and the kingdom be again
given to Israel. Now is the set time, O Lord,
the set time, the time for the redemption of
Judah and the reign of Israel. Give us to
VOL. II. 11
know him whom thou shalt send. Let not our
eyes be blind when the messenger of the
covenant
shall suddenly appear; let not our hearts
be hard nor our ears dull of hearing. Make
the signs to be plainly discerned even in
the broad face of the heavens, that shall
proclaim
the King of Israel; and may the people
quickly gather themselves unto him, with their
swords girded upon their loins, with bows, and
javelins, and spears, to take vengeance upon
the oppressor, and bring deliverance to the
captive
.
May thy kingdom come, even now, O
Lord, that the eyes of thy servant may behold
it, and may there be no tarrying. Show us
him whom thou hast sealed, on whom thou
hast set thy name, whom thou hast called
thy Son,  Son of David, King of Israel,
Saviour of Judah, Redeemer of Jacob, The
Anointed. Light hath arisen, O Lord, upon
our land, but our hearts are divided, our minds
are in doubt and amazement. Scatter the
clouds, and let us see plainly in whom thou
wouldst have us to trust, and where is the
hiding
of thy power. If it be in thy servant
Jesus
and in no other, or in John and no other,
or in Herod and no other, cause that he quickly
array himself in his royal robes, and crown
himself with his royal diadem, and sit upon
the throne of his fathers, so that we may know
him, and that unto him there shall be a
gathering
of the people. Then upon our enemies
shall there fall blasting and mildew, and a
curse and utter destruction before the face of
thy Lord; and the Kingdom of God shall be
established, it shall be unto the ends of the
earth, and there shall be no other.
These and other like things did Onias pour
forth in his prayer; and truly if prayers be
answered
according to the faith and truth of those
who make them, then will the petitions of thy
brother be fulfilled; for his words are things
rather than their names and shadows only.
What he says, is as a thing done, having its
force, and reality.
As we descended from the house-top to the
lower apartments of the house, Judith desired
to speak with me; but when we had withdrawn
to the portico, she deferred still to some other
time that which she wished to communicate,
and together with the rest of the household we
also retired.
The earnest manner of Judith, while at the
same time she lightly postponed the interview
which a moment before she had sought, led me
not with doubt or difficulty to conjecture what
it was, that would have been the burden of her
discourse. As I have already said to thee, my
mother, she is beloved of the noble Roman,
Saturninus, and by her is he in turn equally
beloved, and well are they worthy each of the
regards of the other. But the bar which their
religions raise between them appears
insurmountable
.
In Rome, indeed, as thou
knowest
,
it is not seldom overleaped, and the Roman
and the Jew are joined together. So too in
Judea
are these differences overcome on the part
of many; especially in those places where the
introduction of Roman usages and the Roman
tongue with Roman inhabitants, has helped to
bring the two people into a nearer intercourse,
and a better knowledge of each other. They
have in this manner discovered, what else they
might forever have remained ignorant of, that
save in name and in other matters not less
accidental
,
they have been made by the Father of
of All much alike; that a Roman heart is much
like a Jewish heart, a Roman nature much like
a Jewish; that a man is a man, and a woman a
woman, notwithstanding name, country,
religion
,
and outward beauty or ugliness; and that
the things in which they are the same
outweigh
,
by an immense preponderance, those
wherein they are different. So that in such
circumstances, in spite of the outcries of many,
and the prejudices inherited from ancient
customs
,
the Jews and natives of Rome and other
countries have obeyed the instincts which have
directed their affections to each other. Yet
are there many, very many, who would by no
means give way to such affection in themselves,
nor permit it in a child. And of such is Onias.
The regard, which at first he conceived for
Saturninus, led him to extend towards him
hospitalities
and a friendship, rare in a Jew toward
an alien, and which have brought upon him in
no light measure the rebukes of the more strict.
But had he foreseen the consequences, sooner
would he have sacrificed his life, I believe,
than have done aught to provoke them. He
relied doubtless on the natural hatred of the
Jew for the Roman, to defend his daughter, as
himself, from any nearer intercourse than the
distant one allowed by the most formal
observances
of society. Alas! how vain the reliance.
Love laughs such barriers to scorn. It is free
of country, religion, and the wide world.
Nevertheless
,
what shall Onias do or say? Only
one thing possibly. Never would thy stern yet
loving brother, that Jew of Jews, that hater of
the gentile, surrender her to a Roman. How
will Zadok now, and such as he, gall the spirit
of Onias by their harsh constructions. How
will they charge this issue as a judgment of
God upon him for his looseness in receiving the
heathen to his board. Yet in Shammai will
he find a gentle adviser and friend, and so too
11*
will Judith, and one no less confiding in
Julian
.
I thank thee, my mother, for thy late full
supplies of Roman news. Surely Sejanus must
have been made blind by the Gods not to
perceive
the significancy of such conduct and such
language in Tiberius. Yet perhaps it is but
the blindness which a low ambition and a
wicked
selfishness inflicts necessarily upon itself.
He has gazed upon his own dazzling fortunes
so long, that eyesight is gone for other things.
Grim and deadly as Tiberius stands before him,
he sees him not; nor any better can he hear
the low but heavy rumbling, as of an earthquake,
of a nation's discontent,  of that vast
multitude
whom he has injured in themselves, their
friends, or their fortunes, and who now begin to
perceive that the Emperor is also on their
side, and one tyrant may be set against the
other. That were a sight truly grateful, to
behold either of those who have glutted their
fatal appetite on so many innocent, at length
falling into the bloody fangs of the other.
Such a fate seems likely enough to befall
Sejanus
,
yet after all he may first spring upon
Tiberius
.
You say that little heed is given among our
people in Rome to the rumors which have
reached it of Jesus, and you yourself show not
by your replies, that your own concern is much
deeper. Judith marvels at this. I do not;
seeing that the accounts which have reached
you of Jesus, are none of them such as agree
with the prevailing hopes of the expected
deliverer. Jesus having given no sign by which
to judge him, save his miracles, I marvel not
at all that you in Rome at once rank him with
those who, by the arts of magic, and credulity
on the part of the multitude, have a thousand
times deluded the nation. The wonders which
are ascribed to Jesus cause him naturally, where
there is no opportunity of a careful examination
and comparison, to be put but on a level with
sorcerers and exorcists, of whom the world is
full. But I am clearly persuaded, my mother,
that there is something more in what is now
taking place than you, and others in Rome, dream
of; widely different from what has been
witnessed
before, either here or elsewhere. For
the works of a wonderful kind, which are
related
of Jesus, are in their nature, and the
manner
in which they are performed, so different
from such as are done by magicians, that all
who have witnessed them declare with one
voice, they can be performed by no other power
than that of God. Pharisee and Sadducee, Jew
and Samaritan, all agree in bearing this
testimony
.
They doubt not that he is indeed a
prophet, filled for some purpose, not as yet
known or by him declared, with the spirit
and power of Jehovah. But besides this, it
is affirmed that his teachings are such as
declare him to be of God, not less, or more
than his miracles, that his character is every
way admirable, and his life holy, beyond the
measure of other men. Can we doubt that he
will presently show himself to be more than
a prophet? It will not be long, therefore, as
I judge, ere you, in Rome and in other
distant
places, will, even as they who are here
present, be curious to learn all that is to be
known of this strange person. As you will
yourself, my mother, be more and more
desirous
of further intelligence, just in the proportion
to that which I shall send you  for where
was there ever goodness in which you felt not
interest?  I shall take all pains to keep you
informed
of whatever there is worthy of trust
that comes to my ear. I cannot well judge
myself what shall be its issue; but shall, I
confess, be amazed, if so much do not result as
shall fill with astonishment not only Judea but
Rome also.
Remember me with affection to the
members
of our household, and to my fellow
travellers
.
XVIII.
This
, my mother, reaches you from
Tiberias
,
whither I am come at the command of
Herod.
It is many weeks since I last wrote. As we
are now suffering under the fervors of a
summer's
sun, I grieve not, that I am perforce on
the shores of this inland sea, over which the
winds as they sweep are deprived of a portion
of that burning heat they bring with them from
the Asiatic deserts.
A few days only had passed after I had
despatched
my last letter, when by a messenger
from this place I was summoned to attend the
Tetrarch; and Onias at the same time left
Beth-Harem for the western shores of the
Dead Sea and the region of Idumea. I was by
no means sorry to be thus drawn away from
Beth-Harem, from which, owing to the manner
in which I have bound myself to both Onias
and Herod, I have not been at liberty to depart,
as I had intended to do from time to time, that
I might see more of the country and the
inhabitants
.
On my way to Tiberias I passed through
a long stretch of the valley of the Jordan,
giving
to the eye of the traveller a succession of
scenes similar to those on its banks in the
neighborhood of Beth-Harem, and Bethabara.
The lake of Gennesareth greeted the sight
with a wide prospect of beauty, as on a short
turn of the river it suddenly opened upon me,
lying quiet and calm in the bosom of hills
running
along on the eastern and western shores,
the loftier mountains of Lebanon showing
their snow-clad summits in the north.
Immediately
on gaining the borders of the lake,
Tiberias
rose to view on its western side  a
large city encompassed by lofty walls, the
buildings
rising as they retreat toward the mountains
one above another, and overlooking the whole
extent of the lake. Hither I directed my
steps, but learned that the palace of the
Tetrarch
,
in which he chiefly resides, is at a little
distance without the walls, covering a small
eminence that commands a view of the city
and of the water.
I doubt not, my mother, you have wondered
not a little that I have continued thus to unite
myself to the service of Herod, for whom
in various letters I have expressed but slight
regard. I have been surprised myself at
times at my own position and relations
toward
him; to that degree indeed that I could
not find any explanation but in the
persuasion
,
that we are led toward the ends that are
best by a providence whose designs we cannot
penetrate, whom we can serve only by submitting
to its controlling and guiding force. I have
faltered
,
I confess, in my purposes more than once;
for, notwithstanding the deep convictions and
lofty praises bestowed by Onias and Zadok upon
the Tetrarch, I have felt inclined to put more
confidence in the results I have myself arrived at
concerning him, in spite of my comparatively
narrow opportunities of observing and studying
his character. Still while any darkness or
doubt remained, I was willing to seek him
once more that, if it were possible, by further
communications it might be removed.
Upon announcing myself at the palace gate
as desirous to see the Tetrarch, I was
conducted
to an apartment, where I found Chuza, the
Steward, who received me courteously, as one
whom he had known before at Machrus, and
was aware of my relations to Herod. Joanna,
the wife of Chuza, sat at an open window
plying
busily her needle, while a little child
pursued
its sports at her side. The mother raised
her head as I entered, revealing a countenance
sad, and exhibiting traces of recent tears. Yet
she received me with a smile, and bade me
welcome
,
as Chuza named me, to the palace.
Upon
inquiring for the Tetrarch, I was told he was
then absent upon the lake, but would soon
return
.
In the mean time, said Joanna, be pleased
to rest here where the air comes cool from the
water, and the approach of the king can be
seen.
You have of late had another king, as
some esteem him, upon these waters; I
observed
to Chuza.
Aye, he answered; that is, at the other
end of the lake in the region of Capernaum.
He hath made there a great stir, and indeed
among the people here also, many having
followed
him, even from Tiberias. Had he drawn
nearer to us I fear lest the palace itself had
sustained
losses.
And may even yet, said Joanna in a low
voice, as if speaking rather to herself than
replying
to her husband.
There it is, exclaimed Chuza, there it is.
As thou seest, Sir, all the people are beside
themselves  towns emptied, cities in
confusion
,
the husbandman forsaking the field, the
housewife her distaff, families divided among
themselves, all for this  how shall we name
him?
Name him as yet, said his wife, no
otherwise than reverently; for, as I have said,
neither thou, nor I, nor any one, knows what or
who he may be; yet of one thing are we even
now doubly assured, that he is a wise and
righteous man.
But, said her husband, suppose he draw
from Chuza his wife Joanna; how, and what
then?
Then, said Joanna, let Chuza follow.
Not so, not so, cried the steward, I leave
not what is, for what only may be; nor shall
Joanna if she will be ruled by realities instead
of dreams.
It is no dream, said his wife, that the
words of Jesus are like those of no other, that
he speaks as none of the priests or scribes ever
do, and that he performs wonders which those
only can whom God inspires, and by his life
and virtues fills those who draw near with an
awe and a love, such as are felt toward no
other.
Nay, replied Chuza, all that may be real
and no dream; thou hast seen and heard
thyself
,
and who shall deny the truth of what
Joanna the daughter of Phasael affirms? Yet
still may it be declared, that all this woven
together makes but a weak and insufficient
reason for doing as so many have done and are
doing. For that, there will, as I have
constantly
VOL. II. 12
affirmed, be time enough and more than
enough, when he shall more plainly have
declared
himself.
Thou seest, said Joanna, that I am
content
to wait.
Thou art the very best of wives, cried
Chuza, and in saying so, I forget not our great
mistress. As he ended, he snatched up the
little child, who had run towards him, and
kissed it vehemently, as the best substitute, he
could find near at hand and in the presence
of others, of its young mother.
I was rejoiced to meet with one who had
both seen and heard Jesus, and eagerly
approached
her to obtain some better knowledge,
than I had been able as yet to find access to,
concerning him, when Chuza exclaimed,
See! the Tetrarch comes; his boat is
already
at the shore.
I looked as he directed, and saw the boat of
many banks of oars making rapidly toward the
quay. In a moment more Herod was seen
ascending
toward the palace.
Learning immediately that I had arrived, he
desired my attendance. Herod on receiving
me appeared not quite at his ease, as
remembering
the conversations that on my visit at
Machrus had passed between us; yet did he so
far overcome his feelings as to greet me with
affability, and bid me heartily welcome to
Tiberias
,
presenting me at the same time to some
who stood with him.
The present posture of our affairs, my
young Roman, said he, is far enough off from
what at Machrus we promised ourselves it
would be by this hour.
It is so, indeed, I answered; yet it seems
to be so, in no wise as a consequence of any
error on our part. We cannot control the sun
in the heavens; but still less the minds and
hearts of men.
Ah, he quickly rejoined, they are not
for thrones who know not to turn the hearts of
the people as they will, and who keep not
moreover
their own counsels. By the soul of my
father, I have come to think of myself but as of
a common man, since the day I held by the
judgment of Onias and a young stripling of
Rome, rather than my own. Had John been
then closely mewed up, we had now been far
on to the end of our enterprise. Now not only
is he at large, still poisoning the minds of men,
but another is sprung up of the same sort, save
that he carries away the people even more than
the first. For one to deal with, there are now
two.
I asked if he himself had seen Jesus, so as to
form any judgment concerning him.
I have not seen him, though I have desired
to do so. While he was on the upper shores of
the lake I was at Machrus. But he draws
many after him and astonishes them by his
miracles  so all report to me, and all cannot
be deceived. How sayest thou Jaddua?
turning
to a doctor of the Law who stood near him.
Doubtless, said the Rabbi, it was at first
thought to be as your mightiness has said;
there were wonderful works done by his hand,
which verily seemed to be done by the power
of God given to him as of old to Moses and
Elias, and the people being all in expectation
flocked about him, but with their eyes blinded
because of such expectation, and incapable of
judgment. But Jesus having been a long
time among them, the blindness is now in part
removed; and him whom so hastily they took
for a great one they already begin to doubt.
Ah, it is just as I have said, cried Herod;
I knew it would be with him as with John.
They thronged the Baptist awhile  now he is
forsaken save by a few for Jesus, and to-morrow
Jesus will in turn be abandoned. Sees not
Onias, Julian, his folly? What is there here
to cast an obstacle so thick as one's finger in our
way?
I said, I still thought that, whether deceived
or not, the people were at present even too much
distracted by the strange events of the time to
be approached with much prospect of success.
Yet if it be true, as the learned scribe hath
reported, that already those who follow him
begin
to doubt him, the day could not be far off
that he might resume his undertaking.
It can be no otherwise, said Jaddua, than
that the people should fall away from him
for verily though they have sought to him so
long, what hath come of it? He still as at
first wanders about on foot, consorting not with
the great and the learned of the land, with the
rulers and the chief priests, but with the
common
people, just as they happen to throng him,
and in his teaching casts contempt upon the
Law, its ministers, and its rites. Here, say the
wiser, be few signs of the Christ, and we leave
him with those who have eyes to see farther
than ours; mayhap beggars and outcasts,
publicans
,
and sinners of the gentiles may behold
the Son of David, where we can see only a
besotted son of man, or child of the devil.
Yet, I asked, they who doubt are, as I
have heard, very few to the multitudes who
still believe?
Ah, said Jaddua, the multitude is easily
led; feed them, only feed them, which Jesus
does, and beside that please their love of
wonders
,
and their friendship is secured.
Doubtless
12*
the most part for such reasons do still
believe, and so throng him. But they who
look toward the future, and think not of
themselves
,
but of the salvation of Israel, begin to
draw back, or are in doubt. They see before
them, indeed, in Jesus, one whom they cannot
fully comprehend or explain, but they see not
the Christ.
Truly, said the Tetrarch, I can discover
in this Jesus of Nazareth, from all the reports
that reach my ear, no qualities or purposes that
should cause hesitation or delay in our
enterprise
.
He seems thus far to be a mild and
peaceable man, concerning himself not at all,
as doth John, with public affairs and things that
are above him; but with more wisdom devoting
himself to the instruction of the common
people
,
and to the performance of works of charity
and mercy, however the power by which he
does them may be derived  whether from the
God of Abraham, or the God of the Sidonians.
If there be still great numbers who in their
stupidity persist in the belief that he is, or will
prove to be the Christ, he himself truly
appears
to be possessed of more reason and giveth
no encouragement to such madness, affecting no
state and making no promises even, so we hear,
to his nearest followers. This man we may
well let alone; nay, if it be true that he
assaileth
the Law and the Pharisees, and
impugneth
the spotless righteousness of their lives, it
will go hard, but the priests and the Council
will see after him, and serve us better than we
could serve ourselves. Say we not right,
Jaddua
?
I would not that aught should be done
in haste, replied the scribe, but as I trow,
should all prove to be true that we hear, I think,
and I trust that those of whom thou speakest
will see to it, that his career shall be a short one.
There be those yet among both rulers and
people
glory be to the God of our fathers
who love the Law, and will not see it assailed,
or stained by so much as a word or a breath of
reproach, but they will stand forth to stone the
blasphemer unto death.
I doubt it not, said Herod, our subjects
are loyal toward not us alone, but the Law also;
and such a people shall be blessed of the Lord
and prosper. I fear not Jesus, nor any power
he may win over the people, seeing the path he
hath chosen to travel. He, I say, may be let
alone; yet the insolence of John well
deserveth
punishment; and of his purposes there may
be with reason more apprehension. His tongue
is as a scourge of scorpions that falleth alike
on all, we, even, escape not, but he whips us
before the people for our sins, as he counteth
them, as any beggar of them all. Let him
look to himself. By the soul of my father, but
it were a good deed to hang him in his own
girdle. What think you, Jaddua?
As a busybody, an intermeddler, a despiser
of authorities, and one moreover who casteth
dirt upon our holy order, answered the scribe,
and aimeth to bring the excellent and the holy
into contempt with the people, doth he well
deserve
the favor thou wouldst bestow upon him.
The rabble truly affect him, and doubtless
would clamor; but who are they to stand
between
the Law and its victim?
I said, that I did not believe John could be
touched with advantage or safety. The people
hold him to be a prophet, and conceive besides
that he is their defender and shield against the
priesthood, the Pharisees, and the mighty in
the land, whom he assails in his preaching, and
accuseth openly of the hypocrisies and
iniquities
which all men know to lie at their door,
but which none save he is bold enough to
charge upon them. Such charges the people
know to be just, as doth every one who hath
the natural sight of a man.
By the sudden expression of Herod's
countenance
I could easily perceive, that he secretly
enjoyed what, I confess, I said without so much
as thinking of Jaddua, and the presence of some
priests who stood with him. He turned to
them as they were ready to break out with
indignation
and said,
By the beard of Aaron! but this youth is
little more civil toward the holy priesthood,
than John himself. We must beg you, Fathers,
to pardon his ignorance, seeing he hath but of
late come into our kingdom, and seeing,
moreover
,
he is hardly yet arrived at years of
wisdom
.
We will advise him in private, and do
what in us lies to inspire him with due
reverence
toward the ministers of the Law, whose
lives should be as spotless, yea, and are
doubtless
,
as their robes.
Saying this he motioned to them to
withdraw
,
which they did with countenances
inflamed
with rage, putting unwilling restraint
upon their tongues.
Soon as they were withdrawn and beyond
the reach of our voices, Herod broke into loud
laughter, amusing himself greatly with their
looks of astonishment at hearing themselves
so berated in the very presence of the Tetrarch.
The knaves, said he, as soon as he could
cease from his laughter, they have for once
heard the truth in the king's presence, or
rather
some small portion of it. Though we
reprove
them not ourselves, it being needful to
secure their good opinion, yet we know them
well, and were well content to behold them
writhing under the scourge thou didst lay on;
would it had been with the scorpion lash they
so well deserve. But I saw why thy hand
was stayed.
Calling upon me then to follow him, we left
the more public room where we had been
conversing
,
for one more private, into which none
are admitted but the partners of his most secret
counsels.
When we were seated in this more private
apartment, Herod asked with particularity after
Onias, and said he, that bright flower of the
Jordan, Judith, how fares the damsel? well
worthy for her beauty to be queen of Judea,
Rome, or the world.
I made slight, but as I was bound to do,
courteous
answer, though I confess a pain, at hearing
her name from such lips. Yet, perhaps, I do
Herod injustice.
I need not relate, my mother, the
conversations
which now ensued upon all the subjects
connected with the enterprise of Herod, the
obstructions thrown in his way by the
appearance
of John and Jesus, and the probabilities
concerning the success of Sejanus in Rome,
and the aid to be derived from him. Of all the
impediments, however, which oppose his
movement
,
it is easy to see, notwithstanding the
manner in which at first he had spoken of it,
that he most fears the power of Jesus. He
will not confess it before the Pharisees and the
priests, but seeing deeper than they, he
apprehends
lest by those very virtues, and that
humble
and lowly manner of life, which to a dull
sight seems to make him harmless, he should
build for himself a foundation in the hearts of
the people, deeper than could have been laid in
any other way, and too deep to be rooted up.
Although, he said, I have not seen him,
yet I have made the most diligent and exact
inquiries, and to them all I have as yet received
but the same answers, all of which go to prove
that a man every way extraordinary hath arisen
among us. His virtues and manner of life are
such, as secure the veneration of most of those
who throng his steps, notwithstanding there be
some who accuse him of excesses, and of
hostility
to the Law; but these may well be set
down as calumnies of those who envy him
for when was there innocence or virtue,
without
their detractors? His powers of healing
and working other miracles witnessed by so
many  whether they be powers derived from
our God or some other, or whether from magic, or
the spirits who fill the earth and air, I cannot
guess; nor can I tell in truth whether his life and
character be sincerely exhibited, or falsely, for
selfish purposes only. All I truly know, young
Roman, is this, that he obtains sway over the
people, and that each day thus far, as my spies
inform me, doth it grow wider and wider. At
the present time, I confess my fears to have
somewhat diminished, from what has even
within a day been reported, that he had
offended
the Pharisees by the heat of his reproaches,
and caused many to doubt his Messiahship by
reason of the strange truths he preaches, which
appear to those who follow his steps to be
contradictory
of the office and work, expected of
the Christ, and to make it impossible, that with
such opinions he should ever undertake them.
Let them proceed in the same way, and at least,
the more powerful of the Pharisees, of the
Council, and of the nation, will be turned against
him, being persuaded that he who can deride
and contemn them, the very sinews of the
nation
,
cannot be that Christ who is to exalt the
nation. So far, accordingly, as these are
concerned
,
they will work for us, without the
necessity
of our interposing. Jesus himself will
destroy himself. But, Julian, behind these
who are the few  however powerful  there
are the many, the stupid populace, this fiery
headstrong rabble of the common people,
whom to bridle, ride, and govern, asks the
craft of the devil, and the strength of seven
archangels. They are now beside
themselves
with their foolish worship of this man
of Nazareth  our cities and our towns
depopulated
,
while they run hither and thither,
as they say, to hear his words in the synagogue,
or by the roadside, but as is more likely, to
gape with idle wonder, to gossip, and breed
revolt
.
They doubt not  not they, O wise and
far-seeing people!  that Jesus is their king,
and by him a mechanic-king, a low-born
peasant-monarch
,
of their own base blood, they
shall come to strange honors and liberties, they
shall be slaves no more, but freemen of the soil,
with a king over them or under them of their
own choosing, and Rome and the Herods at
their feet. These, young Roman, are our real
enemies, and until they are drawn off from
these wild fancies, or Jesus is drawn from them,
our purposes must halt, and our hands hang idle.
And who am I, to defer to this carpenter-king
holding back, while he mounts where I should
stand?
He paused and looked at me as if for a reply.
I said, that I by no means wondered at the
present enthusiasm of the people, but I was
firmly persuaded that it would work its own
cure. If Jesus, I continued, be in truth the
Messiah by the appointment of God (certainly
he is a prophet of great authority) then wilt
VOL. II. 13
thou, as well as I and every loyal Hebrew,
hasten to do him homage  Herod's
countenance
grew dark  we can desire no other than
to acknowledge him whom God shall send
the people will then be where we would have
them. If he be not the true Messiah, the signs
that should show him such will be wanting,
and the people, deceived in their hopes, will fall
away from him; first doubtless revenging
themselves
for their disappointment. In the mean
while
Aye, interrupted the Tetrarch  what
in the mean while?
In the mean while, I resumed, I should
counsel a patient waiting, that we may not be
found possibly resisting the purposes of
Jehovah
.
And such, I added, do I know to be
the judgment of Onias.
Herod's lip curled with an expression of
contempt
,
as he said, Verily I think that you do
all hold of the fair Judith, who, as I learn, is
more than half a believer in Jesus; and for
herself, as I learn also, is a disciple of the holy
Saturninus.
It seemed strange to me that Herod should
have known, even so much as this, of the
private
thoughts of two persons so remote from
him, and I could not but entertain the
conviction
,
that for purposes of his own he had
informed
himself by a direct employment of
secret
means of what could not have been easily
known otherwise. Yet, it was possible also
that he might have obtained all he knew by
honest and proper channels. I therefore only
replied,
That it was indeed true that the daughter
of Onias looked with great hope to Jesus, that
he would prove himself both prophet and king;
nay, though he were only prophet, she would
not refuse to own him as the Christ, did other
proofs conspire.
Ah, said the King, that comes of her
Samaritan rearing; she is foolish as her
ancestors
,
who, denying the Prophets, who alone
foreshow the Christ, are a people accursed.
But, Julian, we stray from what we were
saying
.
Lest, then, the people should cling too
closely to Jesus, and overlook some of the
reasons
that may readily be urged against his
claims, and lest the hindrances thrown in his
way by the rulers and priests should not be
sufficiently availing, it shall not be my fault if
there be not thickly scattered over the land,
wherever this Nazarene shall wander with his
fishermen, those who shall sow in the minds of
the people seed of another sort, and pluck up,
as they may, what he hath planted, and stir
into
the mass of those whom he shall gather
together
a leaven, that shall cause it to move and
heave, if not to my rising, to his falling. I
might perhaps and with safety, as I just now said,
leave this whole office to the Pharisees, priests,
and to Jesus himself; it can hardly be doubtful
to what issue events would come. But as it is
a pleasure, in a remote retreat, still to use
instruments
by which at a distance great designs
of others are rendered abortive, so I cannot
wholly refrain from doing as I have hinted; but
chiefly, you will not doubt, Julian, that I am
moved to such endeavors that thereby the great
Jehovah may be honored, the coming of the
true kingdom of God be promoted and hastened,
and those defeated, who, without other authority
than that of their own bewildered fancy, and
the cries of a blinded populace, think to step in
and thwart his purposes. While I live, and
reign, let me be true to the Law, to the
Prophet
who gave the Law, and to God who
gave the Prophet.
I still ventured to urge a further delay, and
on the ground, that as we could not know all
the purposes and plans of Jehovah, so we could
not feel sure that Jesus was not the Son of God,
revealing himself to the people in the way, not
in which we had been taught to expect him,
but in a way appointed by him who sent him.
There were indeed as yet no marks of such a
character and office to be seen in him, nor had
he declared to any one that he had come as the
Christ; but it was not to be denied that he was
invested with divine powers, that he was already
possessed of a portion of the spirit of God,
which, truly, the people look for as making a
part of what shall constitute their king; and
who therefore can say that he may not even yet,
notwithstanding the present appearances, give
those signs, whether in heaven or on earth,
unequivocal and convincing, that shall prove
him to be the Christ. He who can heal the
sick, and convert water into wine, and to limbs
withered and dead restore life and strength,
and all by a word of the mouth, it is plain, has
only to exert the same power in other
directions
and to other ends, to stand before the
people
in a blaze of glory, the dispenser of honors
and wealth, the leader of innumerable hosts,
the resistless conqueror, before whose arm,
nerved with the energy of God, and bearing
the thunderbolts of the Omnipotent, earthly
power, though that of Rome with all the world
in league, would sink and fade, as mists in the
rays of the morning sun.
Herod seemed to be struck, as I spoke these
things, with their reasonableness, and as I
ended, I rejoiced to find him not too much
wedded to his own opinion, to say so.
13*
That is all possible; he said; it cannot
be denied it is all possible;  Jesus may yet
put forth an energy that has not been seen or
suspected, and show himself to be all the
nation is looking and asking for. We learn too
that there is not only mildness, but dignity and
greatness also in his carriage, not unworthy a
king. Herod paused, and for a few moments
remained buried in thought, but from his
musing
suddenly broke forth with vehemence,
No, young man, no, it cannot be so. This
is all idle dreaming. A Nazarene mechanic, a
carpenter and the son of a carpenter, can never
be king of Israel. I fear him not. Prophet
he may be, Elias he may be, but not the Christ.
The work of Messiah is one,  one chiefly,
and for which there is little meetness in this
lamb-like peasant of Galilee. So too, I
believe
,
the people will soon discover, as well as
the scribes and priests. But enough of this.
Let us now forth; I would show thee, Julian,
that in Tiberias not less than in Machrus are
there proofs many and convincing, that the
Tetrarch of Galilee needs but to use the
strength he has, to be hailed king of Israel! I
will show thee the secret treasures of
Tiberias
.
So saying he called upon me to follow him,
and leaving the palace for the city, we there
entered the citadel, and in vaults and secret
apartments and buildings, bearing without no
signs of the purposes to which they were
devoted
,
I beheld immense collections of all the
implements of war.
These, said Herod, with more than
these in Sepphoris, are an ample supply for all
the northern portion of the land, as those in
Machrus and at Herodium are for all the
southern. Let there be Jewish arms and hands
to wield these instruments of death, with stout
Jewish hearts behind these coats of mail, and
the empire of Rome will quickly be at an end,
not in Syria alone, but the East. Yes, Julian,
in the East. Not with more certainty will
Sejanus
reign in Rome, than will Herod Antipas
in Jerusalem; and not with a wider sway will
Sejanus stretch his sceptre over Europe and the
West, than will Herod over Asia and the East.
And, that the last rivet may be driven into the
compact that makes all this to be so, would I
soon have thee, Julian, as hath been already
agreed, hie thee to Rome; there, with the
knowledge which thou more than any other in
Judea possessest, to complete what has been
well begun. Sejanus, though no model of
virtue, is yet as I think in public affairs to be
trusted. But if one may rarely trust himself,
without some misgivings, much less, surely,
may he another. Wherefore, it will be thy
more especial office, while in Rome, to contrive
every most secret and unsuspected avenue to
the soul of Sejanus, that his heart may be
perfectly
read, and the agreement or disagreement
that exists between his words and his real
purposes
be discovered.
I said that all that could be done in honor to
reach the designs of Sejanus I would not
hesitate
to attempt.
In honor! said Herod, honor toward
such as Sejanus? Hath he observed such rules
towards others? And shall these come between
a nation and its redemption?
Because Sejanus, I answered, regards
not the purity of his soul, can surely be no good
reason why I should bring a stain upon mine;
and if it be that Judea or Herod can be saved
only by transgressing such rules, then may
they sink into the ruin that awaits and becomes
them.
At first Herod seemed, as I spoke, as if his
passions were about to rise as when I was in
Machrus; but the expression of his
countenance
suddenly changed, and as I ended, he
said laughing,
By the soul of my father, but that is well
and bravely said. Violate surely, young man,
no rule of truth and honor, that is really such;
we would not have thee. Yet are there many,
by the world, falsely esteemed such.
Transgress
these, and thou dost but the more
sacredly
observe the others. This is the sin I would
have thee commit; no other.
We now returned to the palace.
That I may aid him in many affairs, in which
I also now have an interest as well as every
other Jew, Herod solicits me to remain for a
season at Tiberias. This I gladly consent to
do, that I may know more, through a nearer
intercourse, of this strange man, and become
acquainted also with this region of the country,
especially with the shores of this beautiful
lake. I shall hope also to wander as far as
Csarea Philippi, the capital of Herod Philip.
XIX.
Marvel
not, my mother, that I thus consent
to remain in Tiberias and in the service of
Herod, while, as you well know, I incline so
strongly towards Jesus. My accounts of
Jesus
have made not a deeper impression on your
mind than I should have looked for; and I
am not surprised that in your last epistle you
advise that I should for a time withdraw from
Herod and Onias, and seek out the new Prophet,
and follow him for a season at least, that by my
own observation and hearing I may make up
my judgment concerning his real character and
purposes. This assuredly I shall do, if no clear
and decisive judgment is made and proclaimed
by the people, or by those who have already
made the observations which I am hoping to
do. In the mean time I am becoming thoroughly
acquainted with the affairs and plans of Herod,
to which, after all, perhaps, it is most probable
I shall join myself. Besides this also, so
constantly
do we receive intelligence of the
movements
of Jesus, and of the progress he makes,
and the opinions he declares, and the miracles
he performs, that it sometimes seems to me that
my means of a right judgment are as many
and as trustworthy here, as if I were among
the multitudes who throng his steps. Many of
his sayings are becoming common, and are
treasured up in the memory, or by others
written
down, that they may be the better
preserved
,
corrected, and enlarged by additions
from future sources of information. The zeal
in his behalf has been and is now almost
universal
;
scarce any save the chief men among
the sect of the Pharisees, and among the scribes
and priests of Jerusalem, doubting that
whatever
may be his present appearance, conduct,
and even language, he will in no long time
break forth in all the glory of our expected
Prince. Yet there are those, who hitherto have
firmly believed, yet now are perplexed or
doubtful
their perplexities and doubts springing, as
far as I can at present discover, from the
language
which Jesus uses respecting the Law, his
disregard of the Sabbath, and the slight he
casts upon those who are at the head both of
religious and civil affairs, and to whom, were
he really Messiah, he would, they think,
certainly
attach himself.
After many days devoted to the affairs of
Herod, I at length obtained the freedom which
I had long desired, to visit the villages
scattered
along this western shore of the lake,
and especially Capernaum at its head, where
Jesus has dwelt much of the time since his
baptism, and where he has performed many of
his miracles; and Bethsaida, about midway
between
Tiberias and Capernaum, whence, as I
learn, Jesus hath drawn many of his followers.
Alone, on foot, with my staff in my hand,
did I perform this journey, keeping for the most
part on the very shores of the lake, turning
aside into the villages only for purposes of
shelter
and rest by night.
Nowhere, as I believe, my mother, could the
traveller enjoy more of what is both beautiful
and grand in the works of God, than on the
shores of this little inland sea. As I left
Tiberias
with my face to the north, I beheld the
lake in its whole length, embedded, as it were,
among lofty mountains, some approaching close
to the very edge of the water, and terminating
in abrupt precipices, others sloping gradually
down with a plain between their roots and the
lake, where roofs and towering pinnacles
glittering
in the sun from out the midst of groves,
betrayed the sites of fortress, village, and city.
Rising high over all the nearer hills, and
reigning
as kings over dependent princes, shone the
snowy tops of Lebanon, with a blaze of light
too bright for the eye to look upon without
pain. Genesareth lay among these hills, calm
and unruffled, save by the occasional stirring of
a summer breeze, as it slowly swept over it, or
by the passing across of the fishermen's boats,
as they went forth to cast their nets, or were
returning laden with their rich spoils. Although
the heat of the sun was great, yet by seeking
the shelter of occasional groves, or the ledges
of rock overhanging the very brink of the
water
,
I kept on my way without interruption or
discomfort,  on the other hand enjoying in
the highest degree the air, the prospect, the
water, and, above all, the freedom of motion of
which this kind of travelling may boast over all
others. Often, and with no other reason than
because it then pleased me to do so, I lingered
at the root of some heavy-leafed tree, where it
flung its dark shadows over my path and on the
edge of the water, or I lay along upon some
smooth rock, and looking down into the clear
depths of the lake, observed the sportings of
the fish below, or watched the insects
skimming
waywardly the sleeping surface,  no
slow-paced mule, hard-going camel, or fleet
Arabian would I have accepted, to be deprived
of such pleasures. Time, I indeed wasted, or
lost; but wisdom, as I think, I gained, and was
satisfied with the exchange.
VOL. II. 14
I soon reached Magdala, then passed
Bethsaida
,
just visible on the west, standing far from
the shores of the lake, and before the sun had
reached his highest point, drew nigh to
Capernaum
at its extreme northern limit. When I
was yet about two Roman miles from the town,
still keeping to the very shores of the lake,
but desiring, on account of the heat of the day
and weariness, to reach it soon, that I might
obtain rest, and the refreshment I greatly
needed
,
I observed a boat, guided by two fishermen,
making toward the shelter of some projecting
rocks near which I was walking. While I
stood watching their motions, they reached the
shore, and leaping from their boat drew it up
upon the sand. Not doubting that from them I
could obtain information concerning Capernaum,
and a knowledge of the shortest path thereto,
I approached them and made such inquiries as
I wished. They replied with civility,
informing
me of the inn at which I should stop, and
pointing out the shortest road. But, said
the elder of the two, why friend shouldst
thou not rest here with us, while the sun beats
down so hot, and partake with us of our
noonday
meal  thou shalt be very welcome. I
replied, that nothing could be more agreeable,
as I was both fatigued with the way and weak
through want of food. Seat thyself then,
said the other, on yonder rock within the
shadows
of the overhanging cliff, and thou shalt
soon feast upon better fish than ever were
drawn from the Great Sea, or any other.
So saying, he and his companion employed
themselves in first covering over with fresh
leaves the fish they had caught, and then in
lighting a fire of wood gathered from among
the loose rocks, and preparing the frugal repast.
The fish were soon broiling over the coals and
the fragrant smoke spreading around a foretaste
of the more solid enjoyment to follow. The
cooked food, with but brief delay, was then
spread upon a smooth rock which seemed as if
it had long served for the same purpose, a loaf
was added from the boat, and a cruse of water
drawn from a spring in the dark recesses of the
cave or grotto, at the mouth of which we sat;
Now, said the elder fisherman, the
dinner
is ready, approach and eat; but first let us
give thanks. So in few but reverent words,
and with uplifted face he acknowledged the
providence of the Ruler of the world, and the
God of Israel.
I perceive, said he as we ate, that you
come by the way of Bethsaida and the
southern
part of the Lake.
I said, even from Tiberias.
I thought so much said the other; for
though you carry in your countenance something
of the Jew, yet it shows as if you might have
sprung of some of the mixed races, whom
Herod compelled within the walls of Tiberias
to people his new city. But if you come from
Tiberias
,
doubtless you can tell us news of what
Herod is now doing. Many reports are abroad,
but we can only guess.
I left him, I said, within the city, quietly
dwelling within the walls of his palace.
Ah, said the other, it is not by knowing
where Herod now is, or about what he seems
to be employed, that one can come at the truth.
He is a man of many faces. What we hear is,
yet no one knows anything with certainty, nor
can trace the first springing of the rumor, that
he is laying, in secret, plans for seizing the
sovereignty
of Judea  that many take him for the
Christ who is to come, and hope through him
to see the deliverance of the country.
I said that I knew well that such things were
whispered, but that at Tiberias no open signs
were apparent of such movements, nor did the
people there, though so near the Tetrarch, have
any more certain knowledge of what had been
spoken about, than he himself. Still more,
Pilate and the Roman powers seemed to
suspect
nothing. How would the people of these
parts, I asked, affect him, should such rumors
prove to be well founded.
He might find a few followers here, he
answered
,
but not many, so long as John and
Jesus are abroad among us. This youth, my
partner, would join him, but so would not I.
The young man, in reply to my question how
he had come to a knowledge of Herod's
purposes
,
said that it had been through his
messengers
whom he employed and who were
scattered over Judea. As I judge, said he,
by means of such messengers he will spread
a knowledge of his plans throughout the whole
land, and will so work against both John and
Jesus, that they will ere long be driven from
the land.
There 's a young hopeful for you, said
the elder Fisherman; so caught away is he
with these notions, that it is with much ado I
secure now and then a day's service at the
nets or the line.
Said the younger, we must bear with one
another; the times are rent with opinions,
families divided among themselves, and the
wisest perplexed.
God forbid it should be otherwise,
Nathaniel
,
said the elder, yet much I fear me that
ere long trouble will spring up in Israel, and
the implements of the husbandman and the
fisherman be beaten into swords and spears.
I asked him why he thought so; I could see
no immediate signs of war.
14*
Who doubts, said he, what is rumored
of Herod? Nought indeed can be affirmed
with confidence; even Pilate, as thou hast said,
seems not apprehensive; but though little is
seen, none, who know the Tetrarch as well as
his subjects in Galilee, would take that as a
proof that there is nothing to be seen. His
presence and power are everywhere, and
everywhere
discernible by those who, as I do,
mingle
with many people of all classes and
opinions
.
Of late truly his activity has been less.
I was surprised to find that so much was
known, or so shrewdly guessed, of the plans
and movements of Herod. But desirous to
learn what I could from this man, who,
notwithstanding
his occupation, seemed to be one
of those, destined by nature to be the instructors
and guides of others, I asked him why he
supposed
the activity of Herod to be less now?
Without doubt, he replied, because of
the multitudes who throng after Jesus of
Nazareth
.
Whatever are or have been the purposes
of Herod, they must perforce now be laid aside,
seeing that other sounds and louder have filled
the ears of the people. Ah, Sir, there were
little chance for Herod, would Jesus only
declare
himself. The people urge him to do so;
but no such urgency has prevailed. While we
cannot doubt that he is a prophet of God,
seeing
what his power is, yet will he give no sign,
not to be mistaken, that he is the Christ.
Why, I asked, are you so sure that he is
a prophet of God? Is there no room for
deception
?
It may suit the purpose of some, he
answered
,
to call him deceiver, and to give his
works to Beelzebub; but no one, who has
himself
seen and heard, can in his heart doubt
whence proceed his wisdom and his power.
And have you, I asked, seen and heard
him?
Oh, Sir, often. Since his appearance after
the baptism in the Jordan, he hath dwelt in our
village; and who is there in Capernaum that
knoweth him not, and hath not seen and heard
him? He journeys often indeed into the parts
round about, and has lately been at the Feast
in Jerusalem, and is now absent teaching in the
towns near Samaria, but when these journeys
are over, then he dwells in our town, and gladly
do we hail his return.
And doth he mingle freely with the people,
so that they are permitted to know him.
Freely, most freely, doth he mingle with
all who, with honest purposes, seek to hear him;
none are so poor, or so humble, but he is ready
to do them good, by giving them the instruction
they need, or by healing their diseases. From
among such as these,  such as myself,  has he
chosen his chief friends, those who are always
with him. Our neighbors in the village, and our
neighbors equally on the lake, Simon and his
brother Andrew, fishermen as we are, not richer
than we, nor higher in the world, has he drawn to
himself; and those who once join him, it is
certain
will never leave him, with such veneration
and love doth he inspire them. I had followed
him myself, Sir, but for my family, whom I
could not leave. Never am I so happy as when
I listen to his words, in the synagogue on the
Sabbath, or there wherever it may be, in the
street or here on the shore of the lake, that he
speaks to the people who hang upon his steps.
Ah! how different his words from the rulers
and scribes! Never did man speak as he doth; it
seems, indeed, as if we heard the voice of God
rather than man! There seems a power of truth
in him beyond and greater than that of our
Scriptures
.
When he hath read from the Prophets
or from the Law, and then closing the volume
hath spoken himself, our hearts have burned
within us, and we have said to ourselves, who
can he be who is greater than Moses and the
Prophets?
Who, indeed! I said, rather to myself
than to the fisherman. But he heard me and
asked eagerly,
Do you then believe in him?
And what, I asked, do you mean by
believing
in him?
Surely, he answered, believe him to be
the Messiah, the prophet foretold as to appear in
these latter days, and redeem Israel from
bondage
.
How else should I mean?
I said, I knew not enough yet to warrant
me in believing that, and asked him if he
himself
believed.
He answered and said, I do believe; yet
I know that in doing so, I believe rather
because
I will believe, than because I find a
proof that satisfies me. Jesus hath not
himself
said that he is the Christ, so at least say
some, and if we believe him to be so, we
believe
in more than he himself affirms of
himself
.
Yet cannot I help but believe. Not
doubting him to be a prophet of God, I cannot
doubt he will be more than that.
Yet how can you be so sure, I asked
again, that he is a prophet of God and no
deceiver
?
There have been many deceivers, who
have misled the people. Is it because of his
miracles? But may not evil spirits show such
power through a man? or is not magic equal to
such things?
I believe him to be of God, answered the
fisherman, partly because of his miracles, and
partly because of himself. What you say, Sir,
is very true, that miracles may be wrought by
evil spirits, and some, perhaps, but not such as
those of Jesus, by magic. Wherefore, when I
resorted to Jesus, being at first drawn to him, I
confess, by the noise made by his wonderful
works, I gave not my faith until I had heard
his doctrine, and found it to be such as
was altogether worthy of God; and then
observed
his character and manner of life, and
found that they also were altogether god-like.
Of this agreement and fitness I think we are
capable to judge; for is it reasonable to
suppose
that God hath given man power to know
what food is nutritious to the body, and
wholesome
,
and hath not given power also to know
what truth is nutritious to the soul, wholesome
and divine, worthy of God to send and man to
receive? So, when I found that Jesus was so
holy in himself, and so divine in the excellence
of his doctrines, then I felt sure that his works
could be done by no other spirit or power than
a divine spirit and power, and I believed that
he was a Prophet. But what I have now
said in many words, was perhaps with me
as it is, I doubt not, with most, the work of, as
it were, a moment. For so do the
countenance
,
the manner, and the first words of Jesus
fall upon and convince the soul, that a
persuasion
,
that he is honest and true, comes as soon
as sight and hearing, and the miracle, which
we then witness, we are sure is from God. We
then receive him as a teacher come from God,
and his words and doctrine, whatsoever they
may be, as the words and doctrine of God.
Your faith, then, I said, rests on the
works of Jesus.
Surely it doth, he answered; his virtues
and his doctrine, how excellent soever, could do
no more than show that he was worthy to have
come from God; not that he had come
from him; for we know not how far the
wisdom
of a mere man may reach, nor how high
his virtues may climb; but we do know that a
man cannot do the works of Jesus, except God
be with him, or else the spirit of Beelzebub;
and a good man worketh not by the help of an
evil spirit.
Yet, said I, there are not a few now, as
I hear, who say that the works of Jesus are
done by an evil spirit, and not by the spirit of
God.
Among us in Capernaum there are but few
such, replied the fisherman, and they are of
the leaders among the Pharisees, who
themselves
,
when Jesus first appeared, were the first
to believe, and to cry out Christ! Christ is
come! and throng about him with their knee
and mouth worship. Of the people there is
not one who holdeth him not to be of God.
But why did the Pharisees and scribes
forsake him then, I asked, except they
were persuaded he was a deceiver, and that
they had reasons of weight to offer against him?
Who in the villages of Judea are of a better
power to judge in such things than they?
Many things, he replied, in the
doctrines
and manners of Jesus helped to offend
them, and turn them against him. He would
not flatter them, or bend to them, because of
their office; but chose rather to consort with
the good, however humble they might be, and
even with gentiles and sinners of every kind,
so they came to him sincerely desiring to
listen
to him. Moreover he loosened, instead of
drawing closer and tighter the bonds of outward
worship and rite, teaching that God judges by
the state of the heart, and not by the number of
a man's washings and sacrifices; and when he
wished to show the people the difference
between
a painted outside and a pure heart,
he would draw a picture of a Pharisee
relying
on the exactness of his observances, and
of a publican, or a gentile, doing good
actions
,
and then trusting to the mercy of God,
and would justify the latter rather than the
former. Openly too has he rebuked these
Pharisees for what all the world knows them to
be chargeable with, their covetousness and unjust
exactions. All which, and much more that it
would weary you, Sir, to hear, enraged them,
and the very man they were a little while ago
exalting as the Son of God and King of Israel,
they now upbraid as a child of the devil, and a
minister of Satan  though Jesus stands among
us the same as at first. So that the people
value not their judgment at the weight of a
fish's scale, but see plainly enough that it is all
a piece of malice, and revenge.
It seems, said I, to be indeed as you
say.
Be assured, said the other, that it is so.
You may safely believe, added the
younger
,
what Simeon has said; all in
Capernaum
would confirm it. I follow not Jesus
as the Christ,  nor do I think he will ever
prove to be that person. He hath no fitness for
such a trust, as I judge; but who shall doubt,
who hath but once seen him, that he is a Son
of God, and a Prophet of Jehovah? He, who
should deny the works of Jesus, would deny the
voice of God, though God spake in his very
ear. Let Herod save Israel from Rome and
deliver her, and then shall both John and Jesus,
as Elijah and Elisha teach and rebuke, and be
to the people through their instructions as a
savor of life to the dying.
VOL. II. 15
Herod! forsooth; cried the elder with some
indignation. Who shall be found in Israel to
put their trust in him? I marvel at thee more
and more Simeon, that thou shouldst cleave to
him  that thou shouldst hold to a man of
violence
and crime. Verily might Israel despair
were her reliance on any of that wicked name.
Would that Jesus without delay would declare
himself, and this Herodian faction would
vanish
as the mists of the lake at the breaking
forth of the sun. And did he but know what
their designs are and how busily and secretly
they pursue them, sure I am, it would move
him to yield to those who urge him so to do.
He knows well of the Herodians, said
his companion, and has warned the people
against them and their leader; so learned I but
yesterday, from one who was just from the
Feast. But, if I may prophecy, Jesus will
himself be sooner forsaken, than Herod. I see
not who bind themselves to Jesus but the
poorer sort. Crowds of these are at his steps,
and doubtless they truly honor him, but what
staff are they, to lean upon in a great enterprise
such as that of the Messiah.
I trow, replied the elder, they will help
Jesus as much and as securely on the way to
greatness, as Herod's vices will him. What a
besotted people are these of Judah and
Jerusalem
,
to deem that any good thing can prosper
in the hands of a bad man; and who worse
than Antipas? Cunning and cruel! and who
at this very time is about to make himself
doubly an adulterer.
I confess, my mother, I felt the blood to
tingle
in my veins, and mount to my cheeks at
the honest anger of this humble man, while I,
looking only at ends, had too much blinded
myself to the steps I was taking to reach them.
As the fisherman ended, and his partner was
about to reply as it seemed to me with some
passion, there came one running toward us,
along the shore in haste as if to communicate
somewhat of moment.
The lad who runs, said the fisherman,
has the likeness of my son Judah; yet why
should he make such speed in the hot sun. It
may be that Jesus hath returned to
Capernaum
.
In the mean time the lad came up to us, as
we still sat at our meal.
And what is the news? asked the father.
The son of Phasael! said the youth as
he could find his breath.
Is he dead? cried Nathaniel, he lay this
morning at the point of death.
Not so, said the other, but alive and
well.
Hath Jesus returned then?
No, yet hath he healed him, himself being
at Cana.
Friend, said the fisherman, go with us,
let us behold this wonder.
Binding on my parcel, and seizing my staff
I hastened along with them. As we approached
and entered the village we saw, by the
commotion
and the running to and fro, that a strange
thing had happened, in which the whole people
were alike concerned. All were forsaking their
employments and hurrying in one direction to
have the testimony of their own eyes, to the
wonderful thing that had been reported. When
we arrived at the dwelling of Phasael  an
officer
of Herod's government  we could by no
means approach it by reason of the throng, for
it seemed that the whole town had run together
into one place. But though we could not
obtain
near access to the house, yet could we
easily behold the young man who had been
cured, and who now come forth upon the
housetop
and showed himself to the people; and we
could hear the declaration of his parents, that
at the same hour that Jesus had spoken the
word in Cana, the young man's fever had left
him. We were filled with awe, my mother, as
you may believe, at the recital and the
observation
of such things. I felt as if then and
there God was among us and around us in some
extraordinary manifestations of his presence.
In low tones the people expressed their wonder
one to another, and then in silence withdrew
again from the place to their homes. The
fishermen
urging upon me, as the day was now
drawn to its close, to tarry with them in their
humble abode, I hesitated not, but accepting,
with many thanks, their hospitality, accompanied
them to their dwelling.
When the evening had come on, many of
the neighbors gathered together with us, and
the hours were passed in much further
conversation
and dispute concerning John, Herod,
and Jesus.
At the early dawn I was awakened by the
host, and after partaking with him and his wife
and children the morning repast, set forward on
my way, returning not as I had come, but, at
the instance of the fisherman, by the way of
villages lying removed from the lake, among
which were Cana and Nazareth. For thy
pleasure merely, said he, I could wish thee
to keep ever on the shores of Genesareth,
where thine eye can dwell upon finer things
than can be found elsewhere in Judea, and
where thou canst both behold the drawing in
of the fishermen's nets, with the passage of
their boats along the lake, and also feast upon
15*
the rich dainties they fetch up from the lower
waters. Whose life shall compare with a
fisherman's
on the lake of Galilee? But because
I would have thee see Jesus and hear him, for
thine own sake and Judea's, I commend to thee
this other road; and it will be strange if either
at Nazareth or Cana, thou do not find him, or
else at some point on the highway. Take with
thee, friend, the counsel of one who has seen
many years, and forsake the society, and the
cause of Herod. He cannot aid the cause of
God in one way, who hinders it in another.
I replied to the fisherman, that I would not
forget his counsel though I could not promise
to follow it, and bidding him farewell,
addressed
myself to the pleasures of the road.
These I found to be well worth the seeking.
The morning air was cool and invigorating, and
the earth in all directions burdened with a
vegetation uninjured by droughts, which in this
climate often destroy the hopes of the
husbandman
,
and promising the richest returns to
the granary. Indeed the earlier grains are
already ripe, and the fields yielding before the
sickle of the reaper. Frequent villages and
scattered dwellings separated by groves, or by
an occasional barren track of rock and sand,
afforded every variety of object which the
mind could desire; and much additional
information
of every sort did I gather from those
whom I overtook on the way, and walked and
conversed with, or from those by whom I was
entertained in the villages. The highways
were filled with persons who, after resorting to
Jesus for many days that he had remained in
Cana and the towns round about, were, now
that he had departed for another region,
returning
to their homes.
From conversations with many of these,
I learned that Jesus, having left Cana, had gone
toward the sea-coast; but that while in this
neighborhood he had performed many
miracles
by which the people had been
astonished
,
and had been brought to believe in
him, notwithstanding so many things make
against him. They were persuaded he would
yet show himself to be the Christ. They
were simple country people, with whom I for
the most part talked, and they could give no
better or other reason for the faith they were
disposed to rest in him, than that they thought
him a good man, who would not deceive those
who came to him, and it would be a great
deception
if he raised in them a belief, that he
was the Christ and suffered it to take root in
them, when he was not that great Prophet.
They had heard many things indeed from him,
which they could not understand, and many
things which, if they heard them aright, made
it indeed not easy to see how he should be the
Christ who was to come into the world, seeing
they were in opposition to the Law, and placed
the Romans and all others as high in the favor
of God as the Jew; moreover, he seemed not
in any respect to justify such acts, as those by
which the kingdom of God and of Israel must
be established, if it ever be established. Yet,
whenever he had spoken of righteousness, and
what pertains to a man's life and his soul, they
had comprehended him, and acknowledged a
wisdom surpassing that of man and belonging
only to one who, like Aaron, was the mouthpiece
of God; so that they still believed. Among other
questions which I put to them, I asked, if he
had warned the people against Herod. They said
that he had not failed to do so; he seemed to
know well what every body guesses, that Herod
is working in secret throughout Israel, although
it be so that no one can point to any open act
of his, and that Herod himself seems to be
employed
in quite other affairs, with getting him a
new wife, and preparing to make war with the
king of Arabia. Jesus spoke as if these were not
his real designs; but there were quite others
which he was aiming to carry on  to favor
which he was covertly using every means to gain
the hearts of the people. When I further asked
what they themselves supposed such designs to
be, they hesitated not, but believed that he was
aiming at the throne of Israel. And they could
not doubt that Jesus entertained the same
opinion
,
and that it was to put the nation on its
guard against him that he had spoken.
These, and other things which I learned on
the way of such as I fell in with, greatly
increased
my desire to see Jesus, and my sorrow
that he had turned from Cana toward the
sea-coast
,
instead of the East and the Jordan, as I
had hoped he would do. I, however, kept on
my way in the direction I had first marked out,
as I could not prolong my absence without
failing in my promises to Herod.
As the day declined I drew near to Nazareth,
which, lying to the south of high hills, was not
visible from the quarter in which I approached
it, until winding about among many valleys and
narrow passes, and last crossing a precipitous
ridge, I at length suddenly came upon it,
situated
nearly at the foot of a hill, or rather where
its last slope falls by sharp pitches into the
plain, but having a mountainous region shutting
it in on every side, and lofty abrupt precipices
rising directly in its rear. The scene presented
to the eye objects well calculated to delight and
impress the mind of one who should dwell
among them, no part of it being tame and flat,
but either grand through the wildness of many
of the hills, where no vegetation could fix a
root by reason of the soil, rocky and worn
away by descending torrents, or else beautiful
on account of the diligent cultivation of the
husbandman, or the groves of every variety of
tree and shrub, which covered the plain, and
flourished as it seemed with redoubled
luxuriance
,
as a return for the riches of which the
annual rains had robbed the surrounding
heights and spread around their roots.
The sun was not far above the hills on the
western side of this happy valley, shedding his
last rays on tower, and village, and bleak hill
top, as I entered, weary with the hot and dusty
way, the outskirts of the town. The houses of
the rural population grew more frequent, as I
drew near, each with its cultivated ground
near it, a part always covered with the fig,
the olive, and the date. At the doors or seated
beneath the surrounding trees, were the
inhabitants
engaged in the various arts of domestic
life, or else, their labor for the day being done,
reposing in the shade or sporting with
children
,
who here as everywhere seemed freely
given of nature as man's best solace, and most
effectual teachers. One of these humble
dwellings
especially drew my attention from the
greater pleasantness of its situation, though
otherwise
it differed little from those that were in its
neighborhood. An olive orchard covered it on
one side, fig trees stood thickly around, and
almost
was the form of the cottage concealed by
vines which had grown over it, burying it in a
profusion of leaf and flower. But what chiefly
fastened my gaze and made me here pause that
I might put the inquiries necessary to my
further
progress, was the form and countenance of
one who seemed the mother of the family, and
who sat at the distaff in the entrance of the
dwelling  younger members of the
household
and children sitting or playing around.
For the face was one, which, as it was turned
upon me on my approach, at once inspired
confidence
as well as raised admiration. It was
not a matter of choice whether I should accost
her, since before I had made any determination
concerning what I should do, I found myself
drawn away from the path I had been
pursuing
,
and standing before her. Then, it was
only with hesitating utterance, that I asked
concerning the village, the distance thereto,
and made such other inquiries as were needful.
She had risen as I spoke moving from where
she had sat, as if to make way for my entrance
within the house. Hardly waiting for me to
finish my inquiries, she said,
You are already weary with the dust and
travel of the road, and it is yet many a rood to
the heart of the town, enter then and here rest,
and be refreshed; when thou hast washed and
eaten then thou shalt go on or tarry as thou
wilt.
With many thanks I accepted these
hospitable
offers. My sandals were soon removed,
the vessels for washing made ready, loose and
flowing garments adapted to this hot region
woven of the lightest threads, yet of a plain
and homely material, were brought, and in no
long time I was again vigorous, it seemed to
me, as at early dawn.
As the table was now spread by youthful
hands and covered with the food, easily
prepared
,
of these regions, the mother said, Our
fathers, Sir, when they dwelt in tents, never
shut the door against the stranger; the hot cake
and the seethed kid ever smoked upon their
board. It is little for us to do to imitate them
who dwell in fixed habitations.
Yet it were not reason, I answered, that
from their descendants of this age should be
exacted the hospitality which distinguished
them, seeing that in their time the people were
few in number, and a stranger or foreign
trafficker
was rarely seen, and when seen he was
indeed very heartily welcome, inasmuch as he
brought news of foreign parts, of which
knowledge
could be had in no other way. As much
was received as given.
So saying, Sir, you take away from our
fathers the virtue of their action.
Not so, I answered. It was not the less
virtuous that it was sometimes and by accident
rewarded, else the care of a mother, who sees
the fruit of her toil in the virtues of her child,
would lose its merit. Many are our acts which
carry their reward along with them, and we
must forbear the acts or consent to do them
with the knowledge that a reward will follow.
But surely this is different from the case of the
Pharisee, who prays that he may be seen, or
gives alms when he would withhold them but
for some prospect of praise or advantage.
You speak the truth, replied the woman;
were it not so our hope of Heaven would turn
all our goodness into sin, or make it nothing
worth. But to hope for heaven we cannot help
if we would.  I marvel why my husband and
sons come not; it is the hour of supper. But
their tarrying shall bring no delay to thee;
draw near and eat.
But while she yet spoke her husband entered,
accompanied by his sons, as if returning from
the labors of the day, and when they had first
washed, placed themselves also at the board, the
daughters serving. I was bid heartily welcome
VOL. II. 16
to their humble roof by the father and his sons,
as I had been before by the mother and her
daughters, and I had passed but a little while
conversing of such things as offered, ere I felt
from the simple kindness that marked all their
words and demeanor, that I was among such
as both feared God and loved their neighbor.
As soon as it was learned that I had come from
the lake and through Cana, the mother asked
if I had seen Jesus in Cana, or in either of the
villages on the road.
I answered that I had not, although it was in
the hope to find him, that I had departed from
Genesareth in my return to Tiberias.
Are you then, she asked again with
earnestness
,
one of his followers, and do you
believe
in him?
I said that I was by no means a follower or
believer, although on the way I had fallen
in with many such.
I had hoped, she replied, that you
believed
,
for it seems as if your judgment would
be honest. But after a moment's pause she
added, you have said that you are from
Jordan
and the neighborhood of Beth-Harem, what
think they in those regions.
I said that there, as all along on the borders
of the lake, the greater part of the people
believed
in him; or stood waiting and ready to
believe, as soon as some sign more distinct
and plain should be given them, that he is
indeed
the Person for whom they look. But I could
not deny that for the reason that such signs had
been delayed, many were losing their trust in
him, giving in to the opinions of the leaders
among the Pharisees, who were not only
opposed
to him, but exceeding bitter.
I do not see, replied the mother, why
they should be bitter against him or seek his
harm; he himself surely does no one harm, but
is gentle toward all, save toward those whom he
well knows to be hypocrites, and is full of
benevolent
deeds. I never will doubt that God
is with him.
It certainly, I here said, will make
against his success with the people, if it be true,
as has been lately rumored, that you of
Nazareth
do not believe in him, and more than that,
that you have even attempted his destruction.
It ought not, said the mother quickly, it
ought not to make against him any more than
it ever should against a good man, that the
wicked rail. Such railing is to his honor. It
is on the part of the Nazarenes nought but
envy.
But, I rejoined, the people of distant
places say, if they of Nazareth, who have
known him from his youth up, reject him, how
can any believe?
And surely, said one of the sons, they
say it with reason.
I cannot think so, Judas, rejoined his
mother. The people of Nazareth hold it ill,
that one of themselves, no better and no richer
they say than themselves, should set himself
up as a teacher. They will not listen to such
an one. Who were they who set upon him in
the synagogue, and would willingly, in their
rage, have cast him from off the precipice, but
persons whom we well know, and well know to
have been moved by no better spirit than I have
named? The rumor was a true one, which
you heard, Sir, but it would not sway your mind
against Jesus, did you know better the heart of
these men of Nazareth; surely, methinks, to
deserve their hatred is to be the more secure of
the favor of God.
But, said I, it is even reported, and I
myself heard it at Capernaum, that the family of
Jesus, his parents and brethren, believe not in
him, but are as the other inhabitants of the place,
which I confess filled me with astonishment, and
caused me to think otherwise than I had been
inclined to do of those who in other parts of
the country turn away from him.
Do you not know then, said the father
of the family, that we are the parents of Jesus,
and these his brethren and sisters?
Truly I knew it not, I replied, but I am
rejoiced that a happy chance has thrown me
among those whom it was my chief purpose in
journeying through Nazareth to seek out. I
bless God, who has guided me to your roof,
for, I doubt not, it is highly favored of him.
I am not, as I have declared already, a
believer
in your son, unless he may be called a
believer
who, though he has not seen, nevertheless
believes in his honesty and truth, that he is
all that thus far he has claimed to be. Every
thing that I have heard from the very first has
gone to persuade me that God is with him, and
that it is with his spirit and power that he is
inspired
.
And deeper down in your heart would your
faith be, said the mother of Jesus, if you
yourself knew him of whom we speak.
Nevertheless, said I, I perceive from
what you have already said, that the rumor of
which I have spoken is true, that not only do
the inhabitants of Nazareth reject Jesus, but
that some of his own family reject, or, at least,
doubt concerning him. This I confess amazes
me.
We would all, said the young man who
had spoken before, willingly believe if we
could. Yet do not imagine that the feelings of
the people of Nazareth, which my mother has
16 *
truly, as I believe, ascribed to them, are wholly
ours. It is with them envy and indignation,
that a mere mechanic, and the son of one,
should profess a wisdom beyond that of the
scribes, and assert claims so high, and an
authority
above that of the Pharisees, the Rulers, and
the Council. He has been so long their
townsman
and fellow laborer, that they cannot at
once receive him as a teacher and a ruler.
I can understand the feeling, I said.
Jesus himself, continued Judas, gave it
the right interpretation, when, as he left the
synagogne, he said, A prophet is honored
everywhere
else rather than in his own town and
among his own family and friends.
That, said I, I doubt not, is according to
our nature.
But, replied the brother, believe me
when I affirm that it is not this sentiment alone
nor chiefly, that governs his parents or
brethren
.
I said quickly, I was sure he spoke the
truth. In your very faces, I added, I
behold
the signs, which make such feelings
impossible
to you.
The Lord reward you, said the mother.
Yes, resumed the brother, the Lord bless
you for your good opinion. We have by many
been reviled, but we can think no otherwise
than our own minds will allow. We should
not be blamed for opinions which are forced
upon us against our will and our old affections.
Why then, I said, if it be not to ask
too much, do you hesitate to give a full faith to
Jesus? I would fain know whether the same
things weigh with you as with others, in other
parts of Judea.
We have not doubted hitherto, resumed the
brother, that Jesus is inspired of God. We do
not, as others, wickedly give the wonders he
performs to spirits of the dead, or to Beelzebub, of
whom and whose power we believe nothing, nor
in truth do many of those who make such
assertions
.
The whole manner of his life, as
well as the strange events at his birth, convince
us that he is highly favored of God, and by him
reserved to some mighty work.
What is reported then of his birth, and we
have all heard, may be received as true? I
said, turning as I spoke towards the mother of
Jesus.
Her countenance, radiant with faith and love,
beaming with all the marks of conscious truth,
gave silent answer to what I had asked.
Never
had I beheld in mortal woman what for
more than mortal beauty and a certain divine
charm, seemed so like a blessed angel of God.
The silence of all, as their eyes, like mine,
fastened upon her, also gave answer to my
inquiry
.
After a brief pause, Judas continued; What
it is that of late has perplexed us and caused us
against our nature and our desires to doubt, has
been the strangeness of the doctrines which Jesus
has preached, and the strangeness of his conduct.
In good truth he is no longer a Jew  he is rather
anything else  and can we hold him longer
with an unwavering persuasion to be a prophet
of God to his people, who sets aside the law
God himself gave to that people, to be an
everlasting
covenant between him and them?
Yet have I been told, I said, that he
attendeth both upon the services of the
synagogue
and at the feasts in Jerusalem; that he
of late went up to the Passover and the
Pentecost
.
You say true, replied Judas, it is so as
you have heard. But nevertheless that is true
also which I have affirmed. He preaches
indeed
in the synagogue, but what preaches he?
The Law? The Prophets? Their excellence and
everlasting dominion?  the claims of Israel to
the favor of God before all other? Not so. But
in the face of all this, his own authority he sets
up against that of Moses  the Prophets shall
pass away or be changed  the Kingdom of
God shall be thrown open to Gentile as well as
Jew! Is it to be supposed that a man from God
would come and overthrow the word and the
work of him who sent him? What can we
say, what can we do? It was hearing such
things, as well as envy, that filled the men of
Nazareth with rage and drove them mad against
him.
What make you then, I asked, of the
Miracles of Jesus? They surely show him to
be sent of God.
This also perplexes us, resumed the brother.
He does the works of God, while he assails
to overthrow it, the truth of God. How, we
ask, can these things be? As we judge, our
allegiance
to Moses and to God forbid us to
believe
.
Not quite so, interrupted the father, with
a voice of mild rebuke; Judas is carried away
by his zeal. We refuse not to believe; we
only say that we now waver and are perplexed.
We cannot reconcile the one with the other,
the miracles that he doth, and the doctrine that
he preaches, yet we trust to be able to do so.
But, said I, do not the miracles that he
does, supposing his power to be that of God,
and not of a devil,
Oh, we doubt not that his power is of
God, they all cried, interrupting me; so holy
and just a person, whom all love and honor who
know him, could receive nothing from, and
hold no communion with, a wicked spirit.
Then, I continued, do not his miracles,
which he works by God's power, show that his
docrine must be approved of God? Would not
such power be withdrawn if it were made to
substantiate aught at variance with his will
howsoever it may differ from truths previously
delivered?
Surely, said the mother, the young man
reasons aright. How shall he preach contrary
to the truth of God, who hath power to do the
works of God? It may be that by the mouth
of Jesus he would declare some new truth, not
such as shall be in violation of the Law of
Moses, but in addition to it; and truly, as I
think, there is much that passes among us as
the law given of God, which were perhaps
better
termed the false conclusions of vain and
mistaken men.
Ah, my mother, said Judas, thou art
carried
away by thy love to say things contrary to
the truth; here now wouldst thou cause the
Law, even the Law of God, to veil itself before
the wisdom of thy son Jesus! I should fear to
do that. Mayhap thou dost still hold him to be
even the Christ?
Nay, nay, Judas, exclaimed his sisters,
say not so.
Forbid him not, said the mother, I do
believe him to be the Christ. Yet ask me not
for a reason for this faith; for alas! I cannot
give it. Nay more than that, Judas, many
things that he hath said and done I
comprehend
not; I can by no means resolve. Yet
cannot I help but believe. The truest faith,
is methinks, of the heart; but it is as much
without reason, as a mother's love of her child.
And it may be, my mother, replied Judas,
that your faith shall in the end, without its
reasons, prove truer than ours, with so many
which we judge so strong. And if it would
bring a greater happiness to the mother, to
behold
her son on Messiah's throne, may her
happiness
be made complete, if it be the will of
God. But doubtless to such as judge on the
grounds which the prophets furnish, no one
thing appears so difficult to believe as that.
For save the power to do wonderful works, a
power which has been bestowed upon many,
there seems no correspondence whatsoever
between
him and the Christ. What do we, what
do the people of Israel look for in the Christ?
Verily it is one and the same thing in every
mind, a Redeemer, and a deliverer from our
bondage; who shall then reign our King and
Prophet over a kingdom without limits as
without
end. This is what the prophets have
taught, and this is what the people believe and
wait for with impatience. Is Jesus such an
one? Are there in him signs that mark the
Conqueror and King? Is there in him aught
that savors of Judas Maccabeus? or even of
Judas of Galilee? Nay, can one so much as
think of Jesus doing the deeds that must be
done when Israel shall arise and enter into her
glory? Has he not indeed, when teaching the
people, declared things which, if they be rightly
understood, make it but a sin and an offence to
seek dominion and to aspire after honor and
seats of pride and power. He commends the
humble, the meek, the peaceful, and such as
are content to submit and serve, taking heed
only to their souls, to keep them holy in the
sight of God, rebuking the contentious and
ambitious, the lovers of place and authority.
How shall such an one be the Christ of Israel?
Such precepts consist not with the character
and deeds of the Son of David. They agree
well with the character of Jesus, and no other
precepts should I ever look to hear from his
lips, and so should we all say
Yes, surely we should say it, fell from
all.
But, continued Judas, they agree not, as
I have said, with the office and work of the
Son of David.
As Judas ended, the others were silent  the
mother of Jesus buried as it seemed in many
thoughts of which no others might be sharers.
Presently as the supper was ended we went
out and sat beneath the vines, that hung over
the dwelling and stretched also from tree to tree;
the warm air and the bright heavens, thickset
with the stars of evening, inviting us where
such pleasures could be enjoyed in addition to
those of friendly discourse. Here then, when
we were seated, the father and his sons with
me, I sought to renew the conversation that
had been broken off, being desirous to learn
what I could from those who must possess in
many things a more exact knowledge than
could be found elsewhere, and who appeared
not less disposed to impart what they knew or
thought, than I was to listen to their words.
But as I had already gathered so much from
them concerning themselves and their relations
to Jesus, I began our conversation by informing
them of my own life and opinions, not
withholding
from them my conviction of what I
believed was Herod's part in the present affairs
of Judea, though by no means communicating
other things respecting him and myself, which
I was bound not to reveal. What I had said
concerning Herod was already well known to
them, as being generally known or suspected
VOL. II. 17
throughout the land, yet, nothing coming abroad,
however, with such distinctness as to give
occasion
of alarm to Pilate. With Tiberius
Herod remains in highest favor, as a fast friend
to Rome as he has ever been to Roman
customs
.
To his hostility to John and Jesus, he
takes care to give the color of friendship and
zeal for Rome, and the security of his
possessions
.
So that of designs inimical on his own
part they think not.
When I had ended, Judas said, Herod is
the bitterest foe of Jesus; not openly so, but
secretly through those whom he employs to
beset his steps, and inflame against him the
Pharisees and the people. While he supposed
Jesus to make no pretensions and lay no claim
to the office and title of Messiah, he did little
against him; but since it is affirmed that
Jesus has declared, not only as at first, that the
kingdom is it hand, but that it has come, and
that he is the expected Prince, and that by his
disciples it is believed that he is so, Herod
has become more active, and as we just learn is
resolved upon his destruction. There are those
in Nazareth and in Jerusalem who, together with
a Priest in Beth-Harem, are in league with each
other to seek occasions when the passions of
the people may be roused against him, and a
tumult
raised, in the confusion of which it will be
easy, they suppose, to effect their purpose.
In what Judas said I was astonished at two
things, that Herod was actively employing his
agents in opposition to Jesus, and that Jesus
was now known to have declared himself the
Messiah. As to the first, Herod at Tiberias
had said that he did not hold it needful to do
aught against Jesus, seeing that the anger of
the Pharisees, whom he rebuked with such
severity
,
would do for him all he should desire
to be done. He must therefore have deceived
me, or else have suddenly changed his
purposes
.
I was also surprised to learn that Jesus
had with such explicitness avowed himself
the Messiah, that it had come to be known as
a truth to be relied upon. For hitherto, although
the people were clear in their belief that he
would prove to be that person, and would so
declare himself; yet from him they had been
able to obtain only obscure and doubtful hints.
The fact that he had now confessed himself
the Christ, it seemed to me, would decide his
fate one way or another in a short time.
That has now happened, I said to Judas,
which but a little while ago at supper I was
about to suppose the occurrence of, and ask your
opinion concerning it. Jesus acknowledges
himself the Messiah; but with this declaration
is there any change in his doctrine, or his
appearance
?
There is not; said Judas.
And what then, I asked, will be the
effect of such declaration?
It is not difficult, replied the other, to
foresee. It will cause him to be rejected and
denied by all Israel as one man! How by
possibility can it be otherwise? Hitherto while
himself has made no such declaration, but it
has only been made for him, the reason urged
against him has been, that he agrees not in his
character and purposes with the Prophets. But
all have deemed, who have persisted to have
faith in him, that soon as he should assume the
Name, then would he burst forth in the
splendor
becoming the Son of David, and the King
of Israel. The miracles he has done, and the
excellence of his character and his teaching,
have retained the multitude in their faith or
hope, that he would not disappoint them in the
end. And sure they were, that when the great
and blessed day should arrive, that he should
proclaim his approaching honors, the divine
powers he is entrusted with would be put forth
in surrounding himself and his followers with
all the pomp and glory of a Kingdom, whose
founder and Father is God.
Yet, said I, no such things have
happened
.
They have not. He continues as he was.
He still wanders about the land as if without
home or friends, meanly apparelled, wearied
with the way, and exhausted through want of
food and drink, and as night approaches
sleeping
ofttimes beneath the open sky, or throwing
himself upon the charities of those who are
poor as he; consorting, moreover, by night and
by day with those whom the Chiefs of the land
look upon as little better than the offscouring
of the earth, though indeed their chief fault is,
that like us, and like Jesus, they are poor and
of no repute, or like us and all, save jesus
himself
,
sinners.
And you would say, I exclaimed, shall
Israel receive such an one as her King?
That is what I would say, he answered.
It can never be. Notwithstanding he may
still perform his wonders, and notwithstanding
he may remain as he has ever been, spotless in
innocence as the lamb or the dove, and yet
wise as the serpent, astonishing us and the
multitudes by a wisdom such as we find not
even in the Prophets  notwithstanding this
and much more than this, will the people reject
him. And so ought they to do.
And you? I said.
17 *
Alas, interposed the father, what can we
do? We would fain believe, but how can we
do so, if we would remain Jews? In his
goodness
we believe, for never was there a holier
on earth; in his wisdom we believe, for verily
the wisdom of the Most High seems to be his;
in his powers we believe, as powers which God
has bestowed; in his mission from God we
believe, for no one could do what he doth and
teach as he doth, except God were with him.
And more we would believe, if we could, but
we see not how it can be. While he claimed but
to be a prophet, we could admit his claims.
But now that he claims to be the Christ and
King of Israel, we admit them not, and how
were it possible to do so? We are now
perplexed
and divided.
Our mother, said Judas, has not yet
learned what I have now said, that Jesus is
known to have claimed for himself the
Kingdom
.
Great will be her grief and amazement,
for with unfailing faith has she waited for the
time when he should declare himself, and in
the same hour shine forth in the glory that
would then become him, and seal him the
Anointed.
Her faith, I said, will not yield I am
sure. Her love is so strong it will teach her to
confide rather in him, than in her own capacity,
to judge in what relates to the dispensations of
God.
That is true, said Judas. And it will
be the same affection with reverence of his
character and virtues that will cause the
common
people to adhere to his cause, after in every
reasonable view all hope is extinct. His
gentleness
towards all, his compassion for the
suffering
,
together with his power to relieve those
whom he pities, his love even for the sinner,
for whom he ever seems to feel more than for
the most righteous, seeking to turn him from
his errors; the wisdom of his discourse, which
he adapts by parables and feigned events to the
simplest understanding; above all, the plain,
intelligible doctrines he propounds so contrary
to the dark sayings of the scribes,  all these
things bind the people to him, so that in spite
of long delay and many adverse signs, in spite
of much they may not be able to explain, or
reconcile in his sayings and his appearance with
his claims, they will cleave to him and throng
his steps. They love, and they will believe.
Whatsoever may chance, there will be some
who will never forsake him. Others will think
and compare more, and will at least wait
before
they give their faith, and before they resist
and oppose. As for the Rulers and the leaders
among the Pharisees, they will now have all
the pretext they can desire to assail him.
They will not be content, like many, to sit
still and suffer time to unfold what it may
which is our part  they will seek to visit upon
him the penalties of what they will call his
presumption and blasphemy.
I can easily understand that it will be as
you have said with the people, for I am sure it
would be so with myself could I follow him
as they are doing. Love would take place of
reason, and I should have no longer power to
discern between truth and error, so that it must
doubtless be safer for the cause of truth that I,
and others indeed, remain aloof where the eye
shall keep its uncorrupted sight, undazzled by
an object too glorious for it to behold, save
from a distant point. Yet has it long been my
warm desire to seek Jesus and follow him, if
not as a disciple, as one who would learn of
any teacher the truth concerning God and
virtue
,
life and death; and it is of these, as I hear,
that he chiefly discourses.
It is as you have been told, replied Judas;
to hear his teaching it would not be supposed
that thoughts of dominion and a kingdom had
ever entered his mind. Of such things, things
which the multitudes who throng him never
forget or lose from their thoughts, he seems not
so much as to dream. Can he then be the
Christ? Nay, not only of such things does he
never appear to think or speak, but such things
as are most opposite doth he take most pains to
commend, but which can have but little
attraction
to the kind of people, who most follow
him, and who are hoping, (against hope,) that
one day, sooner or later, they shall reap a reward
for their fidelity, in the new kingdom. Sure I
am, he will have no such reward to bestow,
even upon those, whom he has chosen as
his nearest friends, and to whom he commits
all his thoughts  much less upon others.
What then, I asked, think you it is in
his purpose to bring to pass, if he aim not at
any of the ends we believe to be those of
the Christ?
Truly I cannot tell, answered Judas.
He speaks indeed of establishing a kingdom,
but he seems not to mean any such kingdom as
we see at present in the world, but if any, one
of truth and holiness, where all should obey
the Law, and he should reign over them in some
new manner. No one, however, pretends to
understand some of the things he sets forth,
however simple others may be. That is
admitted
even by his disciples. That he hath, as I
have said, declared that he is the Messiah, in
plain and clear terms, I do not believe, but only
that it has been gathered from phrases, which
he hath employed. All, Sir, it can with
certainty
be affirmed of the objects which Jesus
has before him, is that he aims to increase the
happiness of the people by teaching them the
fear of God, by showing them by the manner
in which he himself lives, how they ought to
live, by using the wonderful power which God
has entrusted to him for their benefit, and by
exposing the hypocrisies of the Pharisees, and
their perversions of the Law, their false maxims
and formal and heartless worship.
These are objects, I said, well worth
living for, and, if need be, dying for, and though
Jesus should not be the Christ, yet must he be
esteemed one of the chief of the prophets of
God.
And a pity it is, added a younger brother,
that Jesus will not be content with this nor
aim at more. Then doubtless would he carry
with him the hearts of the greater and better
part of the people, and make many useful
changes in the doctrine and ceremonies of our
worship, which we all know have been greatly
corrupted by the traditions descended from
former
times. He would no doubt still enrage
the Pharisees and the Jerusalem priests, but the
rest would uphold him.
I know not that, replied Judas. The
people are well satisfied with the Law as it is,
and has descended to us from our fathers.
It may not be in all things as it was in the
time of Moses  somewhat may have been
added
,
and somewhat may have been altered; but
it is what we have all grown up under and
prospered by, and why should it be changed?
We have truly grown up under it, said the
other; but we seem not so plainly to have
prospered, unless slavery and sin may be called
prosperity. Who knows not the wickedness of
the priests and rulers, and their abuses of the
poor by their perversions of the Law, whereby
they enrich themselves and grind the widow
and the orphan to the dust. Truly did I
rejoice
when Jesus cleared the temple at the
Passover of another set of rogues, whose life it
is to sit and suck the blood of the poor. God
prosper him while he strikes at such; and while
he does no more, and lays claim to no more, God
will prosper him. That he is the Christ I do
not believe, nor, as I judge, ever shall.
All doctrine and all law, replied Judas,
will be ever abused and perverted more or
less; in the case of some ignorantly, and of some
with wicked intent, but from such evil we
should not be rescued by overthrowing the Law
itself. I would that Jesus should neither
overthrow
the Law, nor, as he doth, diminish its
authority, but rather content himself with
changing the manners and lives of the people,
and teaching them the fear of God.
Saith the father,  My children, let us not
question the ways of one whom surely without
shame we may hold as wiser than ourselves,
since we doubt not that God in very deed
speaks through him. We may wholly approve,
moreover, of the conduct of which we see the
whole and comprehend it, while, when but a
little is seen, we may judge it evil. With Jesus
it is, as with the providence of God. We
confide
in Jehovah that all shall be well, though
now and here in our human darkness and
ignorance
we can penetrate his ways hardly more
than the blind. Let us put our trust also in
Jesus, nor judge until we are able to see whither
all is tending, and what its purpose and issue
are. The Pharisees are enraged that he teaches
in some things contrary to their interpretations
of the Law, but others think that the new
sayings
of Jesus are in a nearer accordance with
the true sense of Moses and the Prophets.
Some, as here in Nazareth, are offended and
ready to destroy him in that he, who is
but the son of a carpenter, should pretend
to teach as a prophet  among whom we
also have been numbered  nor will they for
this reason believe in the reality of works which
their own eyes behold, but deny that they are
done at all, or give them to Magic or to Devils.
Where so many differ, how shall we at once
discern the truth? Let us be patient and
wait.
It were well, I said, if all could be
persuaded
to obey the advice you have given.
But now that Jesus has suffered it to be
known that he holds himself not only as an
inspired teacher, but the Messiah of our nation,
no human counsel and no mortal arm can stay
the rage that will fill many souls. If the men
of Nazareth were inflamed to so high a pitch
of rage, that he whom they knew to be but
as one of themselves should teach them, how
much rather will multitudes of the leaders of
the people, hungering and thirsting for the
honey and manna, the wine and milk of the
new Kingdom of God, be filled with envy and
rage when they hear that Jesus declares himself
the head of that Kingdom, and yet is to bestow
upon them nought but the blessings of
righteousness
,
peace, and hope in God  no other
honors, no other riches.
The hour of repose having insensibly drawn
on as we said these things, we then separated
and were soon drowned in sleep.
When the morning was come, and I had
worshipped with this household and eaten, and
had taken leave of Joseph and his sons, who
VOL. II. 18
went early to begin the labors of the day, I
sought Mary, the mother of Jesus, in the garden,
where she sat alone.
Young man, said she, may the Lord
bless thee and go with thee. Thou dost almost
believe in Jesus, seek him if thou canst, sit
with him, and open thine ears with a mind
willing to be convinced and thou shalt wholly
believe. Yet I blame not my sons, that they
withhold their faith as thou hast seen; too near
are they to see aright; but, as I believe, their
hearts are true, and they will not willingly do
their brother a wrong.
That, said I, is the chief thing; it is
much less surely that they should think with
thee, than that they should act right. They
are bound to do justly; but they must think as
they can.
So it is, rejoined the mother; I only
could desire that they followed him; then, as I
think, would they trust him more, and would
be with him to aid in times of danger, and the
older to counsel him. For though it be that
the wisdom of God dwells in him, yet doth
he needlessly, as I judge, run into dangers, and
stir up against him the angry passions of the
Rulers and Scribes. Moreover through the
zeal which consumes him, and the importunity
of the multitudes who throng him with their
sick folks to be healed, and whom he can never
send away till he hath satisfied them, have we
deemed him as one beside himself, and have
sought to draw him away, lest he should die;
but he heeds us not. If thou shouldst follow
him, and join his disciples  thou wilt not
thou wilt not forsake him if thou shouldst see
danger or evil to threaten?
Assuredly, I answered, I will stand ready
at all times to help and defend, for I
believe
him holy and a messenger of God, even
as do his brethren; but I do not see how it
were possible I should be a follower of him, as
I am already bound to Herod.
Mary started as I said those words and
exclaimed
,
Ah, art thou then of Herod? It is said that
that wicked man pursues even the life of Jesus
as of John also. What has he done of
injury
to thy master? Alas! it is not in his
heart to harm the least, or the worst thing in
nature. What can set thee against him?
Fear nothing from me, I answered, nor
yet from Herod, if any power of mine may avail
to turn aside the evil he may intend. Though I
believe not in Jesus as the Christ of God, I
believe
he is of God and full of goodness, as thou
and thy sons have said, and never shall he
suffer harm if arm of mine can hinder.
Said the mother, I doubt thee not, I doubt
thee not. Ah! why do I seem to doubt the
providence and the arm of God, why cleave
to human aid? Had I any of the faith of our
Father Abraham I should not be thus afraid, and
leaning on broken reeds. Why should I fear?
Why does my mother's heart tremble when I
know that God reigneth? Will not he, who
gave me my son, and hath appointed him to
this high destiny appear for and protect him by
his own stretched out arm? Shall he leave
half finished the work he hath begun? Shall
it be in the power of man to defeat the hopes
of Israel? Shall Herod even, or Pilate lay their
hand upon the Lord's anointed to do him harm
or the Priests and the Scribes in their envy?
Shall not he, to whom the Lord hath thus
revealed
himself, though the whole land rose up
against him, and Babylon herself were moved to
distroy him, laugh them to scorn and over their
ruin enter into his glory? I doubt it not. God,
who has poured out of his Spirit in so full
measure upon my son Jesus, will not leave nor
forsake him, but will exalt him to the throne of
his fathers, and all Israel shall confess him
King.
As the mother of Jesus said these words, all
her confidence and faith appeared to return; she
once more forgot the mother's fond anxiety,
in her sense of his union with God, and in her
faith that God who had so mysteriously
endowed
him, would watch over him and
preserve
him for the ends to which he had
destined
him. How shall I describe the divine
countenance of this fortunate mother, as she
cast herself in so absolute a spirit of faith on
the providence of God? I cannot. When I
once more see thee, my mother, I can tell more
than my pen can say.
With the affection of a mother for a child,
she then gave me her blessing, Go thy way,
young man, and the blessing of Jehovah be
upon thee. If it please the Lord to turn thy
heart towards his Son Jesus, come hither again,
and this roof shall again receive thee, and when
all is accomplished for which we hope and wait,
thou shalt not lose thy reward.
I then turned away, but with reluctance, and
bent my steps towards the village. Having
become interested in Jesus the more, the nearer
I had approached him, I desired, now that I had
by so fortunate a chance beheld his parents, his
family, and his home, to see also the synagogue
where he had always worshipped, where he had
also preached, and from the brow of the rocky
precipice nigh unto which it stands, his fellow
citizens had not long ago attempted, in their
passion, to cast him down headlong; from
18 *
which miserable fate he had saved himself only
by employing for his deliverance the powers of
God he had so often used, never for the injury,
always for the protection or deliverance of
others.
Passing along through the midst of Nazareth
I easily found, by following the directions I had
received, the synagogue I was in search of.
The doors were yet open, those who had been
present at the morning prayers not having long
departed. When I had entered and surveyed
it, I inquired of a servant of the house for the
place, near by, where the multitude had led
Jesus with the purpose to destroy him. That
will I gladly show thee, he answered; yet would
it have been with more pleasure if I could have
shown thee how and where they accomplished
their purpose. The rocks are hard by, behind
the building. Follow me. As he went before
me, but slowly by reason of his halting upon a
withered limb, I asked why they had sought
his life?
Thou art then a stranger in Israel? he said.
I had taken thee for an inhabitant of these
parts. Why they had sought his life? Father
Abraham! That is a question for a Jew to ask.
But mayhap you never heard this new prophet
as he calls himself?
I said, No, I have never heard him, but I
desire to do so, greatly.
Better not, he answered, better not; no
good would come of it. He leads many away
of those who do not know him as we do.
I said I had never heard evil of him, though
I had heard so much of everything else.
At that, he said, I marvel greatly.
What is there in Israel he attacketh not? What
should stand had our young Nazarene his way?
What to him forsooth are Moses and the
Prophets? What to him is it that the Law
was given of God, and since the foundation of
the world has been the glory of Israel? His
own word is better! Aye, Sir, he sets aside
Moses and Abraham, and the Prophets, as I do
the beggarly rabble who would thrust
themselves
into the best seats of the synagogue. I,
truly, have authority in what I do. We of
Nazareth would fain know what his is? It is
not the men of Nazareth, who have sat and
listened
to the voice of the righteous Zechariah
ever since the last Jubilee  the last I mean
before that, that hath just passed  who will
soon take their teaching from a carpenter and
the son of a carpenter. We are not fallen to
that, though the people of Israel do esteem us
as of the kennel. Would all deal with the
young zealot as was done by us, his mouth
were soon stopped. Verily I believe it will
now be thought that Nazareth is coming up in
the world. No other place hath stood so firmly
for the Law.
Yet, said I you cannot deny the
wonderful
works which he does. What make you
of them?
I am not obliged, he replied, to make
anything of them. There are many ways of
doing such things. Which is his way is not our
matter. It is for us enough that a poor,
low-born
mechanic here in our town saith, or gives
us to believe, that he thinks, he is the Christ!
the Son of David, and King of Israel! Takes
he us for those utterly devoid of understanding?
Never saw I the men of Nazareth to burn so
with zeal for God, as that day when in these
walls, which, so many years, as I have said,
have sounded to the voice of the Holy
Zechariah
,
this young limb of Joseph sought to get
the ear of the people, that he might declare
himself and his foul blasphemies. No sooner
found they what was his drift, than a holy and
righteous anger caused them to rise as one man
to purge Israel of such pollution. Furiously
did the people rage, and drive him from the
house on before them to this very spot  here
is the place you seek, Sir,  that they might
end him and his impieties at once. But he
was too quick for them  or strange to say, the
hands of those who stood near could not reach
or touch him with all their striving, and so by
his arts he escaped, and has not since sought
the streets and synagogues of Nazareth  nor,
as I think, ever will.
Methinks, said I, such an escape from a
multitude, bent upon his destruction, should
convince you that God was helping him.
We deny not, he answered, his wisdom
nor his works, and vain were it, truly, to deny
what all ears heard, and all eyes saw; but
whence he hath his power and his wisdom, as
I have told thee already, each may believe as
he listeth. For me, I believe God inspireth
none such as those who go about to destroy
what he hath before established by Moses, and
set themselves up therefore as Gods against God.
Shall Jehovah build, and then himself tear
down what he hath built? He will carry his
teachings and his works, if Israel will not listen,
to the Gentile, will he? Let him. Is that
the way he shall prove himself the Christ?
If there hath been a Christ promised by the
Prophets, and if they have given him any
office, it hath been that of one who shall
exalt Israel more and more, and bring all men
to bow before the Law, not one who shall
degrade
her in the eyes of men, and bestow equal
honors and favors on the cursed Gentile. What
more needed we to show, to one who hath
eyes, whence he came? Did his own kindred
believe in him more than we? Truly did they
not. Old Joseph is a just and a devout man,
and hath brought up his offspring as one who
loveth the Sabbath, and the road to Zion; and
I warrant you, he took not so patiently the
forward conceits of his son Jesus. Verily, when
he first heard that Jesus had begun to teach,
he set forth to withstand him, as one whom he
judged not in his right mind. Who is my son,
thought the good man, that he should set up
for teacher and prophet? Nor any more regard
did the rest of the household have for him, so
that it was not long ere he was glad to take up
his lodging elsewhere. Capernaum entertaineth
him now; but, as I hear, they think not much
more of his doings there and over the Lake at
Chorazin and at Bethsaida, than here. To tell
what I think the truth of his kindred here in
Nazareth, they would have borne longer with
him, but that notwithstanding he possessed
such powers of doing wonderful things  as at
Cana to change water into wine, and
doubtless
to change any one thing into another,
yet nothing would he do of that sort for the
advantage of his own family, but while he was
profitable to others, left them to their labor and
their poverty, which, thought they, would
scarcely be were our brother Messiah and King
of Israel. Wherefore they give little heed to
him any more, and deny him wholly.
Not wholly, said I, for it is within the
hour that I have conversed with them.
Then it is of late, said the other, that
they think otherwise. And I remember me, I
have heard they are again, at least some of
them, a little softened towards him, seeing that
he has been so set upon by others, and by
Herod, who, it is affirmed confidently, will soon
deal with him.
Having satisfied myself with observing the
place to which my guide had conducted me,
and heard enough to make me believe that the
Nazarenes deserved their ill repute in Judea, I
left him, and returning again through the
village
,
took my way towards Tiberias.
As I walked along and thought of all I had
heard and seen, I could not but feel pity toward
this Teacher of Nazareth, whom all seem to
allow to be not only of a life and manner
entirely
pure and innocent, but filled with acts of
charity and love toward others; yet all seem
inclined at the same time, some for one reason
and some for another, to injure, or at least to
refuse to him their regard and confidence.
They behold his works, and confess them to
have all the marks of God, yet will not believe
his words. His instructions, too, are held to be
laden with a divine wisdom, to be worthy of
any of the Prophets of God who have gone
before, yet do they fall upon hearts so little
ready for them, or stuffed with notions so
contrary to them, that they are dropped by
the way-side and perish  save as here and
there they reach, though afar off, souls like
those of Judith, Ruth, and Joanna, when they
sink in and are held as the heart's truest
treasure
.
But when, with all my pity, I ask how it
could be otherwise? I find myself obliged to
say, I know not; I cannot see. Were it not
that Jesus gives himself out, though not
plainly
,
but obscurely and covertly as it were, for
Messiah, sure I am, his virtues would secure
the homage of all save the baser spirits among
the priesthood. But while he claims so much,
and yet lives as he does the life of a wanderer,
in poverty and want, with publicans and
fishermen
for his only circle of friends and advisers,
it cannot be otherwise than that so manifest a
discordance between what he appears, and yet
claims to be, should turn all against him. As I
have before said, I have trusted that I might
behold in him the marks, and all the marks, we
look for in him whom we expect  and find
him to be more than a prophet; but with what
I learn now, I see not how the life and office of
Messiah can consist with either the maxims he
declares, or the life he leads. But time will
show.
Prolonging, by much devious wandering, my
way, I did not until nightfall reach the outskirts
of Tiberias. The sun was just sinking behind
the western hills as I entered the gates of the
palace.
I found refreshment of every kind, for the
soul and the wearied body, at the hospitable
board of Joanna. She rejoiced greatly that I
had seen those who were so well acquainted
with the life and teachings of Jesus, though
she grieved also that I had not found Jesus
himself. This young woman is wholly
possessed
and swayed by the idea of this prophet.
Of a devout mind, she has found only in Jesus
such food for her soul as she desires. She
knows not how better than others to explain
his conduct; she only trusts that with patience
and forbearance on the part of the people all
expectations
will be satisfied. Willingly would
she follow him as one of his disciples, and
doubts not she should find all she looks for,
notwithstanding that some, as she has learned,
of those who were nearest to him, have
abandoned
him. How would Chuza, I asked,
agree to such a choice on your part?
VOL. II. 19
Chuza, she answered, much as he
honors
the Law and the synagogue, honors such
virtue as this that is seen in Jesus more, and
though for himself he has no hope of Jesus, or
faith in him as Israel's Christ yet he doubts not
his worthiness, and would never deny me my
own belief whatever it may be.
She looks with impatience towards the Feast
of Tabernacles, when she shall go up to
Jerusalem
,
and once more listen to his teaching. In the
mean time she has collected from every quarter
largely of his sayings, on which she feeds by
night and day. She entreats me also to read,
and, that I may do so, promises to place them
in my hands.
When, on the following day, I was
summoned
to an interview with Herod it was
determined
that with no more delay than should
be needful, first to see Beth-Harem again, I
should set out for Rome. So that after visiting
the house of Onias, I shall soon be on my way
toward the capital of the world; a place which
but so little while ago I left with pain not to be
described, and which now, but for thee, my
mother, I should never willingly behold again.
This letter will hardly be read, ere I myself
shall sit at your side.
In agreement with the prediction which
closes the foregoing epistle, it was not many
days before I parted from Herod in Tiberias and
set forth for Beth-Harem, nor did I tarry long
there, ere I again set forth and crossing over to
Csarea, took ship for the Tiber.
While in Beth-Harem I learned that Onias
continued absent in the southern part of the
country, not only performing trusts committed
to him by Herod, but also making use of every
means thrown in his way, or which he could
devise, to increase his knowledge of Jesus, and
become acquainted with his true character and
designs. For this purpose he had visited
Jerusalem
,
and at the Passover had sought Jesus,
and followed him north as far as Samaria,
hearing
him and witnessing his works, when he
again returned to Idumea, but with the resolve
at the approaching feasts of the Pentecost and
Tabernacles, again to seek the capital and
watch his course.
Of Zadok, Judith informed me, that he had
grown each day more fierce in his opposition
toward all who were inclined to put their faith
in either John or Jesus, that he had joined
himself
with other leading Pharisees in other parts
of Pera and Judea, whose object was to make
or find occasion to accuse them of such offences
against the Law and the Roman power as
should cause them to be imprisoned, or else to
stir up the people to some act of violence. He
had also used language, which showed that they
who were bold enough, contrary to the
counsels
of such as himself, to believe in Jesus,
should be cast out of the synagogue, and suffer
besides whatever evils might be inflicted upon
them by the believing and the devout. He
had become, since I had left Beth-Harem,
exceeding
mad; and in the towns round about, in
Jericho and in Jerusalem had bound himself by
solemn oaths to others of the same sect and the
same temper, to purge the land, as they say, of
blasphemers. It would not be easy, Judith
thought, for Jesus to elude the watchfulness of
these men, and the devices they would put in
practice, to impute to him such acts, or such
opinions, as would rouse against him the
passions
of the people, and excite also the
suspicions
of the Roman government.
I visited the abode of the leper where I
found all the comfort possible to those who had
been overtaken by such misfortunes. Ruth
had sought diligently for all the intelligence she
could procure of Jesus, and the opinions he had
promulgated, of his character, life, and works,
and from all that she could learn had become
persuaded that he was in truth the Prophet who
should come into the world. But especially
was she guided by her conversations with
Judith
,
and by the knowledge derived from the
sayings of Jesus, of which from various
quarters
the daughter of Onias, like Joanna, had
collected a large store. These served to
convince
her, as she said, that Jesus was too holy
and pure to make any pretensions that were not
founded in truth; it was impossible, that he
who could advocate the cause of God and the
most exalted virtue in such a manner, borne
out by such a life, could be false in any part
of his conduct. If, therefore, he had declared
himself to be the Messiah, she believed him;
and however much at variance his appearance,
and much of his language might be with what
was looked for in that Prince, she could not
doubt that in the event he would vindicate all
that he had uttered or done, and stand justified
before the Jewish people. How can such
works as his, she exclaimed, be done but by
the power of the Most High? Who would not
tremble to give them to an evil spirit? And how
can one, whom the Spirit of God is with, by
wonders so astonishing, speak otherwise than as
the same spirit of God shall direct? Shall Jesus,
by the touch of his hand, do the works of God,
and at the same time by the words of his mouth
utter lies which are of the Devil? It cannot
be. As Jesus is reported to have said, the
19*
same vine beareth not bad fruit and good fruit,
the same spring sends not forth salt water
and fresh, the waters of Genesareth and
those of the Dead Sea. I believe, then, that
because Jesus has declared that he is the
Messiah
of God, or even, because he permits the
people to believe that he is, therefore he is
that person, nor shall any Zadok have power
to pluck this faith out of my heart.
In reply to this I said that I could not for
myself, believe until I saw. When Jesus
openly
in the eyes of the nation assumed the name
and the place, which, as the king of the Jews,
belonged to him, I would acknowledge him and
forsake every other; but in no other event. I
required the evidence of my eye and ear; the
correspondence of Jesus to the prophecies.
Everything in the manner of life, the
character
,
and maxims of Jesus was against the
probability
that he was the Christ, and in its favor
only his declaration, if in truth he had ever
made such declaration, for it could not be shown
beyond a doubt that he had  that he was so,
and his power of working miracles. I must have
more than this. When he will listen to the
importunities of those who throng him, of some
of the wisest and most powerful in the land,
and stand openly and publicly forth, then it
will be time enough for one who would be
governed by more than his fancies, to bend the
knee and follow him.
Ruth I found, however, too firm a believer
to be shaken by anything I could say, either
in earnest, or simply by way of dispute.
Not Judith herself is of a firmer faith. She
is fully bent upon going up to the Feast of
Tabnacles
,
when it shall come, and taking with her
her father, that if she can obtain the favor of
Jesus, he may possibly be healed. Of this her
heart is now fullest. Long ere this would she
have sought his presence, but that Levi has
refused steadfastly, saying, that a life like his
was not worth the prolonging, seeing that for
so many years he had been shut out from the
knowledge and affections of all who once knew
him. His Ruth had now found those who loved
and would care for her, though he were away,
it was all he wanted; and fain would he be
now away and at rest. He would not, even as
Job had said before him, `live alway.' But to
such things, Ruth made replies that have
touched his heart too tenderly to be withstood,
and she has obtained his consent to go up to the
Feast, unless Jesus should first perchance come
into the Pera. They were to go up in
company
with Judith.
When I had thus remained not many days
in Beth-Harem, I departed for Rome. At C
sarea
,
I did not fail, as soon as I arrived, to seek
out the Greek Zeno, to whom I owed so much.
He was rejoiced to see me, and with great
satisfaction
went over the events of the few but
disastrous
days I had passed in that capital. He at
once drew me with him, with quick consent on
my part, to the ancient site of the synagogue, and
the house of the widow of Sameas. The tower
for the collossus of Tiberius I found to have
rapidly sprung up and nearly at its intended
height. The ruins of the house of the widow
of the wine merchant still blackened the ground,
and bore testimony to the violence that had
been committed. It needed not much aid from
the fancy to believe, as I wandered among
them, as the shadows of evening were falling,
that the forms of Anna and Philip were to be
seen among the tossing branches of the trees,
or flitting among the fallen columns and
crumbling
walls, their voices mingling with the
sighings
of the wind as it swept over them. It was
not easy to depart from a spot still so beautiful
in itself, and where so many objects served to
remind me of those whom I in so short a time
had come to love so well, and from whom I
had been so violently separated. As I turned
away, sad with such recollections, I inquired
of Zeno if it was known where now the
widow
of Sameas was dwelling. In the
capitol
,
he answered, of Philip, whither she had
at first fled. Deeming it more for her safety
that the place of her retreat should be known
to none save a few of those to whom she had
entrusted her private affairs, she had strictly
concealed it until within a brief space, when it
had come to be well understood in Csarea,
that her home was in Csarea Philippi. But
at the same time it was affirmed that she was
about to remove to Rome, where, if rumor
deceive
not, added Zeno, thou wilt doubtless
find her on thy arrival. Procla would gladly
have recalled her to her ancient home, and have
caused her dwelling to be rebuilt, but with all
her address, she could not in this overcome the
obstinacy of Pilate; who professed to
entertain
apprehensions of new difficulties, if any
more lenity were shown toward those who had
in any degree been parties to that revolt, but in
truth he was governed by his avarice, which
could not spare the gains which by the sale of
so valuable an estate would flow into his purse.
These things being so, having seen Zeno,
and visited the spots so dear to memory, I set
sail with a fair wind for Italy, and without any
adverse events reached its shores in safety.
My mother I found as I had left her, and
with her, now her companion and
inseparable
friend, the mother of Philip and Anna.
Our tears flowed afresh as we recounted the
events of those few fatal days, which
deprived
a mother of her only children and robbed
me of one, whose image ever floats before me
and can never be supplanted by another.
When the first cares of arriving after so long
an absence were over, and I had once more
traversed the streets of Rome with every stone
of which, owing to the activity of my youth,
I had familiar acquaintance, and by such
pilgrimages
had revived a thousand recollections,
partly agreeable and partly painful, I turned to
the affairs which had brought me so far, and
sought the presence of Sejanus. Yet before I
conversed with him, and had only gathered the
knowledge concerning him to be had for the
asking, at the corner of any of the streets of
Rome, I discovered that all the reliance upon
him on the part of Herod was that of a person
upon a phantom or shadow. For I found, that
though the form of Sejanus was to be seen
about the streets, in the Forum, in the
Senate-house
,
and in his own sumptuous palace,
having
the same outward shape as ever, yet it
now appeared and departed without, as it were,
being noted whether it came or went, the
people
and the nobles offering no longer that
worship
which had once been paid as to a God. I
found, in a word, that the sun of Sejanus was
overclouded and about to set  that the word
had gone out from Capre, and this man, who
so little while ago, held all Rome and the world
in the hollow of his hand, was, though still
glittering in all the wonted trappings of his high
place, of no more weight in the minds of men
than a poor painted player-king with his tinsel
robes and paper crown. Letters, dark and
mysterious
,
have come from the Emperor to the
Senate, which while they still salute Sejanus
with the titles that have ever been lavished
upon him, leave it not to be misunderstood by
any who are not as blind as the favorite
himself
,
that suspicions have been wakened in the
breast of Tiberius, that native home of distrust
and jealousy, which never can be removed but
by the destruction of the miserable man against
whom they have been raised. The steps of
him, who so lately stood almost within the
circle of the throne itself, are now dogged by
spies and informers who report every word and
look, and movement to the gloomy tyrant who
will not long be without a pretext for his
accusation
.
When the blow would fall, it was not
easy to conjecture, as a plausible or popular
ground must be found for extreme proceedings.
In the mean time, as I have said, so far as could
be judged by the apparent honor and power of
the minister, he held the same rank as ever in
the estates of Rome.
When I sought him, and by credentials with
which I had been furnished, made known the
authority under which I approached him, and
the objects I had in view as the messenger of
Herod, it did not surprise me that I was
received, and the projects and proposals of
Herod considered with the same care and
interest
as if he were still in the plenitude of his
power, and kings and kingdoms hung upon his
word. So insensible was he to his true position,
or so insensible did he choose to appear, that
I was almost ready to believe the rumors in
the city were false, and that a terrible
retribution
awaited the inhabitants for the slights
they had of late shown this second-hand tyrant.
A little reflection, however, convinced me
that my first impressions were right, and that
my interview with Sejanus was a mere empty
form  a scene in a comedy, or shall I
rather
say a comic scene in a tragedy. It could
be followed by no act on his part. His
promises
were, indeed, many and reiterated of
lending
to Herod all the support of which he had
formerly spoken, but they were like the promises
of a man who  as the possessed person in the
Old Prisons of Beth-Harem  though clothed
in rags, yet imagines himself in possession of
the riches of Solomon.
No sooner had I terminated this interview,
and sought further information of the truth in
regard to Sejanus from those who well knew
both the Emperor and the parasite, than I wrote
to Herod, laying before him, borne out by
incontestable
evidence, the account of the actual
state of political affairs, and the failing power of
the once great minister. I assured him that
the depending upon aught from Sejanus, either
in the way of money or forces, was vain;
that so far from possessing any influence in
Rome, so as to attempt any such movement
now, as might, perhaps, with much probability
of success, have been attempted a year before,
he was at present little more than a private
individual, whom all looked upon as fallen
under the displeasure and suspicions of
Tiberius
,
and destined to speedy ruin; that whatever
it was in his purpose to do in Judea must be
done with his own strength, unless,
relinquishing
his plans concerning Herodias, he could
bind himself in league with the kings of Arabia
and Parthia; that, however, although nothing
was to be looked for in Rome from political
union, yet much was to be expected from the
men of wealth among the Jewish population,
which was large in numbers, and, as he knew,
distinguished for the riches they had amassed.
To these, if it were his pleasure, I would
devote
myself, and engage them to lend of their
VOL. II. 20
abundance to the restoration of the Kingdom
of Israel; and it was not to be doubted, so
constantly were their eyes directed that way,
and their hopes to one day returning and
dwelling
in their native land beneath the power of their
own King, in the new age that should unfold,
that they would be impatient to bestow in
proportion
to their substance, to secure that great and
glorious end. These with other things I
communicated
to the Tetrarch not many days after
I had been in Rome.
The letter which I thus despatched proved
to be the termination of my intercourse with
Herod, for upon receiving it and thereby
learning beyond any further doubt that hopes
of alliance with Rome against herself could
no longer be indulged, and that in
consequence
any immediate action was rendered
impossible, he turned toward that other
project
which he had never honestly abandoned,
the marriage with Herodias and the divorce of
the daughter of Aretas. He, indeed, wrote to
me after receiving the letter I had sent, and in
it he hoped that I would continue to be engaged
in his affairs in the manner I had proposed, and
if I could not derive any longer advantage from
Sejanus, to do what I could with the Jewish
inhabitants. But it was not long after this that
in a letter from Judith and Onias I learned that
he was bent upon accomplishing his designs
with the wife of Herod Philip. When this was
made known to me, I at the same moment
abandoned his cause, not being able to persuade
myself that prosperity could attend the
measures
of one who should openly put from him
the fear of God; nor being ready to take any
part in the injury of two men so holy as John
and Jesus, for the advantage of one so wicked
as Herod. The necessity thus laid upon me of
suddenly withdrawing form an enterprise to
which I had now so long bound myself, of
whose success, wisely conducted, I could not
doubt, with the success of which I deemed the
glory of Israel to be so closely interwoven,
gave me no little pain, and I could not for a
time but hope and almost believe that Herod
would return to himself, and, repenting of his
evil designs, resume on his own strength the
undertaking he had so foolishly postponed to
the gratification of his passions. But what I
soon learned from Judith put an end to all such
expectations. She thus wrote.
Now, Julian, let me trust that you will
finally and without reserve abandon the affairs
of Herod, when I shall inform you further of the
course he has pursued. Never have I been able,
notwithstanding all the efforts of Onias and all
the reasonings and persuasions of his nephew
of Rome, to entertain other opinion of Herod
than that which I have often expressed. I
believe
that you will now join yourself in
judgment
to me, and think of him even as I do;
yet of my father, I lament to say it, have I no
hope that he will ever be separated from one to
whom he seems bound by a spell cast over him
by evil spirits, rather than by reasons which his
own mind has weighed and can calmly
justify
.
It is not easy to say why it was so, but
certain it is, that your presence was a restraint
upon the Tetrarch. It may have been because
he stood in some dread of your plain speaking,
or, which is more likely, because he hoped
to derive advantages through your means
he could secure in no other way so well. No
sooner were you gone, than as if he had been
relieved
of some load, or had escaped from some
painful obligation, he gave himself at once to
the passion which many asserted he had
mastered
,
and not only resorted immediately to
Jerusalem
,
but entertained Herodias in the most
open manner in his own palace in Tiberias.
This was followed by consequences easily
foreseen
the sudden departure of the daughter
of Aretas for her father's court, and letters
breathing revenge and war from the insulted
king. These things coming, as could not be
otherwise, to the ears of John, he proclaimed
publicly the wickedness of the Tetrarch, and
denounced him to the people as a despiser and
transgressor of the Law, and one who through
the violence and wickedness of his passions was
about to bring all the evils of war upon his
country. But alas! he spoke into the ears of
the deaf, and to hearts too corrupted by the
like iniquities to be touched by the admonitions
of that stern but righteous man. They heard
him, but heeded him not. Enough were found
of the same stamp with the King, who in his
condemnation by the prophet had heard also
their own, to carry to his ears a report of all he
had said, which inflaming the King to a high
pitch of rage he sent out his soldiers, seized
John, and hurried him off to the dungeons of
Machrus, where he has since been strictly
confined, and out of which it is not difficult to
see he will never come. Herod, indeed, hath
some fear and even reverence of him,  for
with all his vice, he stands in dread not only of
invisible spirits of evil, but of spirits of good
also, of everything that is mysterious and
obscure
,
and, therefore, he might release him
when his end was once gained, and for the
reason also that he may apprehend commotions
among those of the people who hold John to
be a prophet; but if such should be the
inclinations
20*
of his own  not merciful but
cowardly
heart, there will be none such in the
bosom of her to whom he will now ally himself,
who hath long treasured up her anger against
the bold peasant who has dared to thrust
himself
in between Princes and the accomplishment
of whatever designs they may please to
entertain
,
and hath been one cause at least of so
long a postponement of an event, which she
even more than Herod has sought to compass.
We doubt not with the next arrival of news
from Jerusalem to hear of their adulterous
marriage
.
Of Jesus we learn that few miracles have
of late been wrought, but that he employs
himself
in preaching in the synagogues, the truths
which he conceives to be most essential, and
in which the differences are to be discerned
between what he holds to be best, and the
ancient Law of Moses. But so far as I have
learned he seems to be rather a restorer of the
Law to its true significance, and a rebuker of
prevailing corruptions and abuses of it, than
one who would overthrow and destroy it, of
which purpose some fail not to accuse him.
I often at this time received letters from
Judith
informing me of the progress of Jesus and
of the oppositions he encountered, and of
herself
seeking him in Galilee and becoming a
constant
follower and hearer. Of her own
opinions
at this time  the period just going before
the Feast of Tabernacles  I gathered that, with
the common people, she received him with an
undoubting faith as the Messiah. The
Pharisees
,
she says, are exceeding bitter against
him, and by the power they hold in their hands
they deter many from following him, and
confessing
themselves disciples. But the lower
sort, who have nothing to lose, neither place
nor estimation, laugh at these tyrants, and
crowd about him gladly and fearlessly. I
consort
with these; sit and hear with them, and
believe with them. They doubt not, and how
should I doubt, that Jesus will prove all we
wish and all we want; since it is impossible
for those who will see and hear him to associate
deceit with him, or any purpose or design other
than those which he plainly avows. Now he
declares that he hath come from God, that the
prophets have foreshown him as he who is to
come, that the Kingdom of God is shortly to
make its appearance and be established, and
that he is the Christ who shall reign over the
new Kingdom. Can it be otherwise than so,
since he has declared it? I think not. And
oh, how peaceful and hallowed a people would
they be over whom Jesus shall reign as King!
How different he from the other kings of the
earth! with what new honors will he crown
the good, with what new terrors will he strike
the wicked! In his teaching he ever invests
with the highest praise the virtues of sincerity,
contentment, gentleness, chastity, and
kindness
toward all. Shall not his own government
proceed upon the maxims which he has thus
publicly proclaimed as those which are to be
considered superior over all others? How
certainly
then, if these things shall be so, will
wars and contentions cease, and violent and
ambitious
men no longer be among those who shall
rule in Israel, and the soft delights of peace, and
justice and mutual deeds of love, and the
sincere
worship of God, and the observance of the
Law unperverted by the traditions of the
elders
,
honored and exalted in the eyes of all,
cover the earth and make it as a delightful
garden before the Lord! Why, why does Jesus
thus delay to assume the place that is his, and
lay the foundations of the Kingdom whose
approach
he has so plainly announced? The
power with which God has entrusted him must
be amply sufficient to make his way plain
before
him, and obtain an easy conquest over
whatever opposition his enemies, the Pharisees
and the Council, might array against him. It is
this delay that disheartens many, causes others
to doubt, some to despair, and not a few to
abandon him; for, say they, we can see no
reason why he should any longer refuse to
do what so many urge upon him. We have
seen miracles enough, we have left our homes
to follow him, and we now are impatient for
the consummation, and think we have a right
to demand it. But others say, if such an one
as Jesus is to reign in Israel, then as he is to
govern by rules and maxims so different from
those of other Princes, it must be necessary to
lay deep among the people a right preparation.
They must be brought to expect and to desire
not such a state of things as has existed under
Herod and other former kings, but such as he
has constantly predicted as to constitute that
which is to be now founded, and this can be
done only by often and to the whole people of
Judea, in one place as well as in another, from
the west to the east, and from the north to the
south, declaring the principles on which it is to
be conducted, and obtaining the willing assent
of all hearts. I do not say, Julian, that there
are not misgivings among even such as these,
and that they are not often startled and
alarmed
,
and made to doubt by words which Jesus
uses, by slights put upon the chief men of the
nation, by his free departures from the common
practices of the most devout, and dark
intimations
that he himself is destined rather to suffer
future evils than to reign as a Prince. But
these moments and causes of apprehension or
doubt, are as nothing in comparison with the
deep foundations of our hope. For myself,
could I be well content  which Onias ever
ascribes to my Samaritan descent  were Jesus
to be no other than a teacher and
reformer
,
a preacher of righteousness, and a
restorer
of the Law. Yet am I at the same
time ready to acknowledge that I look with
greater expectations of good to Israel  of
greater good than could otherwise accrue
which Jesus could effect were he not only
prophet but king also. How would he then
stand above all others a just model for all the
princes of the earth! a God among men, of
whom the true worship should be copying and
displaying his virtues, receiving and practising
the righteous principles of his government!
And in saying this, confound me not with
those who throng the steps of Jesus but with
expectations of some advantage so soon as he
shall proclaim himself, and who think not of him
or his future kingdom as differing from other
thrones and other monarchs from whom flow
honors, powers, and riches, save that from Jesus
these shall flow in fuller streams, and overspread
the whole land of Judah and Israel. If I
believe
him King, it is a King, the foundations of
whose throne shall be righteousness, and its
inscription, `Holiness unto the Lord'; whose
office it shall be as the Lord's Anointed, not
more to subdue the enemies of Israel, than to
exalt the Law in the eyes of men, and cause it
to be obeyed of every soul, and presently to
gather all nations of the earth under its sway.
Thus wrote Judith in one out of very
many epistles which, while I dwelt in Rome,
I constantly received  all of them together
presenting a very exact account of the doings
of Jesus and the conduct and opinions of the
people during that period. I would willingly
have returned and passed this interval in Judea,
but affairs of my mother, together with her
unwillingness so soon to part with me again,
kept me in Rome. But though in Rome, the
state of Judea, and the works and teaching of
Jesus, were with me the things of chiefest
interest
,
and with the most of our people also, to
whom I communicated freely of all the
information
I received. Not less than myself, many
in a greater degree, were they roused and
inflamed
with the hopes excited by the miracles
of Jesus, not doubting that he was the
promised
king, and would soon establish his reign.
Not a few made every preparation which at a
distance could be made  converting their
estates
into gold and precious stones  to remove
from Rome to Judea as soon as the final
elevation
of Jesus should scatter every remaining
doubt. They were indeed filled with wonder
at the same things which caused so much
doubt and dismay to the most devoted and
devout
Jews at home. They could not interpret
his humble origin and mean and lowly
condition
,
nor many of the doctrines which were
imputed to him, but neither on the other hand
could they interpret his astonishing powers
except
he were the Son of God. And thus a
vague hope, notwithstanding many adverse
signs, kept its place in their minds, and with
every arrival of news from Jerusalem or
Beth-Harem
,
they would look to have it confirmed
by some new and more decisive event.
As for the Romans of the better sort, if they
heard at all of the affairs of Judea, and the
strange events given birth to there, it was only
as of some story of magical illusion, or demon
power, or some superstition of a people ever
prone to wonder, and whose early history, as
their own, abounded with many relations of a
similar kind, and so they gave little heed to
any of the accounts which from time to time
reached their ears. Some indeed, who were
more careful to distinguish things that differ,
and not to take all that is like for the same, of
whom there are ever but a few, thought that in
Jesus there was somewhat which exalted him
far above ordinary mortals, and which ranked
him justly among divine beings; they doubted
not he was a God, descended for great purposes
among men. Such opinions it was well known
that the Emperor himself entertained; and to
decide in matters of this sort, as, indeed, any
question that called for the exercise of a shrewd
and discerning judgment, no man in Rome was
more competent than Tiberius. He possessed
wonderful powers also of confounding a plain
matter; but that was because he loved, and
had some reason why he wished, to perplex the
reader or hearer. He eagerly sought for all
intelligence
concerning the Prophet as it arrived,
and did much by his inquiries and his
conversation
to spread abroad among the higher classes
a knowledge of what was going on in our
remote
and despised country.
Although I heard so fully of affairs in Judea,
through Judith, yet it was not until after the
Feast of Tabernacles that so much as a word
came to me from Onias. When that festival
was over, and Onias, Judith, and Ruth had
again returned from the city to their homes, I
at length received a letter from him, of which
I here preserve the greater part.
Long ago, says Onias, did I purpose to
VOL. II. 21
write and give thee such information as I had
gathered concerning the affairs of the King in
this part of Israel, but my devotion to them
hath been such as to leave little power for
other things; but beside this a greater
hindrance
still hath grown  how wilt thou
marvel
!
out of my following after Jesus, whose
steps I have closely pursued with but brief
intervals
of absence since I first left Beth-Harem
for Idumea. Yet though thy first thought,
Julian, may be one of surprise and wonder, thy
second will be one of approval. For ought not
they who would in so great a matter arrive at a
judgment which their own minds shall
afterward
justify, and which shall be in accordance
with the truth of things, to seek the knowledge
necessary for its foundation at the springs where
it is to be found most abundant and most
pure? Wherefore I determined, that whereas I
had up to the day when I left Beth-Harem,
received
all my knowledge of Jesus through the
reports of others, and the rumors which were
spreading over the country of whose origin and
authority none could give any account, I would
no longer in such a matter trust to what might
be error or falsehood, but myself resort to Jesus
or his disciples and become a patient learner of
the truth.
Thou knowest how at Beth-Harem I had
ever laid a restraint upon the holy Zadok, when
in his zeal for the Law and our chosen Head
he was prompt on all occasions to revile the
very name of Jesus and his followers, never
doubting them to be deceivers, children of the
Devil, and that so they would be proved in the
end. I was not willing that one, who as it was
reported to us, was so full of a divine spirit,
whose life was so innocent, whose
annunciation
had been attended by such signs, whose
own works were so astonishing, should be
judged as it were in darkness, by such as had
never for themselves sought the light, which
for the seeking was easily to be had. For
myself
,
moreover, I now confess it, it seemed to
me that if all was true that was brought to our
ears, there was a likelihood, almost bordering
upon certainty, that this Galilean Prophet was
in truth the expected Prince, veiling, for
purposes
which had not been explained, but were
well capable to be explained, his greatness, and
concealing himself under the humble guise and
condition of a servant. Hardly was Judith
herself more moved toward Jesus, than I. It
was accordingly with great expectations that
such favorable judgments would be established,
and that as a consequence thereof I should
abandon the cause of Herod, as thou hast now
rashly done, that when I had reached Idumea,
I determined within myself to go up to
Jerusalem
at the Passover, for it was rumored that
Jesus would be there.
I went. Jesus came, as it was predicted he
would do, I saw and heard him, I followed
him from Jerusalem into the country round
about in Judea, then into Samaria and Galilee,
thence to Jerusalem again at the Pentecost and
Tabernacles, and am now returned even as I
came forth from Beth-Harem, more than ever a
Jew and a Herodian! The man of Nazareth
has made no disciple of the Vine-dresser of
Jordan
who, as ever, is a follower of Moses and
the Prophets, and through them a believer in
the Redemption of Israel, and the new
Kingdom
of God. This faith and this hope shall
no man take from me.
But was it at once, Julian, that I sifted out
truth from error? and was it an easy task?
Was the way smooth, with no yawning pits of
danger and death, where the foot slipped in
darkness? It was quite otherwise. I have
escaped
,
yet as those who have passed through
the fire, as those who have been snatched as
Daniel from the jaws of the lion. There was
that in Jesus that drew me towards him, as it
were with cords of iron and bands of steel, and
there bound me; and like the foolish
multitude
I had well nigh been held fast in the
disloyal
captivity. The same affections, which
forcibly took possession of their hearts, were
making their entrance into mine also, whether
I would or not. And now when I look about
me and perceive that through the good
providence
of God I am rescued while the
multitudes
of the people are yet in bonds I wonder,
while I rejoice. For, as I have said, there is
that in Jesus, which attracts and binds as by
some magic force. Yea, such power,
mysterious
and not to be withstood, is seen to flow out
even from the very countenance and form! I
first beheld him as he sat teaching in the
Beautiful
Gate of the Temple, and sure I am my
eyes never fell upon a human form of such
majesty yet also of such graciousness. What
was great and manly prevailed by a large excess
over what was only fair in both the shape and
the features of the countenance, yet upon these
the eye rested with delight for their exceeding
comeliness, but much more for the expressions of
love toward all, which shot forth in every look
and every motion. He seemed ever as if
anxious
to know the wants, and read the language
which spoke in the faces of the humblest of
the people who surrounded him, and who
without
encouragement would be slow to approach
one so endowed with freedom. Accordingly
when he was speaking to them, and as much
21 *
when he was not, his eyes were roving over the
crowds and his form bent towards them, rarely
at any time sinking back into himself, or
seeming
as if there were any interest to engage him
separate from theirs. But at such times as this
happened, then a shade of sadness settled over
his face, showing that oppressive thoughts were
passing through his mind, which there were
none to whom he could make them known, in
order by counsel or sympathy to divide the
burden. In truth he was not seen ever to
communicate
with another not even his chosen
companions, as we are wont to do with those
to whom we commit the whole of ourselves as to
another self, in the knowledge that we shall be
received aright, and that whatsoever is in us we
may with freedom impart. This indeed was
not surprising; for although they who
approached
him, even for the first time,
immediately
perceived that benignity and a fraternal
spirit predominated in his character, and were
beaming forth from his face, yet who, when
they considered what mysterious alliances
bound him to God and invisible spirits, could
ever sit or converse with him as with another;
could ever feel toward him but as a messenger
and servant of Jehovah, in whom dwelt his
spirit and his power! Who could consort with
him as an equal and a companion? Wherefore,
wherever he is seen in the city or in the fields,
thronged by the multitudes, or pursuing his
way from the city to the seclusions of the Mount
of Olives or of Bethany, at a feast or in the
house of mourning, does he seem ever and
equally alone, as if not among the people at
large had he found those with whom he could
contract a friendship, which had been denied by
the members of his own household.
There being, in addition to all I have said,
the appearances of truth and honesty in Jesus,
an openness too which convinced the observer,
that nothing was kept back from the people
which he had power to communicate, or which
it concerned them to know, and a readiness to
hear both the inquiries and the objections which
any who approached had to propose, with a
gentleness, and a compassionate regard for all
that gave assurance of a kind reception, even
to women and children, if they could so far
overcome the natural feelings of awe as to draw
nigh to him, I have to acknowledge, Julian,
that when I had once seen him and heard his
discourse, I was as one bound to him; every
feeling of the heart without any will of my
own was freely his, and for a time I felt as if
I too should number myself among his
followers
.
I could not leave him. Wherever he
was, there was I also. I sought him in the
temple, I joined the crowds that thronged him
in the streets as soon as he was seen, day and
night I followed him through the cities and
villages round about Jerusalem, often without
shelter or food, that I might lose none of the
doctrine he taught, or fail to behold the
wonders
wrought by his hand. I was drawn along
by a power I could not resist, the all attractive
power of wisdom and goodness. Not a Jew in
the land, not one of Jesus's own disciples
was a more constant and devoted follower
than I.
But what now? you ask. Have I given to
Jesus my allegiance? Do I find in him the
King of Israel? the Saviour for whom we wait?
Not more, Julian, than in John! Yet for his
virtues I would that Jesus were he, that he
gave other signs than those he now gives that
God hath sent him to fill that high office. But
how vain the wish! For though in Jesus be
seen many of the qualities and graces which
would fit him for that trust, yet of others he
possesseth not one. The love of those with
whom he had to do certainly he would gain,
and by that bond would he hold them in his
service  which is simply the service of
holiness
.
But utterly devoid as he is of those
higher qualities which would fit him for
Israel's
King and Deliverer, never would he
draw toward him the perfect confidence of our
people. They will follow him and hear him,
as I have done, for the graciousness of his words
and the strange attractions of his presence.
They will witness his works and stand
astonished
at a power, so far beyond that of
mortal
man. But when he requires their faith
in him as Christ, they will withhold it as
I have done  they will draw back and,
notwithstanding
their love and their admiration,
will abandon him, some doubting whether
he be in his right mind, some holding him
a deceiver, others a minister of Beelzebub,
others perplexed at least, and not knowing
how or what to think.
As it is with the character of Jesus and the
outward appearance, so is it with the doctrine
he preaches; at first, and in many things it
captivates and charms, but afterwards those
things are observed which not only agree not
with, but oppose the very existence of that
Kingdom for which we look and pray; so that
I have even conceived that he aimeth secretly to
make hostile the heart of the people toward it.
They of Rome are our enemies, yet he teacheth
us to love them! They have enslaved and
injured
us, he would have us for this evil to do
them benefits! Israel can be exalted only as she
shall triumph over this modern Babylon. Jesus
teaches peace, and threatens that such as use
the sword for conquest, or dominion, or revenge,
shall by the justice of God be doomed to perish
by the sword! Israel can rise to her ancient glory
only as she shall covet glory, and honor, and a
kingdom, and as her children shall in these things
aspire to be what their fathers were, but Jesus
teaches that they who follow him must seek after
none of these things, but choose rather to serve
others and be in obedience. If we, Julian, have
read the Prophets aright, the Messiah, and they
who shall join themselves to him, will reap the
natural rewards of those who deliver their
country from oppression and invest her with
power and dominion; but Jesus declares that
they who follow him must look only to deny
themselves any such expectations, and to prepare
themselves rather for sufferings and
adversities
,
than for the enjoyments and honors we
are accustomed to regard as our fitting
recompense
.
And, moreover, while the zealous Jew,
the descendant of Abraham, the disciple of
Moses, hath been trusting that under the Christ
he would be more than ever established, and
the Gentile held as utterly accursed and alien
before the Lord, Jesus hath more than hinted, he
hath in his teachings plainly declared that
henceforth
all shall be alike before God!  whom he
even speaks of and addresseth, not as the God of
Israel but the Father of all, not more disposed to
crown Israel with peculiar honors than any other
people that will keep the laws of
righteousness
!
What think you of these things, Julian,
which I have heard many times and oft from
the lips of Jesus, and which in various form
make up the burden of his teaching? Are
they the truths we look for from the Restorer
of Israel? Do they become the Deliverer
him of whom the Prophets have spoken as
King of Israel in her restoration, even as God
himself was her King of old? Thou thinkest
even as I, and wonderest not that I turn from
him  yea, and as thou wilt behold, against him.
For excellent as are other truths that he
delivers
,
and irreproachable as is his life, yet is it
not plain to one who looks around, that it is the
necessary effect of his teaching to indispose the
people toward the true Messiah, to plant in their
minds notions and errors not compatible with his
coming and exaltation? Greatly more than John,
does Jesus throw obstacles in the way, not only
of Herod, but of any other, if Herod be not he,
whom God may send to accomplish our
salvation
.
Wherefore, it grows to an obligation,
whose force I feel more and more as I hear more
of Jesus and witness more of his power over
the people, to oppose him, and if it may be
separate the multitudes from him. To this work
henceforth do I give myself; and if it should be
said, behold the righteous zeal with which Onias
resisteth Jesus!  it may then be replied at the
same time, that if he stirs himself with zeal for
the cause of God it is not in ignorance that he
doth it, for than he no one more constantly
followed
after the steps of Jesus, and listened to him
more patiently. But, who was he, to suffer his
private affection for this wonderful man, to stand
between him and what he owed to the Law,
to Israel and to the God of Israel?
By other things also, have I been at first
troubled and confounded, but at last
strengthened
in this resistance I purpose of Jesus. When
soon after you, Julian, had set forth for
Tiberias
,
and I for Idumea, I sought, and listened
to the teaching of Jesus, I found that which I
expected, a prophet of God clothed with powers,
such as I believe were never before, save unto
Moses
,
granted to a mortal man. The people about
me took him for the Son of God, and King of
Israel
no less. And truly when I either listened
to his wisdom or witnessed his wonderful works,
I too thought him for those reasons, at least well
worthy to be He whom God was at this time
to send into the world. But then other things
caused doubt. Why, if he was the Christ, did
he not openly and with a loud voice so declare
himself? Whom should he fear? Were he
the Christ indeed, who would receive him so
gladly as the Jews of every sect? Even Herod
would have laid aside his hostility, would he
have but assumed the state that should mark
the Christ. Was it the Romans he should fear?
What were they to one whose arm was the
arm of God? They truly would have had a
controversy with one who claimed of them the
sovereignty of Israel. But could not he, at
whose word the son of the widow of Nain came
forth from the grave, summon forces before
which those of any earthly power must fail?
Were Jesus the Christ, why when we have
urged him to do so hath he steadfastly refused
to give a sign, which we could not doubt,
that he was so  a sign in the Heavens, or in
enterprises he should set on foot, or in those
demonstrations of kingly rank and power to
which not one would refuse his faith? These
he hath not given, but mocked our urgency with
the figure of Jonah, who having been three
days in the whale, so he in like manner should
be three days in the centre of the earth  a
riddle which none can read. Jesus, moreover,
hath violated the requirements of the Law,
setting
it at naught, which he who came to restore
and magnify the Law could never do. The
Sabbath is to him as another day for the
freedom
VOL. II. 22
with which he sets aside its requirements
in favor of that which he may wish to do,
saying
,
that its observance should bend to many of
the necessities of man  which truly many a
Hebrew is already without instruction, prone
enough to do  but from the Messiah we should
look to see its observance, as of all the Law,
carried to a higher pitch, and men taught how
they may keep it even with the zeal of Ben
Ezra of Csarea, or Zadok of Beth-Harem,
yet without hollowness or hypocrisy. Why doth
he cast contempt upon the Pharisees, the
council
,
the chief men, the elders of Israel?  among
whom if there be some wicked there are many
righteous, and on whom, he who came our
Redeemer
,
would lean, whose aid he would seek,
but by whose power, should they be provoked,
must he miserably perish. Whence is it that
Jesus, if Messiah, often when the Jewish
opposers
and disbelievers revile and reproach
him, is heard to declare, that if it be that
they turn from him, another people, from the
East and the West, the North and the South,
shall come in and possess the inheritance of the
children of Abraham? that Gentiles and
idolaters
,
accursed and hated of Jehovah, against
whom in olden time his own arm was lifted,
shall now, in the age about to unfold, for which
we have waited so long, receive the blessing
and the honor, while Israel shall be shut out,
Jacob shall be counted as the heathen? Why,
as he now doth, claiming for himself the
kingdom
,
goes he thus abroad, as a wanderer
without
home, or power, or friends? Why for his
chief advisers and companions does he choose
fishermen or publicans, or women, that are of
society, outcasts? Why speaks he of
sufferings
,
that are inevitable, to overtake him  nay,
for such things has he said  why speaks he
of death, as if it were for him an inevitable lot,
from which there can be no escape? Are these
the marks of Messiah? The Messiah lives
forever! his kingdom is everlasting! so say the
Prophets. What shall we think of him, what
must we believe, who, confronting the Prophets
and setting them at naught, saith that he is
the Christ, who was to come, yet shall be no
king, and shall die by the hands of violence?
Verily while such shall be his language it is
not difficult to foresee that such will be the end
at which he shall arrive; for already are there
those among the Pharisees, and of the Priests
at Jerusalem who seek his life, and will have it,
if human cunning and force can prevail against
one endowed with such powers as those of
Jesus. They will not longer bear that, what
they esteem as blasphemous perversions of the
Prophets, shall be uttered in the hearing of the
multitude, and the great office of the Messiah of
the Jewish people, brought down to the level
where he would place it.
When, during the long period that I have
followed the steps of Jesus, I have sought him
and conversed with him of these things, and
have urged him to delay no longer, but if he be
the Christ, to declare himself openly, he has
said, that I have misconceived the nature of
that office; that he has come a teacher of
divine
truth, not a Prince and King; that his office
is to redeem mankind from sin, not to reign
over them on the throne of Israel, and that he
has long and often declared himself, but that
the people will not understand or receive him.
I have replied, that when the Prophets have
spoken of the Christ, it hath been of him as
the King of Israel and Judah, and it was
impossible
that the people, who have dwelt upon
those promises so long, should look for any other
person than such an one. He has answered, that
when the prophets speak of a kingdom they
have intended a kingdom not of force, but of
truth and righteousness, of peace and love;
and then he hath gone on and painted, as a
picture before the eye, the felicity of coming
ages when men should be wholly swayed by
the love of God, and ceasing to desire any other
conquest, should be satisfied with a victory over
themselves and over sin. I have freely
acknowledged
the greatness and excellency of
what he hath thus said, and the blessings
inconceivable
,
that would be conferred upon
Israel by the prevalence and dominion of such
a faith, but have added, that as Jews we were
bound to be governed by our Scriptures and the
Law given by Moses, and that while they
stood and we revered them, and held by their
teaching, we could believe no otherwise than
as we had done. It was not one only, but the
whole people who, for so many ages, and now
more than ever because their oppressions were
great and the set time had come, in the
Christ looked for a King and Saviour; and
should so many wise and righteous men have
been left in so great an error? He answered,
that it was the temper of the people, their
desire
of a certain thing, that had caused them so
long to misjudge the Prophets, and to believe
only a part of what they had said; but if they
would hearken as well to Isaiah as to Daniel
and Moses, they would learn and would believe
that the Christ was to be a sufferer rather than
one who was to enjoy prosperity, to be a
servant
rather than a monarch. And then he
expounded
that long Scripture, where the Prophet
speaks of one enduring many things, and at
last, as a lamb was led to the slaughter,
suffering
22 *
death itself for the sins of the people, that
by his stripes they might be healed, and said
that it was all spoken of the Messiah, who can
found his new kingdom of righteousness only
by first passing through suffering and death. I
answered, that what he had said was so
contrary
to the present belief and hopes of the
nation, that they never would receive it; they
would set the united voice of a whole people
against his, which was but that of a single
person
,
and abide by it. To receive the doctrine
he had delivered was more impossible to the
Jew than even to deny and blaspheme Moses and
the Prophets. The Jew was now looking for his
redemption and the glorious coming of the
Deliverer, and he would sooner renounce his
name than forego the hopes which give to
that name its highest honor. He only answered
with sighing, that the heart of the people was
too much set upon such hopes ever to believe
in him, and it would only be when his death
had opened their eyes and softened their hearts,
that the truth would break upon them.
These and many other things did we
discourse
of, in all which, he showed himself to
me, as to the people, gentle and compassionate,
not looking that one should on the instant
renounce
his present persuasions, but rather
willing
to wait till truth should enter in its own
way and time, overcoming one by one and
without force the errors or prejudices of the
mind. It is only toward the Pharisees, and
even the baser sort among them, to whom he
ever speaks in tones of angry reproof  men
who approach him only to pervert his speech
and stir up against him the passions of the
multitude.
And, Julian, do you now doubt where
stands Onias? Yet am I filled with admiration
even as I was at first with the virtues and
character
of Jesus. But sure am I, at the same
time, that he deceiveth himself, that he
misconstrueth
the Prophets, and while he vainly
thinketh
himself to be the Christ, is indeed perhaps
in the counsels of God, Elias, or the prophet,
who should go before  whether to announce
Herod, or some other, who can tell? As
the Christ of God  the promised Messiah, I
reject and deny him! and this notwithstanding
his birth, the voice at his baptism, and his
miracles
.
He agreeth not with the Prophets. He
is not that Great One. While he claims to be so,
he is as one blinded, and led by the blind. He
deceiveth his own soul; and the foolish people,
who have no power to discern their right hand
from their left, throng him and with their
worship
and flattery help to increase the
mischievous
delusion. They give their faith to him,
and he giveth his faith to them. They believe
he will yet show himself their king, and he
believeth that, in some mysterious manner, he
shall yet be ruler and king over them. But did
they clearly comprehend what the kingdom is
which, as I judge, he meaneth when he speaks
of one, many fewer would there be to put their
hope in him. They, however, can understand
no such thing; but stand waiting each moment
for the time when he shall shine forth in the
glory of his new authority.
Of Herod's affairs, I scarcely need write to
thee, since thou hast forsaken him. Yet will I
say, that never have they seemed so prosperous
as now. Allied now to one whose inward
power is hardly less than that of the Great
Herod, and every way equal to that of Antipas,
to one moreover who is of the same royal house,
the alien and the heathen being banished, as is
fit, from the land of the elect of God, what
prospect of success and glory opens not before
him? John, who alone dared to lift up his
voice against the king, reaps his reward in the
dungeons of Machrus, while his foolish
followers
wander about as sheep who have lost
their shepherd, some of them having resorted to
Jesus, but the greater part still holding together
as a society by themselves, not less hostile
toward the rival of their master, Jesus, than
toward the persecutor, as they judge him, of
their master, Herod. But from them nothing
is to be apprehended. They are few and weak.
And concerning Jesus, though it is certain that
now the greater part of the people are with him,
and by his virtues and his powers he hath bound
them to himself through their reverence and
love of his character, and the expectation of
advantage from his miracles, and of every kind
of good so soon as he shall enter upon his glory,
yet is it equally certain that all the persons in
authority, the leaders of the Pharisees, the
principal
Scribes, the Priests at Jerusalem, and the
council, are with utmost bitterness opposed to
him, and seek his destruction. Though the
smaller body they are the more powerful, and
will doubtless in the end prevail. Herod,
moreover
,
by his letters and his messengers
continually
stireth them up and infuses a new
hostility
;
not that they need urging to a work into
which they throw themselves of their own
accord, and with all the force inspired by a
temper of revenge for injury and disappointed
hopes. Herod might well have pursued his
first plan, and intermeddled not, for without his
aid, no one thing, not already come to pass, can
be more certain than that the enraged Pharisees
will soon accomplish the destruction of Jesus.
Already have they directed the suspicions of
Pilate and the Roman authorities against him,
as one who plots revolt in the state  as one
who in secret speaks of a kingdom here in
Judea
,
which he has been commissioned to set up,
which is to swallow up all other kingdoms,
until it become universal. These things and
many more of the same kind have been reported
to Pilate and the powers in Rome, but without
any immediate effect, such as was desired; for
the Procurator, upon diligent inquiry through
those who have followed Jesus, has declared that
he finds no ground of accusation in what they
have reported, the language of Jesus having no
regard, so far as they could learn, to any Power
that is to be set up and established in Judea,
but to some mysterious institutions, of which no
clear idea could be formed, except that they
seemed to have respect rather to what concerns
the right conduct of life and the founding of a
kingdom of righteousness, than to enterprises
that would interfere with the Laws of the
Empire. Nevertheless, though little may be
now apprehended, the suspicions of Rome have
been excited toward him, and it will be
wonderful
indeed, if they should not beget the
consequences which suspicions once engendered
rarely fail to do. Although, Julian, I have not as
yet, myself engaged in any action against Jesus
or his disciples, yet can I not lament, but must
rejoice, that ere long he will fall before the
many enemies that are gathering around him,
and so the way be left clear and unobstructed
for the exalting of the rightful king. The
Scribes and the Rulers, who on the first
appearance
of Jesus were so prompt to believe,
thinking
that He had come who should confirm them
in their honors and raise them higher, in their
vexation and rage that Jesus has courted them
not, but publicly assailed them and exposed
their errors and as it were expelled them from
the kingdom, whatever it may be which he
came to found, will without aid from any
quarter, accomplish his ruin.
Such was the language of Onias, at this time.
Greatly did I desire once more to visit Judea,
but the same reasons prevailed to keep me in
Rome. Yet with such frequency did I receive
intelligence of the whole life and doings of Jesus
from Onias and Judith, that scarcely could I
have known more had I myself been a follower
of the Prophet. From these letters I would
willingly transfer large portions, but must forbear.
Especially would it please me to present here the
many letters of Judith, in which it would be seen
how deeply and how truly she penetrated, and
comprehended the character of Jesus  with
some remaining errors  indeed and the nature
of the services which it was his purpose
to perform for his nation and the world, of
which so few, hardly even his nearest followers,
comprehended the least, but which time has
since revealed to all. But these also must be
passed by.
It was about the time of the Feast of
Dedication
,
that Judith wrote thus.
When we thought that the wonders
concerning
Jesus had come to an end, new ones
have unfolded to perplex and astonish us. We
now sit still, waiting to behold what shall be
the issue; for in vain, utterly in vain, were it
for the hand of man  though that of Herod,
or of a thousand Herods  to be raised, while
the visible hand of God reveals itself over the
whole length and breadth of Israel. In very
deed doth God now dwell on earth! When
John appeared we deemed that a prophet had
surely arisen. When Jesus was proclaimed by
a voice from Heaven, we could not doubt that
one greater than any who had gone before had
come. But what shall we say now, when of
those who have been the near followers of
Jesus, his chosen disciples, a multitude as it
were, possessing the same power as Jesus to
heal diseases, to drive out devils, to raise the
dead, have proceeded forth from him and
penetrated
every region of the land, preaching the
kingdom of God, that it is now nigh at hand,
and to show that they preach with the authority
of Jesus and God, working the most surprising
miracles wherever they go? The people are in
amazement. Save a few, all believe that now
the kingdom will shortly appear, and Jesus
reign in Israel. `What else,' they say, `can
mean so astonishing a preparation? Were the
heavens and their hosts to fall on the earth or to
pass away, the event were not more wonderful
than the things that have happened among us,
and to what other end can they point than the
founding of that kingdom to which, for these
thousand years, the whole people of Israel have
been constantly looking? We no longer doubt
that our eyes, even ours, shall now behold the
salvation of Israel, the redemption of Judah. We
indeed cannot tell why he, who shall so soon sit
upon the throne of David, who utters the
wisdom
of God, and doth the works of God, still
appeareth as a servant. Neither can we tell
why he prophesieth suffering and pain and
even death as to overtake himself. This
confounds
us; but while things so wonderful of
another kind, and which are evidently of
God, are taking place, we are content to wait in
respect to other matters, and trust that we shall
in due time be made to know clearly what now
perplexes us.' Thus judge and speak the great
VOL. II. 23
multitude of the people. Many of the chief
men also and Rulers believe in Jesus, and but
for shame or fear would openly confess him.
I hear of those who, both in Jerusalem and
elsewhere, have gone to him secretly, with the
purpose to inquire into his designs and unite
themselves to his cause. Fain would the
people
compel him to declare himself and make
no more tarrying, but assume the place they
are sure is his, and raise Israel to her proper
glory. And alas! why will he not do so? How
incomprehensible is the delay! All men stand
waiting, all are sure that he who can do the
works of Jesus, and who hath now bestowed
the same power upon so many, can be no other
than the Son of God, the king of Israel; yet
to-day is as yesterday, and he still refuseth
to hearken to our entreaties  he still wanders
through the land, scattering indeed the light of
his truth and his virtues everywhere, but is
otherwise as if he were the servant of servants,
soiled with the way, overcome by fatigue, often
insulted by those set on by the Priests, having
not where to abide in peace.
But why have I delayed so long to tell you
that he hath of late been in the Pera, and
on the banks of the Jordan, continuing a long
time in the villages round about; that among
other places he hath visited Beth-Harem; and
that when there, exercising his power of healing
upon the sick and the possessed, the lame and
blind, he restored to sight and soundness the
father of our Ruth! In vain had Ruth
persuaded
and urged that he should go up to
Jerusalem
;
his desire of life was too little to tempt
him so far, on so doubtful an errand. But
when it came to be certain that Jesus would
soon arrive in Beth-Harem, then he declared
that if that happened, he would seek his help.
He did so. And no sooner did the benevolent
Jesus behold him and his wretched state, Ruth
sitting at his side, and by her countenance saying
more than any words could utter, no sooner did
he hear his declaration, `Sir, I believe; I
believe
that thou art from God,' than he touched
him, the word was spoken, and he was restored
whole and fair, as when he was a merchant of
Tyre. It were vain to describe the joy of Ruth
when she beheld her father, as she had not
beheld
him since the days of her extreme youth.
Aloud they gave thanks to God and Jesus, when
they saw what was done, and declared their
readiness
to follow him wheresoever he should go.
But he only desired them, To live unto God, and
the times would show them what they should
do.
They returned with us to our dwelling, and
this great restoration was celebrated in the
evening
by feasting, dancing, and music, and by the
presence of all our friends from Beth-Harem
excepting Zadok alone, who, believing that
the powers of Jesus, or professing so to believe,
are of the Devil, held it impious in us to
receive
aid from such a source, as it would be
also in him to rejoice with us in what had been
done. But beside him all were with us  and
for the last time, Saturninus, who, now soon by
the requisition of the Procurator, departs with
his soldiers for Jerusalem. He also, Julian,
hath become a believer in Jesus, so far as one
can believe in Jesus, who believes not first in
Moses and the Prophets. Though he
understands
not much of our expectations of a
Messiah
,
and considers not Jesus at all in regard to
that office, he yet acknowledges in him a divine
power and authority, and doubts not that he has
come from God to be a teacher and reformer of
mankind. His wisdom he had highly esteemed
as he had perused it in the sayings, the parables,
and discourses I had from many sources,
gathered
together, and deemed it well worthy to
proceed
from a divine instructor, but it was not
until he had himself often witnessed the works
which he did, that he received him as a teacher
come from God. As such he now readily
acknowledges
him. I wait impatiently for the
time when he shall receive Moses and the Law
also, and Jesus, as not only a teacher come from
God, but the Christ of Israel.
It was on this same evening there was present
with us one, who having been long time a
disciple
and companion of Jesus, had turned from
him at length, and ceased to have faith in him.
He was from Bethabara, and even from the very
first had been with him. Although it was to me
a thing not to be explained, how one who had
companied with Jesus so long should forsake
him, yet I was glad, seeing there was such an
one, to be able to converse with him, to
discover
why he had deserted the society and
cause of one who had every day given farther
and higher proofs of his being the Son of God.
`Have you not,' I asked `found that in the
company of Jesus, for which you sought?'
`By no means,' he answered.
`But,' said I, `you found wisdom and truth,
gentleness and humanity in Jesus, and were
these no bonds to hold you.'
`I cannot deny,' he answered, `that I found
all these; and whatever other virtues you may
name, they were all there.'
`Did you then,' said Onias, `doubt the
works of Jesus? Saw you any reason to think
them not works of God?'
`Surely not,' he replied, `whoever shall
consort with Jesus, as I have done, will have the
23 *
same persuasion that one so good and pure as
he could have no communion with evil spirits,
that he has that the light of the Sun, and the
rains of Heaven, and the flowers of the field
come not from them  from none save God.
Yet at the same time that he believes this, will
he believe with equal strength, that he is not
the Christ, as he declares himself to be, and as
they who have joined him at first believed him
to be.'
`Yet,' said I, `the greater part of those who
first joined him still remain with him; and as for
the people at large, whereas but few at first were
persuaded that he was the Christ, now, since
these new wonders have come abroad and the
works of Jesus have been so many, all Israel,
save the Priests and Scribes, believe that he is
the Messiah who should come, and that so in
due time will he declare himself to the shame
of all gainsayers, doubters, and deniers.'
He answered and said, `that they who
stand at a distance, and see and know only a
part, cannot judge in such a case so well as
those who are near and see more and with more
exactness. Whose faith was firmer than mine,
when, forsaking family and the affairs of life, I
became a follower of Jesus? I was fain to think
that in Jesus I beheld the long expected
deliverer
;
for in him I noted the signs of a
prophet mighty in word and in deed and like
unto Moses; his words were with authority, his
life was holy, and his works surely, were those
of God. It needed not reasoning and argument
to produce conviction in my mind, I believed at
first, as I did at last with all the force of my
mind that he was a man from God. But was
it for that,  because he was a man from God
that we had joined ourselves unto him? was it
for the works he could do? not so; but as you
well know because we deemed him the chosen
of God, our Deliverer and King.'
`And why,' asked I, `do you refuse to
believe
him such? Is there any other in whom
Israel may place such hope?'
`If there is not,' he replied, `then may
Israel well renounce all hope; for there is none
in him. Not only have we who forsook all and
followed him derived no advantage from our
fidelity, but no prospect opens of such advantage
in the future. Though we, who stood nearest
him, have pressed him to declare himself, and
lift up the standard that should show him Christ,
though on all sides men throng him and urge him
to delay no longer, but assume his throne, he
hearkens not to us  nor only that  he sternly
rebukes all such desires of honor, saying, that
all who follow him with such desires will fail
of their end  that instead of honor and
worldly
gain, they must rather look to deny
themselves
,
and renounce even the common
enjoyments
of life; that instead of exercising
authority
over others, they must rather look for
persecution and oppression; that life will be
more likely to be lost in his service than gained.
Then, when his discourse is not of this sort,
subverting all the notions this people entertain
of the looked for Messiah, it is often dark and
perplexing, so that when we hear we understand
it not. To all which, of late, hath been added
a frequent prophecy of his own sufferings and
death, and of danger and suffering to all who
are joined with him, so that it became clear to
us, that whoever else he might be, he is not
the Christ of God, and that declaring himself
to be so, he knew not his own office, and so
having deceived himself, was ignorantly the
cause of deceiving others also. For his holiness
and his works willingly would I have remained
with him; but having followed him not for
these, but for other things quite different, to
which these indeed might be additions, but
the want of which they could not supply, it
only remained to renounce a cause which no
longer stood approved to our judgments. Many
with me went back and walked no more with
him.'
`You receive not then,' I asked, `the
charges of the malicious among the Jews, that
he is mad and hath a Devil?'
`Surely not,' he answered; `his words are
not those of one that hath a Devil, albeit they
were sometimes such as we understood not;
and for his miracles, though doubtless, such
works may be done by wicked spirits, we were
sure of nothing more, than that they were of
God. Would he only have granted what we
asked, a sign, namely, that he was the Messiah
whom we sought, never should we have
forsaken
him; but while he still called himself
the Christ, he would give no such sign as we
required; so, how therefore could we believe?
He would have us to believe that the Christ
was one who should teach excellent things,
rebuke sin, reform the lives of men, and build up
a universal kingdom of truth and holiness; but
often as he thus discoursed, and prophesied of
the future, and that in completing his designs
both he himself and we his followers should
meet with opposition, suffering, and death
perhaps
,
we could not receive doctrines so contrary
to the prophets, and to what from our youth,
we had been taught and had believed. We
could only withdraw from one who seemed
misled by dreams  deceived or deceiving. We
were ready to take upon ourselves all the
danger
that would have come from the Romans,
would he but have yielded to our importunities.
There seems now, nothing left to those who
hope for Israel, but that they should join
themselves
to Herod.'
`And have the greater part of those,' I
asked, `who with thyself attended upon his
steps, also abandoned him?'
`No,' he replied, `they are still with him,
hoping and believing still. Which to me is
astonishing. For what hope can there be
longer
,
when so often as hath already happened,
his disciples, and the multitude together with
them, have been ready as it were by force to
make him king, and he hath still refused?
What can be done more for his exaltation than
has been done? The loss and the ruin be upon
his own head!
`There they will be,' said Onias; `the
patience
of those, who, having regard to the
virtues
and innocence of Jesus, have forborne to
do aught in opposition, while he hath this long
time claimed to be the Christ, yet hath not
shown himself as such, is well nigh spent, and
when it shall be wholly, the fierceness of the
rebuke of those whom he hath deceived, will
be in proportion to the hopes that have been
fed, only to be mocked. Other enterprises
that, as I believe, would have joined all
Israel together in one phalanx have been
postponed, have been arrested mid-way, that
we might learn what should be the issue of
this coming of the Nazarene; and now behold
the issue!'
I saw that the passions of Onias, with
difficulty restrained of late, as they have been
worked upon more and more by Zadok, were
kindling, and said, `Perhaps this is not the
issue
;
Jesus himself, as we hear, still points to
the future, and of late there have been grander
demonstrations than ever before of the power
with which he hath been entrusted.'
Onias only answered, `we have been kept
waiting long enough; we have seen miracles
enough. Let him now look to himself.'
Onias, with the stranger then arose and
together disappeared among the deep shadows
of the house.
The festivities were prolonged to a late
hour. You would have rejoiced to behold the
happiness of Ruth hanging about her father,
with all her joy breaking through her
countenance
,
or else testifying the unusual
exhiliration
of her spirits in the swift mazes of the
dance. This sudden increase of happiness and
good fortune, seems to have no ill effect upon
her character, but, on the contrary, draws forth
and gives prominence to some parts of it which
before were too little seen.
One thing only was mentioned, in our long
conversation with the disciple of Jesus, that
seemed contrary to the common opinion which
all entertain of his goodness. It concerns the
imprisonment of John the Baptist, who since
the month preceding the Feast of Tabernacles,
has now lain in the dungeons of Machrus.
We learned from this disciple, that though Jesus
had often been importuned by the disciples of
John, and by his own, to interpose and deliver
him, for it was feared, that Herod, set on by
Herodias, would destroy him, he would not
comply with any such request; and that
though John himself had sent messengers to
him asking, if he were really the promised
Messiah, thereby conveying the knowledge
that himself was in prison, and expressing his
astonishment, that if Jesus were that great
person, he would do nothing for his release,
yet neither would he take any notice of such
messages, but was willing to leave the Baptist
still in prison and at the mercy of the king.
This conduct of Jesus, we were told, had filled
all his followers with surprise; inasmuch, as
they, knowing the powers of Jesus, were
persuaded
that if he had chosen to exert them, it
would have been but the work of a moment to
effect his deliverance. They could not
understand
why one so virtuous as John, and who
had in the beginning given his testimony so
fully in behalf of Jesus, should not in return
experience benefits at the hands of Jesus which
it would be so easy to confer. Why Jesus hath
been willing to act such a part I cannot explain
any more than they, yet doubtless this may be
said, that although he has not as yet interposed,
he has not refused to do so, and may at some
future
time; but although he should never do so,
I could still believe, that one of so much
goodness
as Jesus, of whose goodness all Israel has
had knowledge and experience, would have
reasons, we should judge, sufficient to give for
withholding his aid, could we only arrive at a
knowledge of them.
It was also evident, from what this disciple
said, that the doubts which had been expressed
by John concerning Jesus, whether he were
indeed the Messiah, had greatly affected the
body of his followers, who were led by it
themselves
into new and more serious doubts. If
John, whom all had been accustomed to regard
as a prophet, now questioned the claims of
Jesus, and was disposed to deny them, and to
hint that we must wait yet longer, for some
other to arise, much less, it was said, can we
believe without some misgivings. Yet, to set
against these doubts of John, there were
miracles
more astonishing than ever  not only on
VOL. II. 24
the part of Jesus himself, but on the part of his
chosen disciples also. Such demonstrations
of power, and of his close connexion with
God, through whom he had conferred such
gifts upon his disciples, made it clear that
there was no greatness or office which he had
not as yet assumed, to which he might with
reason aspire, and reach. It seemed to rest with
himself whether he continued as he was, or
seized the throne of Judea, or in addition to
that, the sovereignty of Rome, and the empire
of the world itself! What could he not attempt
and accomplish, to whose command seem to be
obedient all the forces of nature? Never, Julian,
can I doubt whether this man, so endowed, is
he for whom we look. Of our Christ he has
all the marks, save only those of outward
greatness
and authority; and how easily at any
moment
may he arise and clothe himself with
these? And, in the mean time, while we wait
for this, we behold his perfect character and
life, we profit by his divine wisdom, we hear
the wonderful things he teaches of the future
life and glory of man, of God and the true
worship which he requires. All Israel rejoices
in his presence and in the benefits of his works.
And for me, though he added nothing to what
he has already done, though after having
instructed
us by his truth and his example, after
having rebuked the Pharisees, purged the
Temple
service, restored the Law, and abolished the
Traditions, he should do nothing more, but end
his life with the name and praise only of a
Prophet in Israel, and a benefactor of those
with whom he lived, dying then as others die,
or else, mayhap, being translated, as were
Enoch and Elijah, not knowing the pains of
death, I should be well content, and bless God
that he had come, and that Israel had been
permitted to rejoice in his light. But I doubt
not, for one moment, that we shall see more
than this; that our eyes, even ours, shall behold
the salvation of our God; that this Jesus shall
not only save us from our sins, but redeem us
also out of the hand of our enemies.
Thus did it appear plain, that Judith's faith
in Jesus faltered not, but that in the face of so
many things unfavorable and discouraging to
one, who, like her, could look before and behind,
she still believed that Jesus would fulfil all the
hopes he had raised. It was not surprising,
that the multitudes, who for the most part
looked no further than the miracles, which were
now performed in greater numbers and splendor
than ever, cleaved to him; and, looking
rather
at what they desired than at what it was
reasonable for them to expect, trusted still
against all adverse signs, that it was he who
should redeem Israel. For them it was enough
that Jesus continued to give proofs so
astonishing
,
that God was with him; while such
power and favor were his, all seemed to be
within his reach, and they doubted not in one
way or another, sooner or later, they would
succeed in their endeavors to place him where
they desired him. They could not oppose to
his miracles, the true nature and tendencies of
his doctrine, and the spirit of his character and
life, which made it so plain to me, that
whatever
else he might be, he never would show
himself to be the Christ for whom we look.
No two things, differing from each other never
so much, seemed to me so contrary the one to
the other, as Jesus and the Christ. To Judith,
however, these things did not present
themselves
so strongly, but as her letter shows, she
persuaded herself, that in some manner, not by
any one to be foreseen or described, he would
continue to manifest himself the teacher and
prophet whom she could love, and by whose
labors and instructions the hearts of the people
were to be changed, and in due time, when the
preparation was complete, stand forth before
Israel and the world, as the Messiah also.
I now determined within myself, that so soon
as the severity of the winter should be past I
would again return to Judea, and at
Beth-Harem
await what should be the issue of the
wonderful events still taking place. It seemed
from many things in the letters which I
continued
to receive, that by the people it was
believed
that somewhat that should be deceive
in regard to Jesus, would happen at the time of
the Passover. It was indeed rumored, that Jesus
had himself made such a declaration to his
disciples
,
and that they also were looking forward
to that Feast, as to the hour that would crown
their hopes with their long delayed fulfilment.
Many things therefore conspired to determine
me to turn towards the East at that time. But
while I waited for the season to arrive, when it
would be proper to take my departure, I heard
from Onias concerning John, what I was by no
means surprised to hear, regarding it as hardly
any other issue than what was natural and to
be looked for. He thus wrote.
Although we look to see you at the
Passover
,
yet do I not intermit the intelligence it is
our wont to impart; especially do I not delay
to inform you of what has taken place at
Mach
rus
concerning John, and which hath ended
in his destruction by Herod.
I well know that at one time you, as well as
myself, opposed the purposes of the Tetrarch
24*
when they aimed at the life, and even the
injury
of John; in our judgment he was then in
many ways doing more for than against his
cause. I know not in what opinion your mind
now rests, though I can well suppose, that
having
separated yourself from the affairs of Herod,
again I trust to be joined to them,  you
stand ready to condemn whatever measures he
may have adopted to secure the ends at which
he still aims. For myself, I am free to declare,
that I think no longer as then, but that I now
deem it right that so powerful an enemy as
John of what we believe to be the cause of
Judea, should be cut off. If that at which
Herod aims be, as I truly think it to be, the
cause of God and Judea, then must those steps
be justified in the sight of God and the law,
which are needful in order to arrive at the end,
else we were like those, who, desiring to run a
race, have first bound or cut off their feet. No
advance could be made in the favor of the
people
while John was abroad, and though
doubtless
his continual confinement in Machrus
might in some sort have served the same
purpose
,
yet while he lived they who hoped in him
once would still hope, and chance might have
sent him once more his freedom, or Herod
himself
might have relented and bestowed it upon
him. Wherefore it is better that he is dead,
the rather as it was brought about more by
others than by Herod himself, so that if the
people shall be disposed to a harsh judgment, it
must light upon other shoulders than his.
For it fell out in this wise. In the same
Egyptian Hall where, when we were at
Mach
rus,
Herod feasted his adherents, did he, so
soon as Herodias reached that place, give a
banquet
in celebration of his birth-day, to all whom
he could bring there from every part of the
land. His chief officers of government, the
great captains of his armies, and all, who, by
their presence, would show that they were on
his side, failed not to be there. I also was
present. The splendors of the scene, when
thou wast there, seem, as I think of them, but
as shadows and darkness compared with those
which now blazed all over Machrus. But the
difference within the palace were well explained
by only saying, that now there were present,
arrayed
in all the magnificence of the East,
Herodias
and her daughter, whose beauty, of both
the mother and the child, changed into dimness
all the shining of lamp and jewelry, and far
more than they, dazzled the senses of
whosoever
beheld them. There was now, when at the
banquet, no silence and gloom, as before, but the
joyful confusion of a thousand voices, of those
who seemed contending with each other, which
should express most loyalty toward the royal
pair by shout and song and the frequent
pledging
of the wine cup.
Thus it continued until toward the middle
of the feast, and every known pleasure had been
enjoyed to the full, and little more could be
looked for but such as should be a repetition of
what had gone before, when behold! as if to
render the present banquet distinguished before
all others, there suddenly entered the hall,
preceded
by a train of damsels, the daughter of
Herodias, who, first approaching the throne of
the astonished King, and craving his permission,
then ascended what had been previously
prepared
for the display, and there performed with
a grace and power never seen in the dancing
girls of this or any other region, the most
difficult
dances of Egypt, of Greece, and the farther
East,  what they are thou well knowest,
filling all who beheld her with wonder and
most with delight, and who, as she paused now
and then and the music ceased, rent the air
with their shouts of applause. When this had
been prolonged until, as it seemed to me, the
dances of all nations had been performed, her
maidens often joining her, or relieving her, and
Herod seemed beside himself with joy, being
moreover well in his cups, as were also the
others who were seated with him, he called out
to her to draw nigh to him, and not knowing
how else to declare his pleasure, cried out that
no reward could be so great as she deserved,
but promised her whatsoever she should ask of
him, though it were a half of his kingdom,
confirming what he said by oaths. The young
girl upon that, with a modesty that won applause
from all, even as her dancing had done, said, that
having done nothing to deserve the least
reward
,
she could not ask what should diminish
the possessions of the King, either by the half
of its value or the smallest portion thereof; she
therefore requested only what was of no value
to Herod, the life, namely, of a violent and
wicked
man, already forfeit to the State, the fierce
and constant enemy of her mother, and not less,
as all Israel knew, of Herod himself, and who
was now a prisoner in Machrus,  the life of
John the Baptist. No sooner was this heard
than loud cries of approbation arose from the
tables, mingled with laughter and expressions of
extreme astonishment also at the nature of the
demand, when from the promise and the oath of
the King, there was plainly no limit to what she
might not with reason have exacted, and the
King have been bound to bestow. Herod,
though plainly troubled, that she had asked
nothing which it would have agreed better with
his magnificence to give, and expressing some
sorrow that the life of John had been required,
was not yet at liberty to take back what he had
promised, so he at once gave the sign to his
attendants
,
who quickly went and returned
bringing
with them the head of the prophet, as some
will continue to call him, which being delivered
to Salome and her train of maidens, they
departed
,
bearing it, with many noisy signs of
satisfaction
,
to Herodias, who by her examination
of it, was satisfied that it was indeed the head
of her enemy.
Thus perished John, who in my present
judgment should have perished long before.
And thus may all others perish, who thrust
themselves in between Israel and the
accomplishment
of her great designs! Doubtless,
Julian
,
Jesus will fall in like manner. Already
many times has his life been sought, and that
too by Herod, so that many places have become
dangerous to him, and he hath taken refuge
now in the dominions of Philip, and now in
the desert places beyond Jordan. But as he
changeth not his manner of speech, but still
cries out against the chief men of the nation,
still claims to be the Christ, while he
prophesieth
against Israel and for the Gentile, the
same passions rage against him, and will rage
until they gain their end. It is not his power
to work miracles, nor the mad worship of the
rabble that will save him; unless indeed,
performing
such wonders in behalf of others, he,
when the occasion comes, shall perform
somewhat
as surprising for himself, and transport
himself beyond the reach of his pursuers. But
thus much at least may be said for this strange
person, that, while he is lavish of his bounties
upon others, even the most wretched outcasts,
he provides nothing for himself, nor derives the
least advantage from a power that would seem
capable to furnish him not only with all the
necessaries but the luxuries of life. Neither
doth he seem to be guilty of any vice; for in
this diligent inquiry hath been made, and many
spies employed, that if such things were true,
evidence might be had thereof, and witnesses
found to accuse him. No earthly power, as I
judge, can help him, unless he depart from his
present customs, or put forth his arm of God,
and save himself.
Fail us not, Julian, at the Passover, when
we shall surely look to see thee and converse of
many things concerning which, with all our
diligence
,
it is not possible to write. I shall still
hope to see thee again joined to the cause of
the only one who hath power to save us.
This was the letter of Onias concerning
John. I was not surprised at his fate; I rather
wondered that Herod had refrained from his
life so long, when there existed so many causes
of anger, so many reasons why he must desire
his destruction. And I did not believe what
Onias seemed to set forth, as if believed by
him, that it was with any regret that the King
consented to the death of John, and gave the
orders for his execution. Had he not rather
rejoiced in an opportunity for his destruction,
which presented others before the world as the
immediate authors of his death, and so shielded
himself, he might easily have recalled an
engagement
made in haste, in his cups moreover,
from which the world would readily, as he
must have known, have held him excused,
especially
as the breaking of his word in one
direction
would have been accompanied by an
act of magnificence toward Salome, that would
have been more than keeping it in another. In
words he would have broken it; while in its
spirit he would have more than kept it. This
was so plain to me, that no conviction could be
stronger than that Herod rejoiced in the happy
chance that rid him, so easily to himself, of an
old and dangerous foe.
Being now determined to revisit Judea, and
to be present at the Passover in Jerusalem, I
waited with impatience for the passing away of
the winter months; and the more, as the means
of transmitting letters by reason of the violence
of the season were greatly diminished. I
rarely
heard of what took place in Judea after the
letter of Onias just given, which came not long
after the Feast of Dedication. And if it was so
with me, how was it to those of my
countrymen
in Rome, who were not bound by the
living
ties which connected me with the holy
land,  and how was it with the proper Roman
population of this vast capital? What knew
they, what could they know of what was doing
in Galilee, on the Jordan, at Machrus, in
Beth-Harem
?
Not a sound reached their ear; and
though Jesus was there doing the greatest works
of his life, the rumor of them was scarcely
heard by these multitudes so remote, but what
is much more, so engaged by the affairs of a
vast Empire and a tumultuous capital.
Spring at length approached, the Tiber
opened his gates of ice, the imprisoned and
impatient coursers of the sea broke loose from
their bondage and set on their way toward all
the ports of the known earth, bearing with
them the luxuries of Roman art or her gold, to
bring back in return the vegetable products or
the rude manufacture of the half-civilized
nations
of Asia and Africa. It was on board a
VOL. II. 25
trader, bound to Csarea, that I embarked, and,
after a quick and fortunate voyage, found
myself
once more entering the arms of her colossal
port. No sooner had I left the ship with my
effects
,
than I departed for Beth-Harem; and, that
I might renew former pleasures, travelled the
same winding road as before; again stopped to
be refreshed at the cottage among the hills
near Samaria, and again slept at the Inn of the
complaisant Jael.
Of all that it now remains for me to say
concerning the days passed in Judea, the record
will be found in fragments of letters written,
after my arrival at Beth-Harem, to Naomi in
Rome.
XX.
I cannot
easily tell you, my mother, with
what pleasure I found myself again beneath the
roofs of Beth-Harem; again seated where I was
wont to sit and write to thee  overlooking the
vineyards of Onias, the Jordan, and the
distant
hills; or else walking on the banks of the
river, with Judith, my old companion; or sitting
on the housetop at the evening hour, between
her and Onias, conversing of the times and the
prospects, opening or closing before us. I find
that my true home is now, and must henceforth
be in Judea. I can never again dwell in Rome.
And I doubt not, my mother, that when the
aspect of affairs here shall become more settled,
and it shall be determined concerning Jesus
and Herod, whether either of them or neither
shall reign in Israel, you will stand ready, as
indeed
your promises have assured me you will,
to leave Rome behind, and pass the decline of
life here in the land of our Fathers  and we
will hope under the reign of some native prince,
if not beneath the rule of Messiah himself.
But of this I will speak hereafter; I am now
to tell you of whatever takes place here in
Beth-Harem concerning our household, or in
Judea concerning Jesus.
I find Judith occupied only by one thought,
that of Jesus, and the probable events of the
Passover. Though she will not admit that she
doubts whether Jesus will confirm her hopes
by assuming his proper rank at the feast, yet is
it evident, that her fears, or apprehensions,
outweigh
and outrun her hopes, for her
countenance
is ever anxious; and when her thought,
or her conversation dwells more especially on
these themes, its expression is melancholy and
sad. I asked her of the progress he had made
since the last letters I had received, and
whether
more or fewer miracles than before had been
performed.
Julian, she answered, had God himself
walked among us in bodily shape, and powers
of healing had flowed out from the glance of
his eye, or the air in which he moved, or the
touch of his garments, the effects that had
followed
would not have been more astonishing
than the new wonders that have been wrought
by Jesus, either in respect to their number, or
their greatness. Wherever he hath moved have
miracles been witnessed, such as have filled all
with amazement, and from all have drawn the
same exclamation, `who shall this be but the
Christ?'
And you also have followed him, I said.
Not constantly, she replied, as have
some; as now do Mary of Magdala and Joanna,
the wife of Chuza
She is then a disciple at last, I exclaimed.
No one more devoted and sincere, replied
Judith. It was long before the late feast, that
withdrawing from the service of Herod, with
whom  then at length, the open enemy and
persecutor of Jesus, plotting even against his
life  she would no longer remain, she obeyed
the desires of her heart, and joined the number
of those who followed Jesus, hearing him
whenever she could, and whenever he tarried
long in any one city, resorting thither, her
husband
with her, but not as yet, like her, a
believer. For myself, continued Judith, I
went not far from Beth-Harem; but when Jesus
drew nigh, in the lower parts of Galilee, and
especially while he sojourned here on the
Jordan
,
and in the nearer regions of the Pera,
thou wilt not doubt that I was then with him,
Ruth being ever my companion.
And after seeing and hearing for thyself,
Judith, how stands thy faith?
In the very strength of God! she replied.
And with no accompanying doubt?
25 *
With none, she answered. Whether,
she added, after a pause, it be reasonable so
to believe and trust, I know not; but so it is,
after what I have beheld of the powers of
Jesus, and have heard of his doctrine, I believe
in him perforce, even as I believe in God. The
works of God, the Heavens with their hosts
declare him their maker and supporter; and so
also the works of Jesus declare him to be of
God, clothed with so much of a divine power
as is needful to do such things. And when
such an one proclaims himself, whether plainly
or obscurely to be the Christ, shall not his
declaration be received? I know not how to
refuse it. Would it not be to say that God can
speak falsely?
It would, indeed, I answered. Yet
many of his most constant followers take
offence
at his speech, and forsake him, or are in
doubt.
I see not what they would have; Judith
replied. He indeed now speaks of his death
as about to happen  many think at the
approaching
feast, but then he declares at the
same time, that death shall not injure him, for
he can resist its power. And who can doubt
that when he has raised others from the dead,
and lately Lazarus of Bethany who had been
long buried, he can protect himself from the
effects of whatever might be inflicted upon
him, or by virtues previously infused into his
body, return to life after life had been taken
away. Why he should permit himself to be
slain, I indeed cannot tell; unless it be by
restoring
life again to himself, still further to
increase the confidence of others in his power,
and that he may then, having so returned
restore
at length the kingdom to Israel.
Ah, Judith, I perceive that thy faith stands
indeed in a divine strength; at least in a
strength that is furnished not from any of the
resources of human reason. I must confess,
that for myself, though to the present moment
I had believed with thee, the death of Jesus
would convince me at length of my delusion.
And I may safely promise therefore, that, if
being destroyed by the Priests or the Romans,
he should overcome the power of death, and
as thou thinkest, return to life, and then enter
into his kingdom, I will myself believe in him,
take him as the Christ, and wear the yoke of
his allegiance.
I shall not doubt then, said Judith, to see
thee both a disciple and a subject.
It was with no little eagerness that, soon after
my arrival, I sought the home of Ruth and her
father  he now in possession again of his limbs
and his sight. By the aid of Onias and of
ancient friends in Beth-Harem he has become
a husbandman on the banks of the Jordan.
There I found him, and now the mistress of a
well stored and comfortable dwelling, Ruth
also, the happiest and the brightest spirit of
these regions. They were truly glad to
behold
again one, who by a kind fortune, both as
regards them, and himself, had first helped to
lift them up out of their low estate. But every
feeling toward me was lost in one of gratitude
and love for Jesus, to whom they owe so much
more. It is their delight to speak of him, and
they would gladly have followed him had he
encouraged them to do so. They now look
forward with great expectations to the time,
which they doubt not will come, when he shall
stand revealed before the people. Their joy
would be double, could they behold him seated
where they think it his right to sit, and raised
above any apprehension from those who are
thirsting for his life. The approaching passover
is expected by them with impatience, as they
intend to go up to Jerusalem and trust then to
see Jesus again, and are fully persuaded that at
that time he will declare himself and appear
what he really is. The rumors of his death,
both as predicted by himself, or threatened by
the Pharisees and Rulers, they will not credit.
As for the purpose on the part of the Rulers to
destroy him by accusing him before Pilate, they
say that it is but the same report that has been
renewed from time to time, during the whole
year that Jesus has taught; and as for any
prediction
of such an event by himself, they judge
it too little probable to deserve any credit. It is
to them unlikely in proportion to their
persuasion
that Jesus is Christ, and in that they are
immovably fixed. More grateful, hoping, and
believing followers Jesus has not in all the
compass
of Judea than Levi and Ruth.
The Ruler Shammai has been with us to-day.
Upon inquiring for Zadok, he replied that he
was already gone up to Jerusalem.
Why so early? Judith inquired.
Can you ask daughter? said Shammai.
I need not have asked, certainly, replied
Judith sighing; the same cruel zeal, that has
carried him so many times over Judea and
Galilee
,
doubtless has now carried him to Jerusalem.
May Jehovah confound all his counsels, and
bring them to nought!
He will not rest, said the Ruler, until he
has accomplished his aim. He can scarcely
fail, what with his own craft, and the power of
those with whom he is in league.
And his aim, I said, is the accusation
and destruction of Jesus I suppose.
Yes, said Shammai, nothing less. John
being disposed of, the adherents of Herod look
upon Jesus as the only remaining obstacle in
their way.
But, said I, are not the people clearly
with Jesus? When, as before the Feast of
Tabernacles
I mingled much with them, I found
them for the most part of his side; and as I
learn the numbers of his followers and friends
have greatly increased of late, many even
among the rich, and in high station, looking
upon him with favor, and secretly favoring him,
if not openly confessing him.
That is true, said the Ruler; the people
worship him, and show their homage by crowding
about him, hearing him preach, and looking on
upon his miracles. But they are a loose,
tumultuous
,
and changing body, without leaders and
without power, notwithstanding their numbers.
It will be easy for Zadok and a few like himself
to manage them; nay by a little skill to make
it appear that the people themselves require his
destruction. There is a body of men in
Jerusalem
,
Priests, Rulers, Pharisees, and Scribes, to
whom, when united for some common object,
the destruction of a friendless, solitary
individual
,
like Jesus, will be but as the crushing of an
insect.
Say not so, Shammai, said Judith. I will
not believe that there are in all Jerusalem, bold
and wicked as those white-washed Priests are,
men to be found who will dare to assail with
ill intent a man like Jesus, so evidently even in
their own eyes full of the very power of God.
They will fear lest their hands fall blasted at
the very touch of him, and the curse of the
Almighty cleave to, and pursue them.
Judith, Judith, cried Onias, thou
knowest
not what thou sayest. If the Law is what
we have taken it to be, even the Law of God,
then doth Jesus well deserve to die! for what
precept is there he hath not perverted, or
what holy day he hath not violated? When,
seeing what his powers are, we looked to
behold
him its friend and protector, what doth
he but bring it into contempt more and more,
breaking its commands himself and teaching
others so? Be not so carried away, my
daughter
,
by insane hopes as to despise the word of
God  which so many years has been the boast
and glory of his people, and raised them to a
place above all the nations of the earth, whom
God has been pleased to leave in their idolatry
and in its room thrust the new doctrines of this
young man of yesterday; for which, if he
offer the proof of his miracles, they must be
the product of Devils, seeing that God cannot
overthrow his own work.
Said Shammai, not only will he be charged
with breaking the Law, and with blasphemy for
making himself the Son of God, but with
treasonable designs against the Roman Power,
in that he would set up a new kingdom here
in Judea.
That, which they who accuse him charge
him with, themselves would do, cried Judith.
So it must be said, replied Shammai.
Beware, my child, what thou sayest, said
Onias. As sure as it shall be that Jesus is at
the feast, so sure will it be that he will fall before
the united power of Herod and the Pharisees;
and who can say that with him his followers
may not also fall? If Pilate shall be made to
believe that Jesus has aimed at dominion, it
will be easy to turn his jealous mind against
others also. And who more than Zadok hath
knowledge of the faith of every soul in Israel?
I fear not Zadok, my father, replied
Judith
,
nor the attempts of any leagued with
him either in Jerusalem or elsewhere. What I
am sure of is this, that the people are with
Jesus from end to end of Israel, not doubting,
that now at the Passover, or soon, their hopes
will be fulfilled. A few in Jerusalem of Priests
and Herodians may raise tumults, and by sudden
violence, by injustice and deceit attempt the
life of Jesus and of his disciples, but never can
they succeed. The people would not abandon
in his extremity one whom they have seen and
listened to so long as a Prophet of God.
My child, said Shammai; I fear thou
deceivest thyself. I too could wish that Jesus
might escape the snares that are on every side
set for him by the Sadducees, as well as by
Pharisees and Herodians; but as I judge, he
cannot
,
or will not. Were he now to listen to the
advice
of many, even as I learn of some of his
disciples
themselves, who warn him against going up
to Jerusalem  as they say only to die, and they
with him  he might doubtless retreat into
Per
a,
or upper Galilee or Arabia where Aretas
who already hath had communication with him
would give him protection, or into Parthia
where Artabanus would serve him doubtless
the same good turn. But, Judith, if he presses
on to Jerusalem, think not that the people can
save him, if it be that the Rulers should assail
him; for just as they shall perceive the schemes
of his enemies succeeding against him, and that
he falls more and more into their hands, will
their faith in him grow faint and die away. His
weakness at such a moment will prove him
not to be he for whom they had taken him.
`How,' they will say, `could the wicked
triumph
against the Lord's anointed! If he is
the Christ he will save himself! our help
cannot
VOL. II. 26
be needed; and if he save not himself, nor
fall upon his enemies to their utter destruction,
then may we know he is not the Christ, and
that we have been deceived.' They will
therefore
stand still, and await the issue.
The words of Shammai, Judith, said Onias,
cannot be gainsaid. That such will be the
conduct of the people, there can be no doubt in
any one who will mix with them and hear
their language. They will not, nor in truth,
could they rise in defence of one who hath ever
taught them the love of peace, to bear wrong
rather than resist it  in no case to return evil
for evil; and all Israel knows such to be the
maxims this strange man hath preached. They
will hope to see him blaze forth in the resistless
power of one whom they believe God to be
with, and so vindicate his claims to the throne
of Israel. But that will be his work, not
theirs.
Do you also think the same, Julian? said
Judith turning to me.
I can think no otherwise, I answered.
Judith sat for a moment buried in thought,
when she lifted her head and said, I believe
you are right; it must be so. If Jesus fall
before
his enemies he is not our Deliverer; if he
triumph over them by the same power we have
seen him use against disease and death itself,
then in that shall we be furnished with the
sign of his greatness, not to be mistaken, for
which we have asked and waited so long. But
no more do I doubt that such signs shall be
given, than that his birth was announced by
angels, that the voice of God was heard at his
baptism, that Lazarus and the Widow's Son
returned from death at his word, that the
heavens
are above me and the earth beneath me. God
has been with him thus far  or else all is false,
every thing a dream  and he will not forsake
him now, or ever. He has defended him against
the Nazarenes, and against Herod, and against
the furious rabble who many a time have set upon
him to stone him; and when his need shall be
greatest, and those who hate him shall be
gathered
together in one place, it will not be then
for the first time, that his own power, or the
power of God shall fail him. In some way, it
may be in a way we now think not of, God
will appear and show him to be his Son
Redeemer
and King. For myself, I shall go up
to Jerusalem to this feast, as one who goeth to
a marriage with songs and dancing.
Said Shammai, it may be so, who can tell?
Time will show.
All is so strange concerning him, I said,
that it cannot be denied to be possible. That
God hath been his strength hitherto, I find it
difficult not to believe; he hath surely
enabled
him to do wonderful things, and hath
saved him out of threatening dangers. Who
shall say there is no good ground of hope, that
if darker dangers should encompass him in
Jerusalem, a power of God shall be put forth
for his deliverance greater than ever  nay
there is force in what Judith says, that it were
strange indeed should it not be so. But,
whatever
power may be put forth, and whatever
deliverance
be wrought out, who can believe that
such an one as Jesus shall be shown to be
Messiah? It is not surely the possession of power
alone that shall make Jesus, or any other, to be
the Christ, but a certain kind and fitness of
character, which Jesus hath not, and which
seems not possible to belong to him.
The young man says what is doubtless
true and just, said Onias, and so the event
will show. Why do so many in Israel reject
and deny Jesus as the Christ, but because they
see not in him the lineaments of the Christ?
Why are Chorazin and Bethsaida, and now
Capernaum, unbelieving, yea and Nazareth also,
but because in Jesus, notwithstanding the
wonders
of his hand, howsoever wrought, they see
not the son of David! Many  and who shall
wholly deny them reason?  give his works to
the Prince of Devils! To them do I now
incline; for, if they were of God, he who works
them could not, as Jesus doth, deceive the
people
or violate the law. But they of the Jews
are to be counted by multitudes, who, though
they see God in the miracles of Jesus, do not
behold the Christ in him; nor will they look
upon it as a possible thing that he should ever
be found in him.  Israel will not be at peace
until Jesus shall be as John! And what would
happen most happily for the people would be,
that, at the feast, Jesus should by the Council
be accused, and suffer at the hands of Pilate
the just punishment of his deeds.
Judith said no more, but Ruth coming in at
that moment, she arose and with her withdrew,
grieved for the words of her father, into the
garden
.
Were all in Judea, said Onias, like Judith,
the triumph of Jesus were a sure and an easy one.
Her whole speech by day, and her dreams by
night are of him; and it is what she has heard
of his teaching, even more than what she has
seen of his works, that has so won her heart.
Not a disciple that follows his steps has a faith
like hers. And the faith of few has been so
assailed as hers hath been, what with Zadok
and Onias. Would it were placed on somewhat
more worthy. He who hath thus thrown Israel
into confusion, trampled on the law, insulted
26 *
the priesthood, and will die as the fool dieth,
little deserves it. Verily, but for him, the true
Messiah were long ere this sitting on the throne
of Israel.
There no longer seems any doubt that the
destruction of Jesus is resolved upon by the
council, and that most of the chief men and
rulers look on with approval, or openly aid
them in the measures they pursue. The works
of Jesus of late, which have been so wonderful
and astonishing, have filled them with new
rage, and wholly blinded them to the truth,
that, though Jesus is not, or will not be the
Christ, he may still be a prophet and
messenger
of God. As he disappoints them in one
thing, they have hardened themselves against
all his claims, ascribe his power to Satan, and
are bent only on his ruin. He who has exposed
them before the people, and laid bare their
hollowness and hypocrisies, though he may do
the works of Angels they will not forgive, but
will have their revenge. And the great thing
which he hath so lately done at Bethany, the
fame of which has filled the land and brought
many to believe in him, has seemed but to
inflame their rage to a higher pitch of madness.
That they, rather than Jesus, may possibly be
blasphemers and rebels against the authority of
God, never enters their mind. But their
persecutions
of Jesus and his followers will surely
serve but to endear them the more to the people
on whom they have conferred so many benefits.
Were it not for the industry with which the
Scribes and Rulers sow the seeds of doubt and
distrust in the minds of the multitude, all would,
methinks, believe in Jesus, through veneration of
his virtues  through simple love of him as a
gentle and beneficent friend. Each one with
whom you may converse has something to tell
of what he has done to himself or some
kinsman
or neighbor  of some instruction he has
imparted, or some miracle of mercy he has
wrought. They say that both for his goodness
and his powers they doubt not that he partakes
of the spirit of God, even as the prophets of
old  and these things also so far make for him
that he is the Christ;  they would rather,
therefore, that he were left alone untouched,
unimpeded by the rulers, to finish his ministry,
whatever it may be, and perhaps other signs,
in process of days or weeks, and such as we
look for, will be given. A general persuasion
has gone abroad, that at the present Passover
such signs will at length be given, and all their
hopes be fulfilled, in consequence of which
multitudes far greater than usual are going up
to the feast. But while the populace are thus
justly disposed, they are at the same time weak,
timid, and distrustful  they will do no more
than stand by at rest, ready to receive Jesus if
he shall commit himself to them, but not ready,
nor able, as their temper now is, to do aught to
deliver him from the hands of the Priests, if they
should finally determine to assail him. According
to the saying of Shammai, they will leave him to
his own strength, trusting to behold, in the
manner
in which he shall use it, tokens of his
authority, and signs of his great office.
The day had now arrived, when we were to
set forth on our way to Jerusalem. We were
bound to the dwelling of Heber, a kinsman of
the mother of Judith, standing without the city
just where the mount of Olives falls into the
plain, and opposite the fount of Siloam. But
seeing that at this feast the houses of those
who inhabit the city, or its near neighborhood,
are hardly able to hold the numbers of such as
pour in from all parts of the land, we took with
us by the providence of Onias, loaded upon a
camel, the materials of a tent, which, if the
necessity arose, would serve as a protection
against the heat of the day season, and by night
furnish a cooler retreat and more agreeable than
the closer apartments of a dwelling.
The heavens smiled upon us with a gentle air
and a temperate heat, as we took our departure
from the house of Onias. Two days must be
devoted to the journey, as Judith and Ruth
seated upon slow-paced mules made a part of
our company, and our motion would therefore
be slow; and for their more especial companion,
and seated on the same wretched kind of beast,
Shammai;  Ziba, with others of the servants of
Onias, conducting the camels heavy-loaded with
our tent and other effects. Onias, Levi, and
myself, mounted upon fleeter animals, were able
to make more rapid progress, so that often, while
the Ruler and his two maidens crept lazily
along, we turned aside into any path that
appeared
more inviting, or visited spots not far
from our course, noted in the history of our
people.
The roads were already beginning to fill
with those who like ourselves were seeking
Jerusalem  some from the regions of upper
Galilee, from Decapolis and the parts still farther
east, and some even from Damascus and the
banks of the Euphrates, who, that they may at
the same time perform a religious duty, and
visit kinsmen or friends from whom they have
separated for the advantages of a foreign
residence
,
turn annually towards the great capital at
this season of the year. With these distant
travellers we often entered into conversation,
giving and receiving intelligence concerning
the condition of our people in all parts of the
world. The great inquiry on their part was of
Jesus, and whether he would probably be at
the feast, and what would happen if he should
be there. Having only heard reports of him
until now, their only desire seemed to be to
see him, and their only apprehension lest he
should not be present. Family and friends and
the observance of the festival were forgotten in
the thoughts, the hopes, and the fears that
possessed them concerning this wonderful man.
They seemed for the most part in a state of
great uncertainty, not knowing what to think
of him, nor hardly what to wish for or expect.
Many indeed were violent enough, and desired
only that so great a disturber of the public
peace, and who was likely to bring down upon
the whole people the wrath of Rome, thereby
destroying the traffic of every sort now
prosperously
going on, might be summarily dealt
with, and that too, ere the mischief grew to
any more serious head. Others thought that
any teaching and any teacher was to be
welcomed
even, that could redeem the Law of
Moses
from the practices and the perversions of the
reigning sects, who had made it, one set of
them little better than a religion without God,
or spirit, or a future; and another, a cover, by
means of a plenty of dead forms, of every
wicked vice and lust. We might be grateful,
they thought, toward any one who should bring
back a true worship, no matter for the way he
took to reach his end. But there were none
from the remoter parts who deemed Jesus to be
the Messiah, or thought that he, any more than
John, was fitted for that great office. I enjoyed
in the highest degree these passing glimpses of
men of all forms of Jewish faith, and obtained
much knowledge of the character of
communities
of our people, of which before I had heard
little, and knew hardly of their existence.
Shammai, as I have said, was the more
especial
guardian of Ruth and Judith; but it many
times happened that, tempting him forward into
the company of Onias and Levi, and engaging
him in some dispute, I then fell back and took
upon myself the more agreeable duties of his
office. So full of pleasures of the highest kind,
my mother, were these two days, that were I
to describe them the hours must be treated as
days and the moments as hours.
Upon leaving the house of Onias, we crossed
the Jordan at the Ox Ford, and keeping upon
the west bank of the river took the road to
Jericho
.
Avoiding the city, we struck directly for
the barren wastes and rocky defiles which
conduct
the traveller to Jerusalem.
You will readily believe it was with no
common
emotion that I found myself drawing near
for the first time to so celebrated a place. The
sentiments, which possessed me when I first
beheld from the ocean the outlines of Lebanon,
and first set my foot upon the soil of Csarea,
were again present. As I ascended the eastern
side of the Mount of Olives, passing through
Bethany, and knew that upon reaching its
summit
or coming to its descent the long expected
prospect would break upon me, I could with
difficulty
restrain my pace to that of Judith's mule,
whose step seemed slower than ever before.
But the hill was in due time surmounted, and
soon as we had crossed a part of its summit, and
passed from out the groves which clothe its
western brow, the city, as it were in a moment
of time, stood before us in its whole extent, no
object whatsoever intervening to cut off the
least portion of the prospect. Mount Moriah
crowned with its Temple rising from the vast
supporting walls that form a part of the hill on
which it stands, Mount Sion with its shining
palaces, Acra and Bezetha, the heavy walls of the
city girding it about, with their gate-ways and
frequent towers  all lay before me a vision of
greatness and beauty not surpassed by any other
I had ever beheld. The vast assemblage of
temple, palace, and dwelling, with the
swarming
populace and all the thousand signs of
overflowing
and active life, struck the mind the more
impressively too from standing, as it all did,
in the midst of surrounding hills, whose bare
and rugged tops and sides gave no token of
aught but sterility and death. The eye beheld
nothing upon them but flocks of sheep among
the grey rocks, hardly to be distinguished from
the rocks themselves, and so only adding one
more to the other features of desolation.
Another
scene was, however, presented by fertile
valleys
at their feet thickly inhabited, their olive
orchards, and their vineyards creeping a little
way up the barren hillsides. At the roots of the
hill we were upon, and all along upon the banks
of he Kedron, the white, pointed tents of
strangers
and travellers were visible, who had, like
ourselves, come thus early to witness the events
that should ensue, while the roads leading to
the gates of the city, and crossing the plain in
all directions, were filled with crowds of those
who on horse and on foot or in vehicles of every
various kind were arriving or departing. Clouds
of dust, converted by the rays of the setting
sun to a gaudy purple hue, rose and hovered
over the whole scene, through which glittered
the shining points of polished harness, or the
steel trappings of troops of Roman horses as they
shot swiftly along. We stopped and gazed ere
VOL. II. 27
we descended the hill, that we might enjoy
awhile the beauty and magnificence that were
spread out below. To Judith and to others it
was an old and familiar sight; but they looked
forth upon it, and paused while they looked, not
less willingly than I. But Onias soon warned
us of the waning day, and that all the
remaining
time might be needed to make our
preparations
for the night. We therefore at a quick
rate descended the mount, and moved toward
the dwelling of Heber, where we were
welcomed
with patriarchal hospitality by the
venerable
Israelite.
That having occurred against which Onias
had made good provision, our tents were soon
set up on the grounds of Heber, where they
overlooked both the city and the road
descending
from the Mount of Olives.
The day succeeding this being the Sabbath, I
resorted early to the city in company with
Onias. I was filled with admiration as I drew
nearer to the walls, and saw their immense
height and thickness, and the strength of the
gates with the defences of their vast towers, and
considered that, owing to these things and to its
natural position, it was a place absolutely
impregnable
.
On this side, indeed, the city derives
great advantage from the height of the ground
on which it stands, in addition to that of the
walls. But were there the walls alone, it seemed
to me an impossible thing that they should
either be surmounted by an enemy, or
demolished
by engines. Onias with a proud step,
as he beheld my wonder, led me on to the gates,
and through them into the city, pointing out as
he went the buildings that were most
remarkable
,
and the persons also whom we met, who
were distinguished for their office or their power
over the people. At length hastening along
the streets, now thronged with those who were
pouring also in the same direction, we reached the
great object of my desire, that which from my
infancy I had ever wished to behold, the
Temple
.
Truly did Herod show his magnificence
in this vast and beautiful structure. If in other
cities, as I have seen, he did great things and
well worthy of admiration, here he did greater
still; so that, as I judge, all that together he
had built in Csarea would not compare with
what, for grandeur, perfect workmanship,
proportion
,
and variety of beauty, he accomplished
in Jerusalem in this single building. The marble
of which it is built is beautiful and polished to
the smoothness of crystal, yet are the separate
pieces so large that it is surprising they should
have been laid in their places safely and
without
injury at such heights. The innumerable
columns surrounding the courts of the
Gentiles
and the Women, and supporting the
porticos
which encompass the building, create
unfeigned
astonishment in the beholder.
All parts of it on the morning of this Sabbath
I found swarming with the numbers of those
who had come up, some to worship, some, like
myself, strangers from remote parts to wonder
and gaze, and some to converse and learn the
news of those who had recently arrived. The
name of Jesus was heard from every one, as he
passed talking with another, or as he addressed
yourself. All were asking some question
concerning
him of those who, they supposed, might
know better than themselves, or else
answering
those who had made inquiries, or else
loudly and fiercely disputing concerning his
character, authority, and works, and the
designs
of the Council. In the outer courts,
where the meaner sort of people assemble,
no measures were kept among those who
disputed
,
but words often came to blows, and
peace was restored only by the interference
of officers of the Temple.
The question put by all to all was, will he
come up to the feast? who can tell? As I
stood upon the upper steps of those leading to
the Treasury, I was accosted by one, who said,
Sir, can you tell me if Jesus will be at the
feast? I answered that I could not, but I
trusted much to the general persuasion that he
would come. Though none can say that he
will from any certain knowledge, yet all feel
assured that he will, and there are none to say
nay. Such general convictions commonly turn
out well founded.
What you say, he replied, is true.
Seeing
you, however, but now in company with
Onias of Beth-Harem, I looked for more certain
intelligence at your hands, as Jesus has of late
been in those regions.
He has moved so fast, I replied, from
place to place, as if hasting to complete some
work that he had to do in season, that it is
likely none can tell where he has been, or
where he now is, save those disciples who, as I
hear, never leave him.
Some others know a little, cried a voice
at my side, as well as those of whom you
speak. Two days ago he was in the Pera,
beyond Jordan  to be in the outskirts of Jericho
on the Sabbath, where I doubt not he now is.
And what is more, he will be in Jerusalem at
the feast. So saying he turned away, and
passing from place to place, repeated his news
to as many as would hear. This is news
indeed, said he who had first spoken. It
will crowd the city more and more. What
think you will happen?
27 *
I said that I was a stranger in Jerusalem, and
would rather learn of him.
I am in no man's secrets, he answered,
and can tell you only what is confidently
reported, and my own opinion.
And what will happen as you think, or as
is commonly believed?
What I think then is this, that Jesus will
publicly, as it is well known he has done
privately
,
declare himself, and the people will rise
in his favor. It is all abroad among them
already, that he hath of late, not obscurely as
heretofore, but plainly announced himself the
Christ, which has greatly stirred them; and that,
together with their own belief founded on his
miracles, will draw them all around him.
But, I asked, has he not, at the same
time that he has declared himself Christ,
prophesied
his death by the Council?
That is said, he answered, but is not
believed. Besides, they say if he has uttered
such a word, it can mean only that he shall die
as Jesus the Nazarene, and then begin his reign
and true life as the Christ. But so bent are
they on having their way that, whether he will
or not, they will hail him and have him King.
If he be not really such, I said, it will
bring down upon him a great danger, and
possibly
his ruin. They would be more cautious
perhaps, if they considered that. They surely
would not desire to do him an injury.
Certainly not; but the difficulty would be
to put a new opinion into them. It cannot be
done; what they want they will have and do.
But while such is their purpose, the Council are
bent upon his death, and will compass it, if by
force or fraud it can be done.
They will find it, I think, a thing
impossible
to do, in the present temper of the
populace
.
I am also clear, he replied, that it would
breed tumults not easy to be allayed. Yet they
may accomplish that by craft, and secretly,
which they could not do openly and in the eye
of day. To give their accusations color, as if
they sprung not so much from themselves as
from some of the followers of Jesus who would
fain do the State a service, it is rumored that
one of them is found who will inform against
him, and accuse him before the Council.
That may be said, I answered, but
cannot
be true; for no one thing is affirmed so
constantly as this, the veneration and affection
with which Jesus is regarded by those who are
about him; so that one might as soon expect
that Jesus should accuse himself as that one of
his disciples should.
Trust not that, rejoined my companion;
gold will bribe any virtue  at least any to
be found in Jerusalem. With that the Council
shall buy, mark now the issue, the bosom friend
of this Nazarene, and the judgment of Pilate!
I had thought better, I said, of my
countrymen
,
if not of Pilate.
It was because of your ignorance, he
rejoined
;
and wishing me peace, turned away.
What I had heard from this man, who seemed
to know more, and with more certainty, than
he was willing to acknowledge, gave me pain.
I forgot for a time where I was, and continued
to pace the marble floors of the Porticos,
thinking
only of the probable doom of this good
man. I would willingly have moved in the
cause of his deliverance, but I could see no
quarter
whence it could come. All the men in power,
the Rulers of the Synagogues, the High Priests
Annas and Caiaphas, the principal persons
both among the Pharisees and Sadducees, were
alike banded together against him,  and for
him, only the fickle, helpless, unmanageable
people, well disposed, hoping everything, but
only half believing their own opinion
concerning
him. I could only say, God surely has
been with him thus far; he must have some
great purpose in thus sending him forth, and
will not allow that it shall be defeated; safely
and confidently then may we leave him in his
hands. The darkness is too profound for us to
penetrate.
Turning away, I passed from the Temple into
the streets, and entering a Synagogue, passed
there the hour of worship. They who preached
failed not to turn away the minds of the people,
by every form of statement and argument, from
Jesus and his doctrines. The great
considerations
,
here in Jerusalem seemed to be, that he
was a disturber of the peace of the city and the
nation, interrupted their business, caused uproar
and confusion, gave umbrage to the Romans,
brought the law and its ministers into contempt,
and substituted dangerous novelities in the place
of ancient truth;  his miracles were shown to
be the work of Devils, and the citizens were
exhorted to oppose him, and all who clave to
him. Most assented to such things, but some
expressed their dissatisfaction aloud, and
attempted
to reply by showing the opinions of
those who believed in Jesus, but the voices of
too many were lifted up against them, and the
service ended in noise and confusion.
Well wearied at length of the city, I sought
our tent at the foot of the mount, where in the
more quiet presence of Ruth, Judith, their
parents
,
and the venerable Heber, I enjoyed a
higher pleasure than before. It would have
been higher still, but that so bitter is this
benevolent
old Jew's hostility against Jesus, that he
will not permit his name to be mentioned in his
presence; or, if he converses of him at all, it is
with a force of passion that changes him for the
time to a madman. We therefore abstained
from all such topics until the evening, and the
moon had risen, when we wandered forth to
the Fountain of Siloam, where, seated among
its rocks and shades, we discoursed of the only
things that now engaged us, of Jesus, and of
his doctrine, as it is alleged to be, and
indulged
freely our conjectures of the events of
the approaching feast.
As we sat there, and as we afterwards walked
returning to the house of Heber, the sound of
music came to us from neighboring houses in all
directions, in whose apartments, or in the grounds
about them, there were companies of persons
who sang hymns or songs, or danced to the
playing of various instruments.
On the following day it became well known
among the people, that Jesus had arrived at
Bethany, and that he would with certainty be
in Jerusalem at the feast. A great stir was
evident among all, of every sect and rank,
produced
by this intelligence. Great numbers,
immediately
abandoning whatever might be the
affairs in hand, left the city at once, and made
for Bethany. All day the crowds filled the
way, coming or going. Learning from some
who returned, that Jesus was indeed there at
the house of Lazarus, whom he had raised from
the dead, but that on the morrow he would
come to the city, I went not, though I
restrained
myself with difficulty, but waited
till he should himself arrive. In the
meanwhile
I saw and conversed with many of the
inhabitants of the city. I found them sure of
one thing, that Jesus was now coming into the
city as the Son of David, that he would
proclaim
himself, and assume his proper place;
they would go forth in great numbers to meet
him, and receive him as it became them to do.
They said that the Council were already
alarmed
at teh signs every where so apparent, of
devotion
to Jesus, and knew not what measures
to adopt to check the raging of the fever. It
was evident, that they were now apprehensive,
lest Jesus would prove, what he had often been
affirmed to be, and they should lose their power.
I could urge nothing against their assertions,
or their expectations, neither did I wish to do
so. It all seemed now likely enough to happen
as they were so confidently predicting. Who
at least can do otherwise than yield before the
strong persuasions of an immense multitude?
Whatever sentiment universally seizes and
pervades
them, it is difficult to believe will not be
realized. Such consent, among so many,
affects
the mind, whether it will or not, with the
force of truth.
Another day has come and gone  Jesus has
entered the city  I have seen him.
Early in the morning it became apparent,
that that would take place which had been
looked for. For so soon as the gates were open,
the people began to pour forth, and throng the
road leading by the house of Heber and over
the Mount of Olives to Bethany. As the day
advanced, the crowds increased of persons of all
sorts and conditions, the old as well as the
young, the rich and poor, women and little
children. It seemed as if the whole city had
come abroad to honor by its presence and
welcome
,
at least witness, the entrance of one who
was either to reign over it as King, or else, it
might be, fall a sacrifice to the rage of the
present
rulers. If one might judge by the
countenance
,
but especially by the language which
continually fell upon the ear, they who had
thus come abroad had come in the spirit of
friendship, and with the intention to show that
if Jesus would meet them in their wishes, they
on the other hand would acknowledge and
receive
him. As these crowds passed by our
tent, loud and ardent in their talk, their lively
gesticulations, as well as their voices, showing
what hopes and passions were ruling within, it
was in vain that I longer tried to resist the
contagion
,
but leaving Judith and Ruth at the tent
door, threw myself into the midst of the
living
mass, and was borne along with it up
the Mount, and on toward Bethphage and
Bethany
.
When we had reached the brow of the
hill and were about passing it, the sound of
voices as of a great number caught our ears,
and looking forward we beheld where, as the
road suddenly turned, Jesus, surrounded by
another multitude, came on toward us. The
air was now filled with the exulting cries of the
approaching throng, which, caught up by us
and those who were behind, rolled on an
increasing
shout even to the gates of the city,
announcing to those who covered the walls and
the towers, that Jesus was drawing nigh. Never
were a people, I believe, so carried away by
what cannot be termed other than a sacred zeal.
No language was too lofty and confident for
them to utter, no acts of homage too expressive
to render of their loyalty and devotion. The
way was all along strewn with the leaves and
branches of trees, which the eager populace
tore from the groves that bordered the road;
branches of the Palm were waved over their
VOL. II. 28
heads and ever, as Jesus slowly moved on, often
wholly obstructed by the struggling crowds,
they who were immediately about him cast
their garments in the way as before a king.
Many, especially such as had at any time
received
benefits of healing at his hands, or whose
friends had been restored by his power, cast
themselves down prostrate on the ground, as
the only sufficient sign they could offer of their
reverence and gratitude. I cannot well describe
my sensations as Jesus drew nigh, so that I
could with distinctness observe his countenance
and form, but they were such as I never before
experienced in the presence of a mortal; and it
could not well be otherwise, as I doubted not
that I looked upon one within whom were
lodged the very power and wisdom of
Jehovah
.
Awe and dread were therefore the
feelings that would have alone prevailed, were
it not that, however wonderfully I felt he
was united to God, I saw that the language
of his countenance was not that of an Angel,
nor of a God, but of a man bound, like myself,
by the closest ties to every one of the
multitudes
who thronged him. Its expression was
mild and pitiful; but at the same time of one
who, if full of regard and compassion for each
and for all, also possessed the energies and the
will to do for those whom he loved whatsoever
should be needful for their advantage or
redemption
.
Strength and power were lodged
in the lines and forms of the face, not any less
than benevolence, giving ample assurance that
there were inward forces of intellect and will,
equal to every work that might be given him
to do. His was therefore the aspect of a person
who  and this was what I had gathered also
from the observation of Onias  was to be
loved and yet feared also. He seemed buried
in thought for the most part as he rode along,
save that now and then he briefly responded to
the cries or the questions of those who pressed
about him. But he spake not many words, or
so that more than a very few could hear, until
we were come to the descent of the Mount of
Olives, and the city suddenly came into view in
all its glory  its walls, and towers, and
housetops
covered with her thronging inhabitants.
He then paused; and beholding with both
astonishment
and pity, as it seemed, the scene before
him, tears fell from his eyes; and though I
could not hear with distinctness all that he said,
he appeared to express apprehensions of great
evil and disaster as about to overtake Jerusalem
and Judea, of enemies who should assail and
oppress
them, and lay them waste. All who heard
were struck with amazement, and one to
another
uttered in secret tones their astonishment.
Thus while the innumerable multitude of those
who encompassed him, and hailed him King
and Deliverer, and could find no words of joy in
which to give vent to the hopes that were
within, he rejoiced not, but was evidently sad.
The sight of the city with its populace all
awaiting him, and the sounds of their tumultuous
cries as they were borne to us from afar, and
the waving of their hands in token of welcome,
seemed to awaken no feeling of triumph in his
heart, but, instead, drew forth tears. I confess
that I was also astonished; and could only say,
the whole of this man is mysterious and
impenetrable
we know him not  we do not
comprehend what he is, nor what he has come
to do.
Thus we moved on  but hardly moving by
reason of the constantly increasing throngs of
people  to the sublime music of their
acclamations
,
which without ceasing filled the air.
As we came against the house of Heber, our
humble tents I beheld swept away and
trampled
into the earth by the descending torrent,
which, swelling beyond the limits of the road,
spread far into the grounds on either side.
No other end seemed to be regarded by those
who composed these crowds, than, if possible, to
keep within sight of the object of their worship
or the hearing of his voice; and but that a Divine
Providence seemed to protect the people, great
numbers would have perished, trodden into the
earth by those who rushed madly on, forgetful,
in their struggles for precedence, of the feeble
and the young who filled their way.
The day was already well declined when we
reached the gates of the city, and when we had
arrived at the Temple it had drawn on towards
evening; when, therefore, after entering it Jesus
had again, as once before, purged it of those who
by their wicked practices violated its sanctity,
and the people had received assurance that he
would come again on the morrow, he returned to
Bethany, where at the house of Lazarus he had
taken up his abode.
Defiled with dust, and spent by the fatigue of
what I had done and borne and witnessed, I
returned gladly to the dwelling of Heber, where
I found the repose I needed. Our demolished
tents had already been set up again by the
servants
of the household, and our scattered effects
gathered together in their places.
After the hour of supper was over, we sat long
at the tent door, speaking of the events of the day
that had ended. Onias was gloomy and
thoughtful
.
Although he would make no concessions
of former opinions, it was evident that he had
seen cause for hesitation, in the heartiness of the
reception which the capital, as if possessed of
28 *
one mind, had given to the new prophet. No
event could be strange or unlikely after that.
Judith was full of confidence, and could with
difficulty lay so much restraint on the
expressions
of it, as regard for her father taught her
to impose. She was certain that now every
hope would be speedily fulfilled. The people
by a common impulse were eager to receive
Jesus; and who could now doubt that he was
the Saviour whom God had provided? Nothing
was impossible to him, armed as he now was
with the power of God and the consent of the
people
.
Onias heard all she advanced with patience
more than usual, and only said that there was
still too much of what was dark and
unintelligible
in the character of Jesus, and uncertain
in his purposes, for any undoubting reliance to
be placed either in him, or in those who thronged
him so  seeing that they could hardly pretend
to comprehend a person, who to the most learned
and penetrating was a mystery. Still new cause
of astonishment, continued Onias, has he
today
offered to those most inclined towards him, by
language which he used as he first came in sight
of the city, on the Mount of Olives. It is
variously
reported, but most say that he lifted up a
prophecy against Jerusalem, that he declared her
destruction as approaching, that the very walls of
her defence should be overthrown and torn up
from their foundation. What can we make of
this? It surely seems not much like the
language
of the great Restorer  the Repairer of
breaches! Had such things come to the ears of
that whole shouting multitude, it needs no gift
of a divine discernment to know that their
shouts would suddenly have fallen, and sounds
of a different kind, or silence, taken their place.
Heard you aught of that, Julian?
I answered, that I had heard of it, and
what was yet more I had myself heard most
of the words he had spoken. They were as he
had reported them, and in the minds of all
who heard them had created such astonishment
as he might suppose. But, I added, I doubt
not, it is all by this time forgotten, or
remembered
only as one of those dark sayings, many
of which are reported even by the disciples of
Jesus, to fall from him in his discourses.
By some, replied Onias, the saying is not
forgotten, but was treasured up as what it
behoved
the people to know, and hath since been
carefully spread abroad. Wherever it has gone,
I warrant you, it has done little to deepen the
place of the prophet in the hearts of those who
love the honor and safety of Jerusalem. That
he should be the Christ we look for, who
prophesies
ruin and disaster to Israel, few will be
inclined to believe.
It will take more, I said, than a single
dark saying variously reported, and which may
be interpreted many ways, to shake him from
the seat he now holds. The people are with
him. He needs at this moment, as I judge, but
to speak the word, and Antonia, the gates, the
walls, and the Roman camp, nay, Jerusalem
itself, are all his  and ere the news could reach
Italy, Judea also, and Israel from Dan to
Beersheba
!
Judith said nothing as I uttered these things,
but her countenance revealed, quite as well as
any words could have done, the emotions of
joy and hope, and of gratitude to me, that filled
her.
Thou art more of Judith's mind than I had
believed, said Onias scornfully; this
momentary
triumph of Jesus too much sways thee.
I said, I had intended to add what would
have shown that, notwithstanding the
astonishing
spectacle of to-day, I was still, in regard to
my opinion of Jesus, what I had been. Though
he at this moment, as I could not but think,
truly possessed all the power I had given to
him, I did not believe he would use it in the
way I had hinted, though I confessed I hardly
knew what to think or believe. It appeared to
me that his whole character and aim were
distinct
from, or rather entirely opposed to, what
belonged to the Christ. Jesus is a prophet
only.
The people of Jerusalem are, each day that
they have listened to Jesus in the temple,
becoming
more and more devoted to him.
Although
the Council are as resolved as ever upon
his destruction, and by their agents and spies,
contrive to throw obstacles in his way, and do
what they can to stir up the passions of the
multitude against him, they meet with little
success. The people gather around him, and
listen to his instructions; and going away, they
lose all the enmity they had entertained against
him in the softening influences of his word.
They doubt not that he is indeed a great
Prophet of God; and they still hope, and while
he lives, will hope, that he will declare himself
the Christ by the signs they look for. Their
honest devotion keeps in awe the Rulers and
Priests.
Fuller and more exact accounts, my mother,
than I have now given of the discourses of
Jesus during these few days, shall you ere long
receive from the records of Judith, who hears
no word  and she has heard all  that she
writes not down.
It was on the second day before the Sabbath
that, leaving the Temple, where I had been
listening to the discourses of Jesus I was
accosted
by a familiar voice, and turning I beheld the
Greek Zeno. While listening to Jesus, I had
observed the presence of Zadok and Saturninus,
but I had not caught the countenance of the
friendly Greek. I greeted him, as you will
suppose, with pleasure. He said that he had
been two days in Jerusalem, having come up
with others, among whom were Philus and
Lysias, with the purpose to see the wonderful
Man of Nazareth. I expressed my surprise that
he had never sought him before, seeing that his
desire of knowledge caused him usually to seek
it at every source. At every source, he quickly
rejoined, within the limits of Csarea. He
was strictly a citizen of that city, and rarely
strayed from its limits; and nothing less than a
desire to see a man, who seemed rather to be a
God descended upon earth than an ordinary
mortal, would have brought him so far, except
also the circumstance that some Jews,
proselytes
from his people, accompanied him, through
whom he was in hopes to see and converse with
Jesus. I asked him if he had succeeded in
obtaining
access to him. He said that he had;
and that it was while he and his companions
were still conversing with him, that the voice
had been heard in the Temple which yesterday
had filled all who were present with
astonishment
and dread, and startled the city itself.
He needed no other evidence, he said, for
himself
,
to be persuaded that Jesus was a
messenger
from Heaven. That voice was of no
mortal
tone  it was the voice of an angel, or of a
God, bearing testimony to Jesus. They who
hearing could resist it, would resist God himself,
though he appeared in his own form. I am
no Jew, said Zeno, but I am a believer in the
Supreme God, and in the power of the senses
to discern one thing from another, and form a
just judgment; and as certain as I am that I,
Zeno of Csarea, was there in the Temple of
Jerusalem, and in the presence of Jesus, so
certain
am I that the voice was the voice of a
God, and not of a man; and so I am sure
thought, in their hearts, all who were there.
My companions failed to compass the object for
which they desired an interview with Jesus,
relating, as I understood, to the government in
Judea they believed him to be about to
establish
,
and the place or employment they might
obtain for themselves under it  but they
received
convictions strong as my own, that he
whom their conversation proved, as they judged,
not to be the Messiah, was amply shown to be
a messenger of God. That he was not the
person they took him for, they thought to be
certain from the language which he used, when
he understood their aim, which astonished them
out of measure, for he told them that no such
favors as they were thinking of could ever flow
from him; but his empire was of a very different
kind; it could be founded only on his death
as a seed sown in the ground could bear fruit
only by in a manner first dying, so the good
fruits which he as Christ came to bestow upon
men, would flow only from his death; he was
to be exalted by first suffering and dying,
and it must be so with all who came and
attached
themselves to his cause; they would be
the ministers of great benefit to Israel and
mankind
,
but it would be not by reigning as princes
in Israel, but by doing and also suffering in the
same manner as he had done; and much more
to the same purpose which they seemed to
comprehend
very little. Of one thing, however,
they left him fully assured, that he was not the
peculiar kind of person or Prophet whom they
and the nation expect  that he had no
pretensions
to that character, but was at the same
time, beyond a doubt, a great and wonderful
person highly favored of God, and if he should
be permitted by the Priests to fulfil his mission
would confer great benefits on Israel. Their
fear was, however, from all they could learn,
that the Council was bent on his destruction,
and would succeed sooner or later in their aim.
Such was our interview, continued Zeno, with
Jesus. I am truly glad to have seen and heard
him; for no other is like him, either in the form,
the countenance, the voice, or the divine
wisdom
that flows from him as he speaks. I felt
compassion for him, Julian, notwithstanding his
wonderful power; for he seemed as one who in
the beginning of life is oppressed with
presentiments
of evil which it was impossible for him
to escape.
When Zeno had thus spoken, and we were
still walking in the streets of the city, I desired
him to accompany me to the dwelling of Heber,
which he readily consented to do. There we
found all our friends; and with them
Saturninus
,
who escapes, even for a moment, with
difficulty from the duties which now press upon
him. Because Heber, who is of the Sadducees,
with his household celebrates the Passover
on this evening, they were not with us, as at
this hour of the day they have commonly been.
The preparations of Onias are making for the
evening of the morrow.
When supper was ended we sat again at the
tent door, where we conversed together not long,
for a spirit of heaviness was upon us which we
VOL. II. 29
did not succeed in shaking off, and so caused
us early to separate. But when Judith had
spoken of the triumph which Jesus had thus
obtained
over the Council through the universal
homage of the people, and of the prospect which
thus was held out of his continuing to teach
the people even though he should never fill any
other office, Saturninus said that for his part
he could not but be under apprehensions for the
safety of Jesus even yet. He had observed
great activity among those whom he knew to be
emissaries of the Priests, and had noted that
Zadok especially, as he had met and spoken with
him, wore upon his countenance an expression
that signified a malignant satisfaction with some
purpose or plan, whatever it might be, that was
employing his thoughts. He had also received
from Pilate orders to be vigilant beyond the
usual measure, as if tumult was looked for. Yet
his suspicions might be unreasonable and have
grown out of his concern for the welfare of an
innocent and righteous man.
Onias thought it would by no means be
wonderful
,
if a new exasperation existed in the
minds of many who had heard him to day,
seeing what the prophecies were which he had
uttered.
But, said I, if he prophesied destruction to
the Temple and to Jerusalem, he did not spare
himself, since he spoke plainly of his own
death by violence.
Yet, said Judith, of his rising from the
dead also!
Yes, said Onias, he boasts that being
dead he will in three days come back again to
life. But how plain, if he possesses any such
power as could accomplish that, he would first
exert it to save himself from the pain of dying!
Who would die, had he power to deliver
himself
?
And at the last moment, to elude or escape
from the hands of the Council or Pilate, would
display his divine strength even as coming
again from the dead. All this shows real
weakness
,
and imposture.
Unless, said Judith, it should be true
that certain ends could be accomplished by his
death, and immediate resurrection which could
not be otherwise, which is conceivable though
we may not be able to say what they are.
But of these things it surely is not needful to
dispute, for notwithstanding all you have said,
Saturninus, I cannot believe in danger to one
who stands so firmly in the present reverence,
and just expectations of the people. The
Council would never dare to injure him  for
they would fear the people. I will apprehend,
I can apprehend nothing. During the few more
days we remain here, shall I look to gather
new wisdom from his lips, and long do I hope
and believe that Israel will rejoice in the light of
his truth and life.
We agreed in dismissing our fears. We also
determined that on the morrow we would be
together in the temple at the time Jesus should
arrive from Bethany, which is ever about the
third hour.
Our friends then took their departure for the
city, while for ourselves we were soon wrapt
in sleep.
But while we slept in security and peace
injustice
and violence, treachery and revenge were
awake, and under cover of night doing their
deeds darker than night.
His enemies have triumphed, and Jesus hangs
crucified upon mount Calvary!
Thus it fell out. During the night, while
friends were away, the city asleep, none
suspecting
the designs of the Council, Jesus was
seized, carried before the Council, tried and
condemned
,
the sentence confirmed by Pilate, and
then before the third hour of the day, and
before
the knowledge of what had been done
could spread abroad, was hurried without the
walls and crucified. Grief and indignation are
in every heart; for, save the Priesthood and the
Council, there were but few, who, though they
believed not in Jesus, did not reverence his
virtues and hope that he might show himself
more and greater than his miracles had yet
proved him. But though angry and disappointed,
they raise no tumult, seeing that although, as
they judged but yesterday, there was hope in
Jesus
,
and they knew not what he might not be,
felt that he might be anything, everything
they wished,  the event has resolved all their
doubts, as it has finally and forever extinguished
all their hopes. They grieve that being innocent
he should suffer death to feed the hatred of the
Rulers, but they acquiesce without further
complaint
,
as they now know that their trust in him
was delusive  that he himself was deceived
concerning his own character and office, and that
they therefore had been placing their reliance
on one in whom there was no help.
Judith is overwhelmed with grief.  She can
hardly believe that he, who but yesterday was
borne into the city on the arms of a whole
people
,
should so soon have suffered a cruel and
shameful death, crowds of that very people
looking on, and uttering approving cries. I
assured
her that they who witnessed the trial
who even knew of it  were very few, and
they for the most part partisans brought together
by the Rulers. When he was carried forth
indeed to the Judgment Hall of Pilate, and was
sent by him out of a feigned respect to Herod,
great numbers of the populace were gathered
together
;
but it was not wonderful, as they
beheld
him wholly in the power of his enemies,
submitting to his fate as if he no longer
possessed
any power of resistance or escape, that
they should abandon him, as one who by such
helplessness was shown not to be the person
they had taken him for; especially seeing that
his own disciples lost their faith in him,
and left him to his fate; and that one of them
bribed by the Council  that thereby the rage
of the people might be diverted in part at least
from themselves  accused him before them,
and betrayed to their officers the place of his
retreat on the Mount of Olives. All were now
alike persuaded  his own disciples not less
than others  that they had been strangely
deceived
.
No sooner had Judith learned this mournful
termination of her hopes, than she resolved
immediately
to return to Beth-Harem, nor did
Onias, seeing her unhappiness, seek to detain
her; but committing her, accompanied by Ruth
who shared her sorrow, to my guidance, set
us forward with the requisite attendants on
our way, so that on this same morning we
crossed Mount Olivet, and journeyed rapidly
homewards.
As we wound along among the valleys of
the Jordan
Here, my kinsmen of Rome, do these letters
to Naomi abruptly terminate.
Of the early days passed in Judea they give
an exact and careful account; it was with this I
promised to supply you. Of the fortunes and the
fate of Onias when, upon the crucifixion of Jesus
and at the instigation of Herod  now relieved of
his most formidable foe and rival, whose death
he celebrated on the day of his crucifixion by
a banquet given to his friends  he resumed
the enterprises that had been interrupted since
the first appearing of John, of my own
fortunes
during the same period, of the part I
took in the defence of the city when beleaguered
and finally destroyed by the Romans, and the
scenes I then witnessed, of my intercourse with
the early Christians, and the strange
interpretation
they came to put upon the character, and
doctrine of Jesus, and their controversies with
the Jews who, like myself, continued to deny
him, I will also write, if concerning these
things you should show the same desire to be
informed.
It is not necessary that I should say aught
of the wonderful events that took place in
Jerusalem
,
surpassing all preceding wonders, on
that same day that we departed from it, since
the writings of the followers of Jesus, in which
they are truly recorded, have already become
common. All that I shall add is this, that those
wonders were witnessed by persons from all
parts of the world, and received the same ready
assent as the miracles of Jesus. Saturninus the
Centurion  and than he no man could have
looked on with a calmer mind  doubted not
that Jesus was a prophet of God, declared then
more especially to be so by the signs of anger
or of compassion which nature gave, when they
whom he came to serve and bless devoted him
to the death of the cross. His rising from the
dead also, in agreement with his prediction, a
prediction which when it was uttered few
understood
or afterwards remembered, confirmed, not
only by the testimony of his own disciples who
saw him and conversed with him a long time
after he came to life, but also by the soldiers who
were set as a watch over the sepulchre, he
considered
as establishing the same thing.
Doubtless
they sufficiently proved him to be a
messenger
and prophet of God, at the same time that
they failed to prove him the Messiah who had
been foretold, for whom Israel had waited so
long, and still waits.
END OF VOL. II.